Although I normally think all deeply religious people are insane (and the moderates lemmings), I do 'like' the Amish people. They're like a mad scientist, [dangerous](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A35064-2004Dec29.html) in real life, but very cool to see on tv.
Some friends and I are working on a way of dealing with Silicon Valley urban sprawl by starting an intentional community :)  We're working toward buying an apartment complex as a group, from what the lawyer and lender we've been working with have given us, it appears doable as a TIC in Mountain View.
I'm going to patent flying cars. That way, once a genius comes around and actually *invents* flying cars, I can sue him for stealing my idea!
Arguing with biblical apologists is an unwinnable game, because there is no agreement on the rules.
The real paradox, or at least anomaly, is that only 59% of the switchers get it right when it should be closer to 67.  With the number of people that must have done it by now, 8% is a probably a pretty unlikely deviation, if the algorithm is really a fair Monty Hall.
Ah . . . my bad again, I didn't realize what was actually happening.  I assumed by the title that he was going incognito.  Having read the article, I now realize that he's conducting an in person survey, which kind of invalidates my earlier thought.  Thanks for pointing the problem out.
Read Sandkings by George R. R. Martin to see what happens if you are cruel to insects. ;)
Reddit could block IP address' and ban usernames. That would slow spam down dramatically. They should also use Captcha for submissions and comments.
"Why Students Make Great Entrepreneurs". Is this really true? I'd love to see some statistics which show the success rate of companies started by students versus companies started by people who have 5+ years working experience. Sure, the author puts up some postulations why students are more likely to start a company. However, is this actually true? And are these companies particularly succesful?
You misunderstand the opposition's arguments.  No one asserts that humans are the sole cause of climate change.  The thesis of global warming is that human activity is radically altering the rate at which these changes occur.
&gt;In March, Apple said the law would encourage "a state-sponsored culture of piracy", and hinted that it could withdraw from the French market. Big loss for the french government. Maybe teenagers would spend their money on something that actually benefits France.
&gt; And if we stop all C02 production, the climate won't change, and all that WON'T happen? No, the climate will still change.  However, it will do so on scale measured in millenia rather than decades.
Err i dont think she meant that literally, she was only describing the video for those that check the comments before clicking the link.
First, I think you have a very good handle on the difficulty of discussing the issue among non-experts. However, what degree of consensus among experts do you require before you conclude that there actually is a problem?   
&gt; Ignored and ranked up. Yeah, some of them.  And some of them ranked down.  Of course... for the first 4-5 hours (by which time there had been a lot of posts) several of my comments were modded 2-5... the early ones that were "snide comments" to Paul. What does that say?  To me it suggests that people that only had my posts and Paul's megalomaniacal replies to look at, thought that I had a point.  Later on, once enough people started bashing me, nobody had to put actual thought into the moderation anymore.  It became perfectly obvious without even reading my comments that I was an idiot and should be downmodded for trashing the perfection that is The Graham. &gt; That says more about Paul Graham than the Reddit community. I reply with the assumption that this sentence refers to the subsequent sentence... because I sure cannot see how the reddit community's modding says more about Paul Graham than it does about hte reddit community. &gt; Besides, it's not like he's obligated to respond to every comment Agreed. &gt; (though why he responded to all the bad ones and ignored the good ones beats me). Glad to see you agree with most of my point... I just hope others will not miss that on account of you having placed it in a parenthesesed half-sentence at the end of everything else. But I am sure this is just a side-effect of your flow-of-consciousness writing... and not a deliberate ploy to have you seem to disagree with me without having to be wrong.
The day burning the American flag is outlawed is the day that American flags start being burned by Americans.   
Interesting concept. His code was probably trivial though. Don't you think that his branding is far more valuable? It would suck to sell it at this point though. It'd be like nuking your startup right before you sell it. I'm betting that he's going to be way to upset to either sell it for pennies or give away the code. I think this site will get past this eventually and continue on.
Why the hell was this question voted down? From [another article by the same guy](http://www.exile.ru/2004-June-24/war_nerd.html): &gt;... counterinsurgency (CI) warfare ... Basically, CI warfare is about how to fight an insurgence.
&gt; They are going to kick you out of the atheist's organization, for conduct unbecoming an atheist. And I foolishly thought way back when that Reddit would be the place where an atheist can speak his mind without being shouted down. Yet strangely, shouted down I was... and remarkably, almost solely by atheists.
team?
wow.
What? No [Fiorella Terenzi](http://www.fiorella.com)? 
At least this thread helped me. Recently installed Fedora 5, and had mad fugly fonts, and no idea why. Googling Feetype and fedora, found rpms with a BCI compiled freetype along with some helpful tidbits on font selection in linux.
I don't know... I don't feel like he said anything that is not obvious. And I have a feeling you could replace "students" with anything. I don't think that the charateristics that students exhibit differentiate them enough from the rest of people who usually start companies: self-motivated, starry-eyed and hard-working. Thoughts, anyone?
You're right, but I think people have misunderstood you - I realise that what you are pointing out that this actual implementation of the problem is flawed. In the linked example they reveal a donkey, but as they don't tell you the conditions of the game you cannot know that it is better to switch doors.  They should say the vital point that after you pick a door, one of the other doors will be opened to reveal a donkey, then you can choose to switch.
Maybe your beard gives you more of a patriachal appearance.  Try just sideburns or something.  Aim to intimidate.
$450k? Please. My unit spends that much to get the carpets cleaned.
He won't be wimpy anymore, because *wimpy guys don't have goatees*.
Just wanted to say that i upmodded you. Brilliant. 
450K over three years is not irregular. Think of the headcount that a legit study requires.
Lets see, I can either spend six years of my life worrying about health issues even when I feel fine or I can just die six years earlier, I think the latter is the better option.
As part of the deal with federal prosecutors, the chain will plead guilty to conspiracy and identity fraud as well as violating laws involving employee benefits and record-keeping for the Social Security Administration and Internal Revenue Service, the company said. http://www.inboxnews.com/story/613/
For me, the link goes to somewhere in Russia.
well said. what astounds me is that this basic level of empathy--of imagination--it totally absent in most republicans.  Furthermore, the continued use of the term "non enemy combatant" to justify torture and barbaric violence is just idiotic. If america were occupied by an unjust force, we'd all be turning our pressure-cookers into IEDs, an no, we wouldn't be wearing uniforms.   
if i ever saw that guy, i'd tell him that i'd be willing to pay extra for a power outlet so i don't have to carry 2 8-cell laptop batteries for flights from jfk to sea/lax.
joeychgo shares his detailed discoveries of Google trying to revert to index backups from 1 year ago.
I'm convinced that I, personally, would run best on a 25-hour clock. Can you imagine having an extra hour to sleep in *every morning*?
This kid deserves a full Harvard scholarship. I've got 2 kids in the Canadian public school system here in Toronto, Canada and I completely agree with EVERY one of his comments.  It took guts to first of all pull a 2nd speech out and read the one that the Principal didn't see, and then to diss the whole education system?  Nice.  Very nice. Write the principal of Kareem's school at this address: RBlake@mainlandregional.net 
[PDF Link](http://www.eliteral.com/ebooks/Albert%20Einstein%20-%20The%20World%20as%20I%20See%20it.pdf) for print purposes.
If you believe, don't argue. If you don't believe, don't argue. There's no point in arguing.  Arguing, it seems to me, is the worst way to try to convert someone's stance on any matter. EDIT: Ok, not any matter - but this for sure.
For the emacs-addicted such as myself, you might want to grab the relevant branch from cvs (details available [here](http://www.emacswiki.org/cgi-bin/wiki/XftGnuEmacs)) I do get a crash every once in a while, but they're pretty rare.  And it really does look outstanding [(png)](http://deong.info/~deong/emacs-unicode-2.png).
What do you think happens to the projects that are started in the 20% time, and are clearly good ideas?
Must be a scene of reconciliation from the [Batrachomyomachia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Batrachomyomachia) EDIT: I guess it's more like the opening scene.
Transfer domain.  100,000 in the community?  It'll live without him if he gives it the chance.
Allow me to refer you to the work of [Gene Logsdon](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0804010692/103-3674778-7297463?v=glance&amp;n=283155), who has written about the milk issue. The agricultural laws in this country are a morass of legislative vermicelli, built around favors to science and industrial farming at the expense of land stewardship as practiced by the Amish and others. The laws are a poke in the eye of the free market. Raw milk can be produced and distributed safely, and is crucial to the outcome of certain traditional cheese recipes. Pasteurization requires expensive machinery, and according to Logsdon, is only demanded by law as a sop to its manufacturers. It's legal to drink raw milk, or feed it to your children. You can give it to your neighbors. It's safe enough for those things to be legal. You just can't sell it.
Nothing is wrong with them, they just live in the wrong time zone. Move to Europe and 4am will be 9 or 10am. Bingo.
How the hell did you know that?
But then how will they decorate the 2008 Republican National Convention?
judgmentalist, I'm getting to like you more and more every day.
Who could see that and not smile?  I feel awful today and am grinning anyway :-)
As Bill Hicks was fond of saying, the gap between 3rd and 4th is fucking huge. The Hari Krishnas are the 5th biggest army in the world. And they already have our airports.
I studied at the University in Colchester, which houses the largest army Barracks in the UK. My best friend, a brit from Pakistani origins, got beaten up one day just for walking down the street, and being brown skinned. The army's behaviour was so bad and predictable we turned the whole thing into our friday night's entertainment. He had a flat on the High street, and we used to stay in his room with a few beers and watch the fuckers fight every night at pub closing time. We calculated a fight would break out every ten minutes, give or take... Whenever I read this sort of thing I can't stop but think that it's ultimately inevitable. There are violent, racist elements in the army. That's a fact. To pretend that an army, be it American or Bristish, can establish peace in the Middle East is nothing short of an ignorant, and frankly, tasteless joke.
Why isn't Marissa Mayer in this list? http://www.google.com/corporate/execs.html#marissa
Reminds me of this Economis article about [gay speech patterns](http://joeclark.org/soundinggay.html).
Funny, my RSS feed is completely useless and I didn't have to do anything.
What's funny about this is that the worst things that's happened to my Linux (Kubuntu) system's fonts lately is I installed the mscorefonts package. Suddenly Firefox was substituting some narrow MS font (Verdana?) for what had previously been all DejaVu Sans (essentially Bitsream Vera Sans). I've thought about removing the MS fonts, but unfortunately DejaVu/Bitsream Vera Serif is fugly compared to Times New Roman. 
yeah, no point in regrowing them if they're just gonna fall out again in year ;)
I was just thinking that...
According to you Americans != blacks... no wonder.
Nah,  Ann Coulter is racist, I am not.  I support the war and I voted for Bush, that's about where our (mine and anne's) stop.
Yes.
I haven't seen a drop of Iraqi oil in my local gas station.
You must be very easy to please.
Wait, you're *Jewish*???
First off, the majority of the body count is a result from the insurgency and the sectarian violence after the US ended their full-scale assault.  Sure, you can blame us for that, I suppose.  But sectarian tensions in Iraq were at a boiling point for 20 years before we invaded.  We gave them the chance to fight among ourselves.  In actuality, the US presence has very little to do with the fact that Sunni's and Shiites are killing each other. Second, if our country was oppressed by a brutal dictator who tortured those who spoke against him, and the richest, most powerful country in the world offered me freedom, of course I'd take it, no matter what the cost.  Am I saying that I wouldn't be pissed if they missed and blew up my house and family?  Of course I would.  I'd hate them.  But because I hate them doesn't mean what they're doing isn't right. Contrary to what the liberals want us to think, this war will end.  The insurgency will end.  All wars come to an end.  I challenge you to not think in such short sight.  In ten years, it might be a totally different picture.  Hindsight is 20/20.  Believe it or not, there were many Americans who were opposed to fighting the civil war.  There were many Americans opposed to World War II.  But history has shown that these two wars were indeed worth fighting, although there were times during both where the outlook looked grim. Democracy is a good thing, and it never comes cheap.  It might take a while, but I think the results of this war (provided we 'stay the course') will turn out for the betterment of Iraq and the middle east.
can anyone provide a good link to learn how to do this?
Note to self: don't become famous enough to accumulate random stalkers.
You're saying I have a lack of empathy?  So why do you think I support the war?  To get oil?  You've got to be kidding me.  The reason I support the war is because I want Iraqis to live like us!  Dare I say that this country provides priveliges that most do not?  Is it wrong for me to wish this upon Iraq?   Keeping in mind that Hussein had already bloodily supressed many rebellions, it was quite obvious that the Iraqis couldn't remove Hussein by their own power.  So we helped.  And yes, people died.  People always die in war. The problem with people like you is that you guys use political jargon and complicated arguments simply to say "omg killing is bad!".  I got news for you.  War solves problems.  War founded America, war kept America together, war has ended Nazism, Communism, Fascism, and slavery.  Your peacenikish ideas are far more idealistic than my visions of Iraqi democracy.
I agree.  That's why I'm not a republican.
+1 funny
Psst, government. That guy's ripping you off. I'll do it for $75K.
I don't live in the U.S. so I couldn't normally watch this. And all I have to say is: Thank you. Thank you. Thank you.   
What the hell makes a war "justified"?  Violating 14 UN resolutions, banning weapon inspectors that are required by an unconditional surrender, trying to assassinate a US president, and using brutal torture and mass-exterminations to keep your power doesn't justify a war?  But all that and a bottle of VX nerve gas does?   This war is greatly justified.  I believe the end result will be a democracy that allows Iraqis to think and act freely.  This is worth billions of dollars, and thousands of lives.   I apologize if I'm the only one here who thinks the basic tenants of the constitution are universal ideas.
We have seen several betas over the past few days, several of which have been confirmed as non-working. However, just a few moments ago, Mathieulh released a beta version of the upcoming v5 of the downgrader and it works!
Uh, yeah, that is definitely the nightmare scenario, the sysop sabotaging the system. Although it "only" took them *more than a day* to get their system up and going again.
The cost is billions of dollars and thousands of lives.  The benefit is that 38 million will eventually breath free air.  Zero-sum.
So much talk about market share... you'd think this article was written by Bill O'Reilly. Google is about trying to make the products work well, not trying to make them popular.
costing them   &gt; ... about $3.1 million in assessing and restoring the network. and &gt; Executives at the company haven't reported how much was lost in business downtime.
I have a feeling you wouldn't agree if you were one of the second 100,000.  It sure is easy to approve of killing *other* people, isn't it?  There aren't many traits I despise more than hipocracy.
&gt; Is anything in your address book going to be relevant in 15-20 years? Yes. I have e-mail addresses from 1995 in mine that are still valid. I also have documents from 1993 that are bricks of dead bits, either because the software vendor abandoned support for the file format, or because I opted not to pay yet another ransom to the vendor. &gt; Do you think the applications of the future will just all of the sudden drop vCard format? No, since vCard is on the standards track, Read [RFC 2425](http://www.ietf.org/rfc/rfc2425.txt) and [RFC 2426](http://www.ietf.org/rfc/rfc2426.txt) and [hCard](http://microformats.org/wiki/hcard). &gt; This argument is he is making is groundless in itself. If I'm making music with ProTools, then I'm most likely going to use ProTools format -- when I take the format to another audio application, i with most likely convert to their format or export into AIFF and re-import.  What will you do when the manufacturer of ProTools goes under? What happens when you decide on switching to a different architecture because your MacBook Pro failed for the fourth time, and you've had it with three-month replacement cycles from Apple. [ About going towards open formats ] &gt; Is the industry going that way? No. If the industry wants to sell to the goverments of the future, they will have to.  The private market will eventually follow, if they want to avoid being locked to one vendor when a better product comes along from a different vendor.
So he says that more than 50% of all of the waiters in his area are gay and then he calls it a stereotype.  Isn't that more than a stereotype?
Since spez's suggestion for Tags has not been popular, I suggest a simple, effective, and efficient way of giving the reason for the rating you give to an article.  Tags require a dereferencing database in addition to the article database and the user database, adding a degree of complexity to the system.  Modifying the JavaScript that reddit currently uses to track click-throughs would allow a viewer to highlight a word with red for hot or blue for cold, so that the currently one-dimensional voting would become multi-dimensional.  Reddit would become much better at recommending articles and recommending friends, since the recommendations would not be based on a series of one-dimensional data but a series of multi-dimensional data.  The word selected could be stored in the user database indexed by the position of the word in the title.  Unlike tags, this index has a maximum, i.e. the number of characters allowed in a title minus the number of spaces allowed in a title. An extension of this concept would be to allow fractional voting, so that the effective vote for one user would be the number of words higlighted up divided by the total number of words highlighted.  This more fine-grained approach may not be necessary to achieve good recommendation results.
&gt; As a result, Google's blog search generates only 17% as much traffic as Technorati And this is... bad? Considering that blogsearch.google is an unannounced *beta* product, I'd say that's pretty impressive. I don't know Technorati's daily hits, but I'd guess they're somewhere between Tons and A Lot. Having 20% of that is decent. As for statements about the Gmail userbase, remember that Google sells targeted ads, which means that they're making probably an order of magnitude more per-user than either Yahoo or Hotmail. Even if they don't have the lion's share of the market, I bet they *do* make the most profit off their segment. &gt;"This is still a company that derives almost all of its revenues from one business," Um, what? Just because the ads have consistent branding across a multitude of services, does that somehow make them the same thing? Do we say that Chrysler isn't "diverse" because its entire revenue stream is basically from selling products that you drive around? It will be cool to see if Google can actually make "direct" money from GBuy, but I don't think it's right to claim that an ad with Gmail, an ad on Search, and a paid maps listing are all "basically the same". (edits: good lord I shouldn't post when I'm that drowsy...)
I don't quite understand what the point of your post is, but 17,000 traders unable to carry out transactions for an entire day definitely would cause a hell of a lot of lost business.
I saw that this morning.  I'm thinking event logging for the servers, and maybe an alternate interface to gcal. Maybe
So which is it?  Am I a hack writer or a novice programmer?
Perhaps the terminology you intend is the potential karma increase.  My understanding is that karma is a tally of the communal value of a user's past actions.  So the potential karma increase would be the benefit you presumably would receive by reading that user's article.  This 'PKI' could be represented by how similar the user's interests are to your own.  See http://features.reddit.com/info/93bf/comments for a suggested method for determining similarity between users.
OS X kernel is no longer opened. 
New CANADIAN tools
Redditor.
If you are Jewish and are considering becoming Buddhist, please listen to this mind-blowing lecture: http://www.simpletoremember.com/vitals/buddhism-and-judaism.htm
So if only millionaires had guns, more millionaires would be executed?
For the simplicity of Reddit, the specificity of tags, the improvement of the recommendation system, and the prevention of tag spam, see the feature request at http://features.reddit.com/info/93bf/comments .
try [this](http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=JBLU&amp;t=2y&amp;l=on&amp;z=l&amp;q=l&amp;c=%5EGSPC), instead.
says the screenname "athiest"
Well designed and constantly being repaired? You must mean pretty. Well designed stuff doesn't get fucked all the time. 
the corporation has certain obligations to its shareholders, and cutesy PR stunts don't change that.
proof?
Free as in speech, not free as in beer, ever heard that? It's admirable because it's a statement about the freedoms one wants to live with, independently of what features one wishes to have on one's OS and apps. Generally we consider admirable those people who make sacrifices for their principles, and this is a clear example. 
Sure.  I'm sure the civillians that died in the American Revolution didn't agree either.
Well, If that happens, I will apologize, and accept the due chastisement.
&gt; Even wiki _[sic]_ (2) could be considered relevant, although its _[sic]_ my personal opinion that wiki _[sic]_ is worthless because of its senseless and continous _[sic]_ change and spamming. That's the stupidest thing I've ever heard. Nearly all vBulletin installations are full of retarded useless nonsense and trolls. Wikipedia, on the other hand, has amazing amounts of high-quality information. "Change" in a wiki isn't a bad thing: it means people are voluntarily collaborating to improve the content of the site. He uses a sample size of n=1 and then draws debatable conclusions from it. Yawn. vBulletin doesn't scale very well, by the way.
While I do think that there is such thing as sounding gay, I don't see why people wouldn't understand gay-sounding people.
why your fucking obsession with race?
sample size n=1
New User - RSS or Really Simple Syndication is a method for, well, syndicating content.
Did anyone stop to ask why the United States Air Force is doing a study about blogs in the first place?
* cmake is a replacement for autotools   * scons is a replacement for make   * autotools work on top of make So comparing cmake to scons is not really correct?
This seems to be a sort of reprint and partial-plagarism of two previous stories under the **exact** same name. [search!](http://reddit.com/search?q=20+Amazing+Facts) This story seems to have some more embedded links.
Or, option-=.
yah, this reads like "make news"
Yes, they are universal but you should apologize for misunderstanding them so profoundly.  The fundamental right is life.  That means you can give your life for a cause, but it does not mean that you can kill thousands for your cause, and certainly not Iraqi families and civilians throughout the country.
Reddit sucks [you] :)
Ignorant reporter thinks Argentina has a "Prime Minister". This looks like a propaganda piece for British colonial dinosaurs. Pretty disappointing for a paper of the quality of The Guardian.
Why doesn't the statistics correspond with the theory? To me it looks like people who stuck got the car more often than people who switched. Am I missing something here?
Maybe he knows his area? Louis is gay.
At least they had the courage of their convictions.  Drop us a note when you get to Iraq.
I thought these were going to be amazing facts, not pillars of a conspiracy theory.  But okay.
Limiting the number of submissions per day to the karma value might scale better.
&gt; The cost is billions of dollars and thousands of lives. The benefit is that 38 million will eventually breath free air. Wait, the population of the US is larger than that.. what's going to happen to the rest of us?
I don't know why the author of the article missed the real reason. The problem is that the word vBulletin is part of thousands of urls. The same thing is happening for example if your search for jsp, just look at the second page: there is a lot of irrelevant  results. Certainly it's the Google's issue, write them a problem report if you care. There is a link at the bottom of the first page of results "Dissatisfied? Help us improve".
Reddit is ok.  I Reddit because Slashdot went downhill, but Reddit doesn't really feed my craving for tech. Honestly, articles on fine points of programming don't appeal to me.  The political articles are better than they used to be, but they used to be all dupes, and now, they are usually kind of humdrum to me. The articles I like tend to be lowly moderated, the ones I don't care much about tend to dominate the "hot" topics.  The recommendations, I tend to like!  So, this system is really cool for that. At the other extreme, I've wanted to bag reading such sites altogether because I want to reclaim my productivity from the time I spend at such sites.  Perhaps I'm overzealous in this.  I manage to get quite a bit done in a work day, but, eh, I think that it's this discipline that got me here, and that reclaiming that level of discipline is important, and that when I've slipped from that, bad things have happened. At the other other extreme, I'm too easily drawn into flamewars... sometimes with tragic results.
Well, OK. It's black and white. Where's the illusion? 
If you have digital, I think you can get The Daily Show on More4 or something.
I'm not sure if Jane Austen can be considered beautiful, since there isn't a photograph of her, but it's hard to deny credit for her intelligence from the coherent uses of irony that made her novels classics.
"spidery quality"? I thought the GNOME screenshot looked the best. Tip for KDE users: set your DPI to 96 (kmdrc, google it). The fonts will have better shapes and it will be in sync with GTK apps.
Yes, I too was disappointed by the misleading title (both on Reddit and on the original article.)
I'm curious about these... PHP has an installed base that's far larger than Rails, so theoretically, one of these things could really sweep up a lot of people, gain some serious momentum, and begin to outdo Rails in terms of functionality. Theoretically - in practice, it doesn't seem to be happening. Perhaps people are realizing that Ruby is a nicer language?   Or that there is simply too much fragmentation between these, and a zillion other frameworks?
OMG! my website is in the top 10 for its primary keyphrase!  OMGOMG! I'm getting search referrals from Google appearing in my webstats!  OMG! I'll have to update my complaining article about how I wasn't anywhere in the top 1000 results (for months on end)! Relevant search phrase: "What is music?" 
i'm sorry, but i'd like to be realistic and not live in a utopian dream. we in america, through our actions or inactions, decided that saddam was a threat that had to be eliminated and decided to go to war, supported the war, whatever...now, terrible things happen in war - look at the human history in the past 3000 years - it's all the same - murder, loot, rape, innocent people dying - all for greed, lust, hatred, fear or racial, religious and cultural differences.  take any war in human history that has gone as long as this one - you'll see the same pattern. Which is why war needs to be avoided at all costs - it should only be a solution when all other means have failed.  being in a war zone is a lot of stress - seeing people get hurt and die, see guts spilling out and limbs severed - life is not easy for either soldier or civilian in that position.   Do bad things happen under these circumstances? sure they do. should these soldiers be punished if they are found guilty? sure they should. but what we have to understand is that we are *all responsible* for this situation, directly  or indirectly. hence, must have the courage to *accept* that bad things happen, sometimes in the hands of our own soldiers, and pray for them and the victims and hope that this war comes a peaceful end.
This is as old as Saddam's WMDs
Not by a long shot.
You're Pakistani
A little bit more than la-la ;-) For example a jazz improviser in a few lines of code: http://commonmusic.sourceforge.net/etc/tutorials/index.html
Slashdot goes downhill because having a few people control the content sucks, so we go to Reddit, only to find that having everybody control the content sucks because it means spam, so we'll go back to Slashdot (insert tail recursion thingie here)
How's that compare to other airlines?
'naked fireman videos' hit a nerve?
How do you "know" an entity? Or let me ask the question again: How do you learn?
Excuse me, not many pictures or popular pieces in MP3 format. It just lets you download an algorithmic composition system along with documentation and code tutorials for different styles of compositions.
I think it's ironic that he complains about bad fonts. At least for me (Firefox under Windows) his article font is the worst choice I've seen for some time. The character distances are totally messed up too (e.g. letters followed by a 'c' are pulled towards the c).
For rewarding those who give useful information about an article, consider a modification of http://features.reddit.com/info/93bf/comments , where the increase in karma is the amount of communal benefit from the user who highlights an article appropriately.  When a user highlights a word in the title of an article as 'hot', that article is then recommended to others who have highlighted that word in other articles as 'hot'.  If these other users who received the recommendation do not highlight the word in the recommended article as 'hot', then the user who originally highlighted the article may be spamming.  The amount of communal benefit is the sum of the probability that I benefitted a user who later highlighted the same word as 'hot', which is equal to a difference of harmonic sums and can be approximated by a difference in natural logarithms.  The obvious way to defeat this reward scheme is to register a large number of userids, and then all highlight the same word as 'hot'.  Nullifying the exploit is simply a matter of making sure no one ip address has lots of userids and lots of activity, especially for the same article.  This reward scheme notably does not punish those with minority interests.
Maybe its Firefox's PNG renderer but that looks terrible here.
[And how (**N**SFW, but hilarious)](http://thomasfireman.ytmnd.com/)
Quick survey: I use Wikipedia every time I hear an unfamiliar proper noun, and I tend to follow links several layers deep if there's anything interesting. That's been my pattern for about half a year. Since I started, I've seen spam or vandalism on exactly one page. People talk about spam and vandalism on Wikipedia; how many of us have actually experienced it?
Those fonts all look the same to me. I mean, I can tell them apart, but only through careful scrutiny - the tail of the g is slightly smaller, the hole in the e is wider, etc. And they all look like l and I (lower-case L and upper-case i) render (almost?) exactly the same, which means they aren't good fonts in any case.
Pft. This page is worthless without tags.
Its from an aussie comedy show called [skithouse](http://www.skithouse.com.au/), although the comedienne does a reasonably convincing british accent.
This Blog is related to latest technologies like IPTV, Cable TV, DTH, STB, DTT etc and the ideas, market developments originating from them
Yeah. I guess I'm echoing the party line and kind of assuming I got a lemon. On the other hand, they replaced it with a slightly better model (I don't know *what* I'll do with this extra .16 Ghz of processor speed), so... we shall see.
I especially like how he's all, "okay, it's kinda relevant, I guess, but I'm going to put it on the side here because I don't like it, which has everything to do with how relevant it is" with Google. And with the other engines, it's just "okay, Wikipedia, relevant, next".
Frameworks can be Rails inspired, but I don't think it's possible to copy Rails in PHP. The language doesn't support introspection like Ruby, PHP has no closures, etc. Only languages like Tcl and Lisp can do a Rails clone.
I have seen spam only very rarely on wikipedia, and I read it a lot. I don't understand this attitude to wikipedia. Seems people have decided it doesn't work without actually using it, and then turn round and tell evryone it doesn't work. This is just FUD.
Note that the case is not clear cut. The defense says the UBS network is full of holes and that there is no proof the employee it defends did sabotage the system. Actually, there are two interesting bits of information at the end of the article. The article says the crucial "piece of code" in the "logic bomb" is "MRM -r", which simply is an FTP command for recursive deletion. This seems to be far from a clever "logic bomb". By the way, it appears the company servers are updated using FTP scripts, which might not be the safest way to do it. Finally, "Some servers in remote locations were down for weeks." leaves me wondering at what kind of backward locations UBS hosts servers, or what kind of organization they have that it takes weeks to restore a server.
The title of this article is fairly outrageous, as the Dalai Lama's contribution is a single sentence in paraphrase. The author does not even bother to directly quote the man whose name she uses as an attention getter. She does however quote two whole paragraphs of the writings of BR Ambedkar by way of rebuttal.  Never having heard of BR Ambedkar I looked him up to find that he was born Hindu and studied politics, economics and law in the west [not theology or comparative religion!]. Whilst he was clearly a brilliant man, he seems to have been secular until 4 years prior to his death, when he embraced Buddhism.  I can see no reason to take an economist and lawyer's judgement of a religion over that of the Dalai Lama.  It is a sad commentary on western Islamophobia that this article is proliferating all over the blogosphere, yet the actual words of the Dalai Lama, delivered in San Francisco and Chicago, are nowhere to be found.  I vote this one down.   
ditto digg.com ... slash(dot) them all, i say.
lol are you serious?  fwiw it was me who emailed you :)  but what do you mean the purpose of this site is to gather data on what happens?  do you mean you want to judge the intelligence of your users and see how many people switch?  in that case you definitely have to make the rules clear.  if you mean you want to gather data to see whether it really is 1/3 vs 2/3, just write a simulation!!! you don't need real people, see the PHP script I posted above for an example.
Or he could change his "reddit" shortcut to point to http://lipstick.com instead...
At http://www.archive.org/details/Despotis1946 you can download the full quality video.
hilarious!
These are not interesting as drawings, photos, or combinations thereof. Neither is this technique difficult to do.
Haha, this is funny.  Being in the Air Force, I know how we like to "doctor-up" the titles of our jobs, but this one is awesome.  The name of the study is "Automated Ontologically-Based Link Analysis of International Web Logs for the Timely Discovery of Relevant and Credible Information".  Of course "Study of Blogs for Credible Information" didn't seem to have the same ring... that'd probably only be worth the $75k Iamthewalrus would charge.
Actually Rupert Murdoch is now a US citizen (he had to be to own a TV station) and News Corp re-incorporated in Delaware in 2004.
i take it this is by the same reddit team?  are there any others out there?
a lot of the criticisms in the Comments section look to me like a dick-measuring competition. pathetic.  if you don't find what he said interesting, move on! get over it. it's not meant to be person-to-person combat. go post your own brilliant opinions elsewhere, already.
This is small guide how to start working with AVR internal EEPROM memory.
In soviet Russia? :-) 
I tend to disagree - I don't think slashdot went downhill. I am the fan of reddit, but I like slashdot as well. While there are more interesting stories here on reddit, the discussions are more fun and enlightening on slashdot. Moreover, you can find a very special kind of humour on slashdot discussions, which I couldn't find anywhere else.
Al Qaeda have won, if we loose our freedoms.
So true.  So true. New way for reddit to make money: Charge a  premium for *limited* access.  Or to make a log of my access habits public. Maybe I found a free solution though.  A comment earlier this week (yes, something useful from reddit!) mentioned the host file as the key.  I wondered, would it work?  So I tried it. New policy for me: On Linux I become root, edit /etc/host and add the following for reddit.  127.0.0.1 reddit.com So now if I try to access reddit I'm redirected to my own machine.  The same can be done on Windows.  Once a day I'm allowed to edit the file and comment out the reddit line.  I have one brief moment (more like an hour) to find something, anything of lasting value.  I use the Hide function liberally.  Hide is much faster that loading a page.  The title is often all I need if written well (hint hint!). I know, it's stupid.  I'm both gatekeeper and inmate.  But, after four days on the reddit *diet*, I think I'm loosing weight. There's more.  I also play a game with myself while reddit access is blocked.  I convince myself that the crappy C++ code in front of me is the entire universe.  Nothing else exists.  Even making mods to someone else's old code can be interesting if that's all there is.  Focus is the other half of the solution.
Bush and Warlords did!
It is partially right because scons is also a replacement for autotools.
I had the same problem at work, until my company added reddit to their content filter block list (under the "Porn" category ! WTF ?) All I can say is that's one of the best thing that happenned to me in months. Now I'm reading reddit from home, and still love it. :-) 
Weird. There's a link to 'subreddits' at the bottom of the page; takes you to the standard sub.reddit.com . This is new (but already seems popular). How'd it happen -- and *why weren't we told*?
All smokers are selfish. they have no idea how much their stupid habit affects others and moreover they don't care!
Ditto. I'm a heavy Wikipedia user, I've done 5-10 lookups a day for more than a year. That's several thousand articles. I've seen spam and vandalism maybe once or twice. And the quality is much higher than people give it credit for. Better than mainstream media in most cases (i.e. less factual errors, don't care so much about the language as long as it's understandable). And yeah, the article was stupid. Vote--
&gt;We’re sorry, but there is no Microsoft.com Web page that matches your entry
What about "We can't tell you about God, otherwise you might start your own religion"? Didn't anyone ever think of that?
Oh, wow. That needs to be the subject of a won't-they-think-of-the-children letter to the editor some day.
That's so bogus.  There's absolutely no reason why you couldn't fight a war without an occasional civilian rape/murder. War is a terrible thing, yes, and civilian casualties are probably inevitable.  But this is a totally different thing.  To pretend that this was "bound to happen" is to downplay just how horrible it is.
Maybe the whole of Reddit should be under "nsfw" :-)
Did they really think it was going to be hard to find them?
&gt; my company added reddit to their content filter block list (under the "Porn" category ! WTF ?) I think some places got wind of "nsfw.reddit.com" and my have just blocked reddit.com all together.   
Marketing?  Intelligence?
I made Reddit the homepage of my browser when I first heard about it back in January.  This week I changed my homepage to the java API index, and have become much more productive!
After having read all of your posts which have denied the extent and existance of the Jewish Holocaust in Europe by the Nazi's during WWII, I can firmly conclude that your a bona-fide anti-semite and that you hate Jews.  Nothing I say will convince you otherwise. However, if you really want to research the issue, there millions upon millions of pages of authenticated records that the Nazi's kept from World War Two that detail Jewish prisoner transfers and liquidations.  These records are kept all over Europe, and a number of them are at Yad Vachem in Israel.   There is also physical evidence.  There are extermination camps which were designed for the mass murders of hundreds of thousands of people.  There are the ovens.  There are the gas chambers.  There are mass graves.  There are lamps made from the skin of Jews and soap stamped with prisoner numbers made from the body fat of Jews murdered in concentration camps that can be directly tied back from the victims. Obviously, you won't be convinced until you see the evidence with your own eyes.  Go look at the evidence, and then we can talk.   The reason that the Jewish Holocaust was so tragic was that Jews were targeted specifically for industrial style assembly line murder and extermination as a race.  Yes, other ethnic groups and races were targeted for liquidation, but none on the scale of sheer evil that the Jews were targeted with. No one here is arguing that Muslim life is less important than Jewish life.  That argument is a red herring. The issue here is which group systematically blows up innocent people on purpose.  Hamas and Palestinian groups target and kill civilians and children on purpose.  Israel targets and kills militants and terrorists.  Sometimes civilians and children get killed accidently or recklessly.  This is not the same as KILLING CIVILIANS ON PURPOSE.  It is not equivilant.
Well thank goodness, wouldn't want us to lag behind our American cousins. Now just have to work on our fair and democratic elections.
Browse, submit and vote for Adobe Photoshop, Macromedia Flash, PHP, CSS and many other graphic design tutorials
Comics, despite their name, need not be funny. The author could've written a lengthy essay ; instead, he chose to use a visual means of communication.
I'd say that's more than "slightly nsfw". Did you see "Eucalytus Union"? Not that I have any managers breathing over my shoulder, but I'm just saying...
You can get it from the iTunesStore, assuming you have access to that.
&gt; Then I went back to college, starting over as a freshman and earning B.S. degrees in both computer science and mathematics in only three semesters. B.S., indeed.
&lt; 1% of yearly business
Unfortunately, I believe they are serious...
A handful ? Must be a fingerless hand, heh ?
I don't think he is mysogynistic. I think he really loves women. Why else would he end the article with:  &gt;So. Which one do you want to BONE?
From where?
You didn't see all of them.
Have they blocked netvibes (or pageflakes, or protopage, or Google, or... &amp;c.) as well ;-)
Best cure is prevention.
Right. See also Joe Sacco or Art Spiegelman.
Whoah. Slow down, cowboy. You're leaving your feces all over the submission queue and making it much harder to find and downvote the spam. 
No, not very funny. Although, "Science has been cancelled because your parents prefer to believe in magic." was great. :)
Just to put the figures in comparison: According to the [U.S. Bureau of Justice Statistics](http://www.ojp.usdoj.gov/bjs/prisons.htm) the U.S. have 488 prison inmates for 100,000 residents.  Roughly 4-5 times the rate of European countries.
"I'll never stop Nancy" "Word around the office is you've got a fat cock ... maybe we should rub our fat cocks together some time" "Smells like fresh vagina"
I disagree.  It seems to me that Slashdot comments have gone downhill.  I think this is due to changes in their demographic.  My impression is that a lot of the more technical readers moved on to other sites and that their readership is now mostly college students and junior SAs.  Whatever the reason, discussions on Slashdot tend to be very predictable and rarely informative.  I find the discussions on reddit to be more diverse and better informed, particularly in the programming subreddit. 
i want to change my account
Well that sure is convincing.
Algae. Not Alage.
Nude people are so magnanimous.
As the amount of rather personal attacks vs. your posts has obvioulsy grown, I can understand this emotionally overloaded post, but would advise that if you feel to angry about attacks vs. your person, simply sleep a night over it. It helps me alot to not be tempted into pure aggresiveness. I do think that PGs essays referring to startups are getting repetitive and boring as well. Also, it seems at least peculiar to me neither PG or bugbbear ever commented on your claim: which either relates to the claim beeing rediculous or your claim being true - in any case very naughty tactics on their side. Wether you think PG/bb comments in here are of any good or not is obviously personal choice. What I think would be rather peculiar is why you can not be true to yourself, needing another login to post annonymously. I agree therefore that posting in disguise would account for a rather weak personality. Just, please think next time how you phrase such a statement before posting (read: repeating) it. If you really think as yourself as creating intelligent criticism, please also do so (e.g. you claimed having written very elaborate explanations in this thread, of which I could not find any - again, this could simply relate to the fact they had been deleted  - seeing the number of deletes here; and I hate deletes/intereferences in forum threads as they violate the freedom of speech [ok, you can remove the f-word, etc.]). Anyhow, I do not agree that painters (as well as any craftsmen (!) in general) and hackers have nothing in common apart from being makers. Now, instead of recounting things they have in common, I would rather like to know what they do NOT have in common. Currently, I can only think of the more mundane things like the specific tools required to create the works, and, therefore, how those tools are handled. Or the clientel you will be interacting with - as a painter most likely with a private person, as a programmer with a company (although already this does not hold true entirely!). Yet, on the conceptual level I cannot think of any accountable difference and will be delighted to read some (favorably explained) examples. -fnl (genuine :D)
It didn't take my breath away, but that is pretty cool nonetheless.
Apparently older more widely used languages have more literature surrounding them.
It's not like we need to prove anything to throw people in jail, you know?
HIS geçtiğimiz günlerde yeni konsept ekran kartı hem PCI-E Slotuna sahip hemde AGP 8X slotuna sahip hibrit X1600Pro sunu tanıttı. Standart olarak 500MHz core hızı ve 128-bit veriyollu 800MHz DDR2 ramlere sahip olan kart aynı zamanda PCI-E modunda CrossFire a destek veriyor. Yakın zamanda AGP kart alıcak ve ilerde PCI-E sisteme geçicek olanlar için güzel bir seçenek olucağı kesin. http://www.hardwaremania.com/images/stories/users/1749his29er.jpg Yazan: Alienware
"won't be big and professional" Gotta hand it to him, the man doesn't lie.
Reminded me of this - http://software.ericsink.com/laws/Law_18.html
I call bullshit.  Sounds too much like what you wish you would have done, now that you're sipping on your beer with your buddies.  "And, listen, you know what would be cool?"...
Hardly reddit material. I'm a big fan of Waiter Rant and read all of his posts - but it's really just a personal blog with one man's thoughts and opinions on life, waitering, and idiot customers. The waiter in question may have had a lot of publicity both on- and off- line over the past few months, but someone posting it to reddit is a bit like posting the link to the first chapter of an unfinished novel...
Hardly. I think you've got the granola crunching yoga hippy stereotype in your head. Besides, is *anyone* suggesting that we take references to medical science out of schools? Why, yes. And they're all rightwing religious nuts who want to take every reference to evolution out of schools. This is an issue in which the right is *entirely* at fault.
Because on reddit you get modded up for leftist comments &amp; content and modded down for centrist/rightist comments &amp; content.  Didn't you get the memo?
They are _accused_ of rape and murder--the title is inaccurate.
I dunno--if he had most of the bullshit requirements (er, I mean, valuable general courses) out of the way previously, then he certainly could have done this.  (I did something similar myself.)
A twist on the old legend here: http://www.snopes.com/autos/law/snaptrap.asp
I have some advice as well as personal-anecdotes as-lessons for all those newly addicted redditers. It's a phase. You'll soon pass from unquestioned joy and pleasure to a place where the total lack of time for other physical activities begins to dim that pleasure. You will then ask yourself: Is it really worth spending that much time here? You will make a mental note of the many times you have visited in the past hour to read posts and comments. It's exhilarating at first, but then you begin to suspect, and then realize, that most of the time you are dazzled by nothing and learn nothing. The seductive charm of comments and seeing them go into the high tens will wear off. You realize that it is not fame, but a few random guys modding you up because it elicited a smile or sounded impressive *(see note at end). Yeah, these are useful skills in real life, to be sure, but must you whore yourself out at every posting, placing your virtual self in comments so that people may pass by and whistle? After a month or two comes the phase of getting quickly tired of similar posts, those amazing pics, those five things you knew nothing about, those cliched headlines. Good, your brain's survival mechanism is kicking in with some good pattern filters. You should be down to the four-five times a day bit. It starts getting easier from here.   *-Ok, so some really have no social life external to the virtual, and these web ratings are manna. These people should have a greasemonkey script that finds their karma-per-word value to give them some idea of how pointless spending hours writing supposedly informative, and astonishingly witty comments. I don't practice what I preach, so don't look accusingly.
Because we're not target audience for that site.
Speak for yourself ;-)
from holymoly yesterday: &gt;A mole writes:  &gt;  &gt;"Barely-literate knitting needle Paris Hilton has been out and about in London visiting several gigs and parties. During the various journeys, Paris has been smoking some VERY strong skunk. So, if you see a big shiny Merc and smell the weed, have a look inside, you might see a red-eyed Hilton with a joint on the go."
Uh. I'm sure the people in Kansas would LOVE it if teachers "told them about God", but the problem would be that it would only be the fundamentalist Christian God. They are, however, completely free to tell them about all the world's different religions and what they believe. We did just that in my public school 10th grade world history class. It's essential for giving context to a large portion of history and understanding world cultures.
It seems like NOT announcing who he was would be a better way to gauge typical passenger behavior, if that was his goal. The passengers are more likely to be cooperative if the big boss is there, even if he's not their boss.
I just have to let out a big "Woo Hoo!" on this one. Eventually losing my teeth has been a huge concern for me.  I take very good care of them and all but, regardless of what I do to stop it, they'll eventually wear down to a point where they'll be unbelievably sensitive.  When I'm 80, I'll be lucky to have any originals left at all! I've been hoping to read about some thing like this for a very long time and hearing about it on CBC radio earlier this week just made me smile in glorious satisfaction. Damn!  With luck, we'll soon be able to re-grow natural hip joint bone too!
Absolutely, positively yes.  It is called spam.  Self promotion.  It's evil (in the context of reddit). If you want to answer no: have you not realized the "new" page has become much less useful over the last few months, and one reason is this self promotion?
I've been a programmer for 15+ years now, and Slashdot used to be my first-visisted site. With Reddit (and to some extent, Digg), I now only subscribe to Slashdots RSS feed, and rarely visit unless I feel curious about what the commenters are saying. Unfortunate, but the "masses" voting is definetly more interesting than the Slashdot editors.  Times change.
He's not there to gauge typical behavior; he's there to converse with the passengers and find out what they like about JetBlue, what they think could be improved, etc.  Both types of information (how customers think, and how customers behave) are useful for different purposes.  He's just gathering the first.
Why is this page, of all text, an image? Sorta defeats the point of HTML.
&gt;One participant in the survey, a former CIA official who described  himself as a conservative Republican, said the war in Iraq has  provided global terrorist groups with a recruiting bonanza,  a valuable training ground and a strategic beachhead at  the crossroads of the oil-rich Persian Gulf and Turkey,  the traditional land bridge linking the Middle East to  Europe. "The war in Iraq broke our back in the war  on terror," said the former official, Michael Scheuer,  the author of Imperial Hubris, a popular book highly  critical of the Bush administration's anti-terrorism efforts. It has made everything more difficult and the threat more  existential."
No. Submitting your own work is [not discouraged](http://reddit.com/help/submitting). That said, I think it might be alright to automatically downvote any domain you see regularly that never has anything interesting on it.
If it got voted up then it *is* reddit material, by definition.
Any one of these facts means nothing.  Taken in as a whole, however, they add up to one incredible story of something very, very wrong.  So, I read that list very differently than you did.
OK, so it's not stopping time - it's more showing up the staccato nature of your brain's visual input buffers - but it's still pretty cool.
It's interesting that you hear things like this about lottery winners, and sports stars. I haven't heard of too many startup founders killing themselves, going bankrupt (after getting rich), assaulting people or getting addicted to drugs.
As the world gets more intersting, our filter for what's worth spending how much time on gets more discerning. But there's a lag. Recognizing the problem puts you well on the way to adjusting.
zefrank's site is really amazing.  If you go back in time, to here: http://www.zefrank.com/theshow/archives/2006/05/050106.html and go forward, you'll have a much better experience.  He uses catch phrases ("hard chargers") that have specific meaning from earlier entries. A few weeks ago he even had the audience write the show he performed.  It was done on a wiki in a week.  Currently, he's playing chess against the audience.
Is the problem self-promotion, or poor submissions? If it's the first, I submit that you have issues. If it's the second, I submit that this summary downvoting won't solve the underlying problem. Instead, why not downvote users who only submit poor entries?
Exactly. If someone submits their own content and it's interesting, I'll vote it up. If someone submits someone else's stuff that's crap, I'll vote it down. What's wrong with that? I think that one of the dangers of "social" aggregator sites like Reddit is that, when it reaches a certain critical mass of users, the "social" aspect often results in mobs trying to shape the rules of the site according to their own personal pet peeves. This tends to undermine what the site is supposed to be about. Vote stuff you like up. Vote stuff you don't like down. It's not a difficult concept, and it's more than sufficient all by itself.
Arguing with a fool is pointless but here it goes anyways. If you knew anything about history you'd know that men of any colour are likely to rape given the right opportunity and lack of morals. Ever heard about South America and a quanint little place called South Africa? They have hugh numbers of bi-racial people, where do you think they came from? Most of them (in the past) where the results of white men rapping black or indo women.   Infact the majority of "blacks" in the US have been proven to have at least 20% European DNA in their genomes. Looks like your idiolocial grandfathers couldn't keep their hands of black wome pica, and I don't think any of the women the violated had a choice in the matter.   Frankly I could say something smart and insulting about you but I think this post was a waste of time anyways. It's just people like you make me sick, you probably think Jews are greedy profiteers and want to stick them in gas chambers too.   BTW have you looked at the rape statistics for "pure" white countries -guess if you did you'd conclude that rape is "white beahviour" too since you like making stupid and biased generalizations.
What's wrong with self-promotion? I've found a number of sites, articles, pages and such that I never would have caught thanks to it. I have an RSS feeder with every news source I consider worth reading, and I regularly visit all of the more popular sites, so coming on here and finding a link from the Guardian, CNN, or YouTube isn't really going to get me anything new. Now a link to someone's own site, as long as it isn't linkjacked and has interesting content I have no problem with. This place is pretty dynamic, as long as people aren't submitting multiple times a day I don't see the problem. If it's bad it'll get downvoted and it'll be off the "new" page in an hour or so. More than that, reddit has a "hide" button, so if you see posts from a source you don't like, you can just hide them and that'll bump everything up a slot, as though it wasn't there at all.
Ah, mortgage brokers.  One of the few professions that can make lawyers look honest.
Wait, this is genius!!!  Only let milionaires buy guns, and crime will go down.  Why didn't anyone else think of this?
&gt; Irish tax policies are particularly successful, and East European countries increasingly imitate the Irish success story.  Also Western Europe can stimilate its gowth and employment through lowering its tax burden and a more balanced tax structure between income taxes and consumption taxes. Somebody isn't an English major.
It's gotten quite large since the last time I read (and tried to correct) it. Whether this mirrors the process of tree growth or abscess formation I shall leave to the students to decide, once they have heard both sides of the debate.
Vote up what you like. Vote down what you don't like. You clearly don't like users that submit only entries to their own site.  So vote them down.
You were told: http://reddit.com/info/50ys/comments :)
Lame.
It's self-promotion, but it's not spam. If you like the article in question, vote it up. If you don't, vote it down or hide it. An article's __quality is not influenced by the person who subits it__. Therefore you should vote down articles, __not users_. If J. Spolsky or P. Graham would post their articles here they wouldn't be voted down. And they're the most shameless selfpromoters out there! But because __other people__ post their articles here it's suddenly okay? Hypocrite.
Slashdot was on the path to ruin as soon as they added the Games section and stopped announcing kernel updates.  The combination of Reddit, ScuttleMonkey, and the style change made me leave for good.
Funny. I think the Linux/Gnome examples are more readable than the other two. 
If people submit links, they do because they found the resource valuable. If people submit their own sites, they do because they want traffic, so it's less likely quality content.
Makes it look like a real newspaper article, rather than the hoax that it is.
FROM THE ARTICLE: "The problem here is that claiming to discover a legitimate reason to invade Iraq after the fact is illogical. Again, the DoD said that these dead shells were "not the WMDs for which this country went to war." In fact, to go to war over this stuff would be ridiculous - as ridiculous as going to war for no reason at all. For those few slow boats that still don't get what the problem with calling these WMD is; they don't work!"
My point was simply that in my opinion a better sysop who was trying to sabatoge his own system could've done a "better" job and they are lucky their down time was so short.
Reddiderata: go placidly amidst the posts and remember what life there may be offline...
I don't get it. Why do motorists have such a persecuted attitude about speed cameras. Can you imagine if this article was about some theives tricking a policeman. hohoho. Yet a speed camera is also enforcing a law, and an important one.  I don't get it. What makes drivers so indignant about the speed camera?
Another point to hit on is that even one submits entries to their own site, votes on those entries should be weighed on content still.  It's no different from someone continually submitting entries to a site that the submitter is a regular reader of[*](http://csmonitor.com).
I'm surprised sites like these are even allowed. This is really harassment of the lowest kind. Why do women (or men) have the desire to name and shame people? What can they possbly gain from that, except for some kind of perverted satisfaction? Should you be at the mercy of everybody you date? Hell no! I consider the people who start sites like these highly unethical. Right down with spammers and scammers who make a buck by taking advantage of human nature. Yes, I'm angry.
Victimless crime, or perception of such.  When a thief steals something, there's a clear loser: the person who was stolen from.  When somebody speeds, nobody is hurt, until, of course, they crash into something. Same reason people are indignant about the RIAA and the MPAA's crackdown on music/video piracy.
I think such a thing should be on a case-by-case basis. Perhaps some people self-promote not to get traffic, but to get readers. There's a difference. I self-promote and I don't hide it (though I do actually -use- this site in that I vote on and read a bunch of the links). I don't do it just to drive traffic up to my site. Traffic means little to me, if 1000 people visit my site today, if none of them stayed for more than 30 seconds what did I gain? However I promote articles in the hopes that people will read them and like them, then maybe come back. I have taken the Adsense off of my page and have nothing profit-related in mind. I'd like to think others look at this in the same way.
But people can make up their own minds about the quality of the content, without having to take the submitter's word for it.  It's assumed that people like their own submissions; that's why articles start with 1 point. What's the difference between something that's submitted by the author and upvoted by a reader, vs. something that's submitted by a reader and upvoted by the author?
Oh, was Saddam going to come over here and do that? These *aren't* WMD.
Yes. Anyone feeling ambitious? You could write it up on the Reddiquette page.
The Republic of Ireland is a net recipient of funds from the EU. It's easy to go on about lowering the oppressive tax burden when someone else foots the bill.
The nature of reddit is whatever it happens to be, not what you want it to be.
Interesting you mentioned JBLU stock price, makes me wonder whether he still does what this March 2004 article said.
While you're at it, keep a blog of the whole experience and submit it to reddit.
&gt; Is the problem self-promotion, or poor submissions? My observation so far, and my reason for asking, is this: * I feel there is a strong correlation between "self-promotion" on this site and "poor submissions". YMMV. The correlation becomes even stronger if the submitted site carries advertising.  * The [reddiquette guide](http://reddit.com/help/reddiquette) discourages downvoting without reading.  * Personally, I appreciate if other users with time to spare have cleaned out the "new" tab for me. This includes the hundreds of dupes, near-dupes, self-promotion, two-liners, spam, linkjacks and what else goes under "self-promotion" and "poor submissions". When I have time to spare, I am willing to spend some time cleaning for the next guy visiting.
A very interesting and hopeful story. But, in all seriousness, how can I resist posting to Reddit about something called "Radioactive Scorpion Venom Therapy"?
You make the accusation, but you don't provide a single example.
It's not Google. Outsiders have created so many links with that phrase, it influences Google's rankings. See [Google's response](http://googleblog.blogspot.com/2005/09/googlebombing-failure.html) and the [Wikipedia entry on Googlebombing](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Googlebomb).
Is posting a pointer to one's own blog good reddit etiquette?
There's a bunch of cool Daily Show clips at [onegoodmove](http://onegoodmove.org/1gm/), as well as some other good stuff. Updated regularly!
So if Paul Graham were the submitter of all of his articles...
I'm no longer a child, so I can't say for sure, but here's a couple of things that trouble me, and I suspect aren't helping general psychological wellbeing of the UK population:   Out of my friends that have graduated university, remarkably few have decent jobs. In some cases, they did degrees in areas that just don't have many jobs (marine biology anyone?), but the majority just seem to have very little luck with finding anything that uses their degree. Despite earning more than pretty much anyone I know, my housing situation is tenuous at best. In the 5 years since graduating, I have had to moved house 7 times (almost exclusively due to where we were living, being sold). In addition, I am now paying $90/month more than I did when I graduated, for a room that's half the size, in a house a lot further out of town (in a bad way). I occaisionally look at buying my own place, but it mostly depresses me too much (I can, more or less, afford a small one bedroom flat in a not too bad part of town). Sure, things could be a lot worse... but I think there's definitely a mismatch between the impressions we're given of how things will be, as a child, and reality.
It seems to me that a good part of the success in Ireland is caused by the fact that they have the lowest corporate tax of the members in EU (12.5%). This means that companies can bypass the EU tariff at a low tax. Case in point, the export to the US has increased 500% from 1997 where the low corporate tax was introduced. Basically, Ireland is benefiting from foreign investments for the purpose of using Ireland as a gateway to the EU market.
Really? So the left is trying to legislate screwball alternative medicine by requiring it for everyone? Apples and oranges. And, just for the record, that's *one* example, not two.
&gt;Sitting there, I couldn't help reflecting on Neeleman's business acumen, not to mention his devotion to his company. After all, he didn't have to spend five and a half hours doing customer service. I'm sure he'd put in a full day's work before setting foot on the plane. I'm also sure he could have used the time productively in other ways. Instead he chose to walk up and down the aisle talking to as many customers as he could.  That's amazing.  I could never fill that guys shoes.  Sadly, some form of laziness would win out.
Anyone remember Japanese camp years ago? For some reason i feel it so similar that happens to those midde eastern people today. Unforunately...
From http://reddit.com/help/reddiquette Please do: [...] Post links directly to interesting things. Old content and self-promotion are okay, because Reddit is a meritocracy.
How is this alternative medicine a left issue? You need to go find me some example of the left politicizing medicine in favor of alternative medicines. And pesticides? Yeah, poison's real good for ya. You may think my worldview is 'narrow', but then again, so's the truth. The things that are true in the public mind are far outweighed by the things that aren't. I can see how that would seem narrow. I'm just unwilling to waste my time on bullshit.
"2,186,230 prisoners were held in Federal or State prisons or in local jails[...]there were an estimated 488 prison inmates per 100,000 U.S. residents" Someone at the US BoJS must be bad at estimating. According to my calculations, 2.1m prisoners and a population of 298m people give about 700 inmates per 100k residents, which is also the number the article states.
This is hilarious. Very offensive I am sure, but also quite funny.
&gt; It really all boils down to the idea that people just can’t behave themselves without oversight from some otherworldly intelligence. That is, we humans, like children, cannot behave decently unless we live in mortal terror of punishment or in anticipation of supernatural reward. Now, can you imagine how an anarcho-libertarian feels when talking to a True Believer of Government? ;)
"Paris Storms London With Luggage" Cool headline from lipstick. Very evocative. I shall be adding this lipstick.com to my bookmarks. But first I must finish reading reddit, and then get on my opus.
Hi, my name is Dennis and I am addicted to databases, volume management, indexing and searching, and filesystems.  There I said it.  I am a storage snob. There are problems in Linux filesystem land.  As one of the linked articles says all filesystems are equal but ext3 is the first among equals.  Anyone who has tried running NFS over ReiserFS can attest to that.  The VFS filesystem does not treat everyone equally.  Although I am happy to see progress with the ext series of filesystems, I would like to see better support for other filesystems first. Another issue is that distributions don't support all the features available in ext3.  Did you know that ext3 supports indexed directories?  This will aid situations  like mail servers where there are many, many files in a single directory.  It would if distributions would use proper mount options.  Extended attributes and ACLs will be the most sought after features the next few years I think (think BFS and the nascent WinFS).  Ext3 supports these, but alas these features are not enables by default by the major distributions.  I guess it is too difficult for them to support or they figure we are ready for such advanced features. My last gripe has to do with the features they are adding to ext3 to make ext4.  Most of the features list seem to center around large file support and other features necessary for enterprise size data.  I'm all for managing this class of data on Linux, but do we need to do in ext?  There is already XFS, JFS, maybe even ReiserFS for applications like this.  Can we keep ext3 clean and pure for core Linux support?  The majority of files in a basic install are small, read often, and written to once in a while.  Keeping ext3 optimal for basic necessities while allowing enterprise users to get their work done via access to enterprise filesystems like XFS seems like the best of both worlds to me. Anyhow we filesystem snobs are very lucky to have all these choices in Linux.  Tuning your applications from the filesystem up with SW RAID, LVM, and various filesystem options can net quite a performance boost.  The BSD distributions don't have these choices although they have GEOM, Vinum, FFS (the grandfather of all UNIX filesystems including the ext series) with soft updates.  And where is this all knowing ZFS?  Good times...
No women I know who masturbate frequently have had prostate cancer.
Joke, actually.
If there were a way to ensnare your comment in a pithy little sound byte, suitable for printing on a T-shirt the whole world would be transformed. It seems unfair that best comment ever shouldn't be memorialized somehow. I smiling even now as I type the full-stop and hit reply.
The "Reply" link is active, why not answer the man? :)
How do you even know it's a submitter's own site? If my username is "bigbeefytaco818" and my website is "scrumfly.com", how do you even make such a connection? I agree with most here.  If the content is good, upvote, no matter the source.  If the content is bad, downvote.  Simple meritocracy. (I should add I've never submitted anything from my own site, since I've never written anything I thought was interesting enough to throw to the wolves....)
It's funny how the article only talks about broadcast media. It never tells us who owns the New York Times, Washington Post, LA Times, etc, etc. Of course, media control in a democracy is all about power.  It's easy to say that Rupert Murdoch is way more powerful than "Pinch" Sulzberger, because way more people watch Murdoch outlets than read the NY Times. But way more *influential* people - such as college professors and other teachers - get their news and views from the NY Times. And who owns The Nation?  Underprivileged minorities, I'm sure...
&gt; Instead, why not downvote users who only submit poor entries? Because the noise that self-promotion and spam causes makes the site MUCH less usable. 
&gt;This guy thinks this is good for the war?!  No. He actually lays out the possibilities in the case US stays in the Iraq. If U.S would recognize that these are the only real options, they'd come into the right solution. Leaving the Iraq.
nasty site. where does slander end and freedom of speech begin? I don't know. I'd rather just not think about it. 
&gt; If J. Spolsky or P. Graham would post their articles here they wouldn't be voted down. And they're the most shameless selfpromoters out there! But because other people post their articles here it's suddenly okay? But they don't.   Why?  Because they inherently understand they are conflicted because they are the authors. And the part that amazes me about this discussion: **95% of self-promotion here is, in fact, bad.  It's often from sites that merely point to some real article.**  So, all you people dumping on my original comment are really talking about a VERY unlikely scenario.
Ah!  I was waiting for this... Please do note that I rather carefully left my own opinion about your posts unstated. What I sought to point out was that "nostrademons" is saying things that he probably would not be willing to own up to. Namely, he says he finds your posts very distasteful, and yet he also thinks you provide a valuable contribution even if your arguments are unconvincing. So... to "nostrademons", your writings are:  * distasteful   * valuable   * unconvincing I really do not think that all three can be true... unless he is engaging in a bit of sophistry himself and despite calling your posts "valuable" he sees the value solely in the refutations that you "cause". So... if your posts are not valuable, then clearly he was doing subpar mental gymnastics just to be able to rank you above moi! If your posts are not reprehensible to him, despite him considering them at once valuable and unconvincing... that would suggest that he is a racist in an almost stereotypical sense. If your posts are not unconvincing to him, then he is pretty much a soul-mate of sorts of yours. Is my reasoning unsound?
Depends on whether or not it's based on experience. My wife is an actress. Because of her acting and close ties to the local theater community, I know that a significant fraction (I would guess 20-30%) of men in the theater in this town are gay. That may be a stereotype, but it also happens to be true.
**You are not part of the target discussion, then, which has to do with people who ONLY submit articles from their own site.**  You have submitted many articles from many sites.  That is fine. Self promotion is fine, occassionally.  Excusively?  I really can't believe the lack of imagination here that says it's OK. 
When someone has 10's or 100's of submissions from a single site.... who would do that, unless they had a vested interest in the site? I've called users on it, many times, and not once have they denied it. Also, many times the reddit user name is actually contained in the domain name.  That makes it very easy to tell. 
Thanks. ;-) Part of me suddenly wants to start blaming PG for the my exchanges' descent into degeneracy... but I can accept my part of the responsibility. I agree with/appreciate most of your post. &gt; you claimed having written very elaborate explanations in this thread I think I claimed that there were very elborate explanations in this thread *that were ignored by Graham* (and not written by me). I myself, and I do not think I suggested otherwise (and if I have, I should not have done so), where I was not in reactionary mode tended to offer fairly simple statements... admittedly sometimes vailed behind snideness and/or sarcasm that may have given pause to a 5 year old, but should not have obscured the message to an adult. Thank you again for the supportive words. ;-)  Doubtless there are many more like you... until the comment page filled with mindless Graham-drones bashing me, a number of my initial comments were modded between 2-5 points (for several hours, which to me suggests a [since then lost] struggle between upmodders and downmodders).
&gt;This doesn’t mean atheists are not moral or do not love or do not have inferences it’s just that there worldview does not adequately support them. Wait, wait. Theists are accusing *us* of cognitive dissonance?
1. Go back to gradeschool and learn to spell.  2. If you are suggesting the linked article was not from the Jerusalem Post, you also need to work on your reading skills. In other words: You are a moron.
http://thisisbenslist.blogspot.com/
*"Steeped in a romance-novel notion of marriage, sexual advice to pregnant moms— whether revealed in print or in the strange silences at the doctor's office— gives short shrift to the dramatic changes in women's sexual physiology and desires."* Maybe my wife and I were just lucky, but we never had doctors who responded to such questions with "strange silences". Our experience has been that, if you ask them questions about sex, they will respond honestly and directly. In fact, some have a good sense of humor about it (which, I think, is a good way to defuse any awkwardness). When we were planning to get pregnant, my wife went to her doctor to get her IUD removed. She had read somewhere that it's best to wait for a month or two after an IUD is removed before trying to conceive. So when the doctor was done, she asked: "how long do we have to wait before we start trying to get pregnant?" His response: "You should probably wait at least until you get home."
&gt; Note to self: don't become famous enough to accumulate random stalkers. Zak, you are a dumbass fanboy.  Using Reddit makes me a stalker? Perhaps some patches should be added to reddit to prevent people critical of Paul Graham from seeing articles on their HOT frontpage that have been submitted by [paulgraham](http://reddit.com/user/paulgraham) or any of his [sockpuppet](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sock_puppet_%28internet%29) reddit accounts.
From your perspective they sound like Whines of Mass Desperation.
The benefits to the CMake project can't be underestimated.  By putting in some time on their part to help KDE they have got CMake a fantastic test bed not to mention a lot of good press.  After KDE moved to SVN I noticed a lot of other projects decided to move to SVN too, they might have been thinking about it, but it there was certantly a tipping point that occurred where suddenly everyone was moving to SVN, even sourceforge is now.  Who knows if CMake will get similar results, but it wont hurt them that is for sure.
The truth, while sometimes funny, is also often rather frightening.
&gt;A child born into a poor family has a 1% chance of growing up to become one of the richest 5%, while a child born into a wealthy family has a 22% chance. Another study, published by Business Week, found that in 1978 23% of adult men whose fathers were in the bottom quartile made it into the top quartile. In 2004 the figure was 10%. Digest: Fewer people born into poor families are becoming rich. &gt;But reality and public perceptions are travelling in opposite directions. A poll for the New York Times published in 2005 showed that 80% of respondents thought it was possible for poor people to become wealthy by working hard. In 1983 the figure was only 60%. Digest: More people think poor people can become rich if they work hard. &gt;16% of the teenagers it interviewed believed they would become famous, probably by appearing on a show like Big Brother. [...] 11% of them, it found, were "sitting around 'waiting to be discovered' ". Digest: People are not working hard.
posty!
Why does it seem like this story is only covered on the sketchiest news sites?  I almost had a seizure because of the ads.
Do they now sell TV to Europe? They didn't use to.
I actually saw that in the original paper.
Is it noise if it's a good entry? If so, I repeat my previous claim. If not, I repeat my previous question.
I don't understand what you're saying.  Because I'm not over there doing the fighting, I shouldn't speak?  That's like saying "because it isn't your neigborhood being bombed, you shouldn't speak".
And those 95% should be voted down because they are, in fact, bad. Not because it's self-promotion, but because the articles are simply lame or linkjacked rip-offs of better articles. The fact that low quality links are often self-promoted doesn't mean that self-promotion always results in bad links.
Judging from the rising rank of this link, the community has deemed it proper etiquette. I would not expect a link like this to succeed on the mainpage without the 'nsfw' warning, though.
&gt; having everybody control the content sucks because it means spam I haven't seen spam on the front page for a long time.
The US tried to help out by establishing 'no-fly zones' to protect the rebels from air bombardment.  Saddam killed them anyways. Again, what part of "violating 14 UN resolutions, trying to assassinate a US president, brutally oppressing democratic reform and killing your own citizens" is indefensible?  Instead of dismissing it as simply 'indefensible', let me defend it and i'll let you attack it.  It's like me dismissing homosexuality as 'an abomination'.  Big words, but they don't accomplish much. Which war ended communism?  The cold war did.  Sure there was no invasion of US or Soviet soil, but it is nonetheless regarded by many military historians to be a 'war'.  I guess I was too rash; the cold war didn't 'end' communism, as there still are a few countries that are "communist".  But the violently expansionist brand created and exported by the Soviets was effectively put to an end.  China is everyday more and more abandoning their traditional communist economy and Cuba...well, we'll see what happens after Castro kicks the bucket.
Don't judge the publication? Most rationally minded people are aware that aljazeera is likely to be more reliable than CNN. What am I missing?
Most of these are taken directly from Paul Lukas' marvelous zine Beer Frame.
So if you submit links to your own site exclusively your links have a lower quality then when you also add some links to mylittlepony in the mix? Nope. However, I do think that if we all downvoted a little more agressively the content on the mainpage would be of a higher quality. So I agree with your general sentiment.
Oh...I thought I was about to read an up-front, honest article about the disadvantages of Reddit, an article that would be very timely and interesting to see on Reddit's own page. Instead we get one of those bothersome articles about how "I don't have a life anymore because of (blank) and that's why I hate it."  
&gt; I Reddit because Slashdot went downhill What I notice about slashdot is that the stories seem so old. I often see stuff I saw on reddit a couple days before. But this isn't because slashdot has lost any kind of edge. Democratic aggregators just react faster than human editors.
The population of Iraq is 38 million.  I was referring to them.
What I meant is that it is far easier to be cavalier with someone else's life than your own life or the lives of ones you love.   
http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/smee
&gt; will eventually breath free air. Huh? Iraq is very free now.  We could make a good case that they are freer than us.  They don't have the weight of 200 years of legislation on their backs. In fact, the reason we are over there right now is because they are so free and some of the people there aren't using their freedom wisely.   
Oh.  When do we get our freedom back?
Where's your proof?   This whole "No Blood for Oil" thing is getting old.  Bush isn't an oil baron anymore.  Just because he is from texas and he used to manage an oil company doesn't mean he's eternally corrupted by their likes.  He's done more than clinton to push for ethanol, biodiesel, and options such as the arctic wildlife preserve, which would reduce and eventually eliminate our dependency on middle eastern oil.
Are you saying there was a golden age where US citizens were 'smart' and their government was not involved in foreign aggression?
McDonalds knows its market in Russia.  Is this real?
For $40k that's definately a nice ride.
Please enlighten me as to the freedoms you have lost.  Its funny.  I say we're at war with terrorism, and liberals tell me to "stop living in fear!!!", but you're the ones that are sooooo oppressed by the patriot act.  Talking to you people one would think that all americans have been handcuffed and fitted with homing-anklets.  I don't look over my shoulder, I'm not afraid that the government is 'out to get me'.  Who is living in fear?
A quote from the Media Matters website... &gt; "Since our launch in May 2004, Media Matters for America has monitored, analyzed, and corrected conservative misinformation in the news media 24 hours a day, seven days a week." Notice how they say "conservative misinformation"? So in other words only conservatives misinform? Wow, good to know.
antiwar.com is my number one source for news, followed by narconews.com, and sometimes sandersresearch.com. I consider CNN, ABC, NYTimes, and USA Today to be "rightwing crackpot" organisations. So, no.
Yes, before 1492 ;-)
I visit popurls.com (for those who don't know popurls.com and can recognise themselfs in 'Why I hate Reddit', visit it at your own responsibility !!!). Help meeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee     
You are asserting that the self-promoters make good entries.  Don't make that assertion, as the types of entries that brought this question up are not good entries.
Tyranny of the Majority - gotcha. I'll just go watch Big Brother now - I mean, it's popular right?
&gt;  **reddit_god** -1 points 3 hours ago &gt; Then of course you wouldn't mind if we bury them in your backyard, spread them on your bagel, or use them as a facial masque. Paul, your sockpuppets are becoming increasingly less subtle...
trust a british newspaper to print that one! that was a joke that circulated in various more vulgar forms here in ireland during the mid-90s.
Just remember to not guard it with poisonous snakes, or Max will steal it's petrol.
&gt; Yeah, that's all that really matters -- the stock price. You must be a CEO of one of the other loser airline companies -- sorry, we Redditians know what is valuable. Sentimentality?
Just so everyone gets what I'm talking about: Look at [this entry](http://reddit.com/info/949t/comments) from [this user](http://reddit.com/user/honekaimedia/). This entry, like many of the entries from the same user is [linkjacked](http://www.neatorama.com/2006/06/29/flying-motorcycle/).  Not only is it linkjacked, the techeblog entry is of inferior quality to the "original", since the actual links to the creator of the flying bike is removed. "Original", well, I've found references to this flying bike [going back several months](http://technorati.com/search/larry%20AND%20neal%20AND%20flying%20AND%20motorcycle). And this is what this kind of content is most of the time, low-quality regargiturated content lifted from other blogs, and these are not intersting reads.
I don't think that people who believe in an afterlife can ever truly be adults.  Their values are the values of children who are trying to appease a parent/god. True morality comes from mortality. Without finiteness, there is no real value.
Has anybody actually ever seen this "Internet site used by Islamists"?
Agreed.  AlJazeera is a reputable news source.  It's on the same level as the BBC or NYT. AlJazeera may not be perfect, but neither is any other news organization.
I love you too, man.
"Scientology Orientation video (how long before this gets taken down?)" posted 5 days ago... Youtube:  "This video has been removed at the request of copyright owner the L. Ron Hubbard Library because its content was used without permission"  Thanks shii (=
Can't he just sue them for discrimination?  The site's rules don't allow men to directly reply, or post gossip about women. &gt;"www.DontDateHimGirl.com is for women to post the pictures and profiles of men who have allegedly cheated on them, NOT vice versa," I'm worried of the drama this could cause other sites if it is ruled that site owners are responsible for their user's content.  At the same time, this is a pretty clear cut case of discrimination.
Nice post.  Poor title.
&lt;troll&gt;  well atheists are just people who can't doubt their own existence. they're not bad, they just lack imagination and have a very narrow understanding of 'existence'.  &lt;/troll&gt; That's a big question for a skeptical believer such as myself: what's existence? how do you define it for a hypothetical all-powerful entity who supposedly created everything? isn't our understanding of 'existence' confined to 'creation'? does 'existence' have any meaning outside of creation, where such a hypothetical entity would "be"? To me, the question "Does God exist?" is meaningless (can't define 'existence' in the context of an (even hypothetical) all-mighty God), so any answers are pointless. Whoever asks this question is probably asking "Does God exist for me?" or "Does God manifest Himself in Creation in a provable manner?" or simply "Do I exist?".
The story never mentions what this "peace t-shirt" says. I'm sure some folks will say "well, that's irrelevant," but maybe it's not.  It's absense from the article is like the elephant in the living room.
I like most of Steve's essays, but this is borderline incoherent.
Side note: why is it that newpapers insist on using their multi-column print style when they move content to the web.  It's very annoying.
Wow, for the price of a Harley, you can get a frickin flying machine...  where do I sign up?
Terrific link! Ireland has done the same thing that Hong Kong, Estonia, or the US of the early 1800's did. Low taxes, property rights with a decent rule of law, and limited government means that individuals spend money more efficiently than bureaucrats. The result every time will be economic prosperity.
enter a comment here
I can see several DOS-attacks in this site's future
"You can't be in here protesting," officer Adkins said, pointing to my Veterans For Peace shirt.
I hadn't noticed that, thanks!
A ripoff of http://instantdomainsearch.com
&gt;Yes, but that is not the Chief Moonbat's point. If you use rhetoric like that why should we not dismiss what you have to say out of hand. 
That's 15 cents per US Citizen. Oh well, that's not that bad... I guess. But then, lots of little expenditures like this add up, I suppose...
Are you guys kidding?  Aljazeera just published a story "reporting" that "the Israeli government is using the World Cup matches as a cover for killing as much [sic] Palestinians as possible." http://www.aljazeera.com/cgi-bin/review/article_full_story.asp?service_ID=11509 Qua publication, it's an anti-semitic shit rag.  Get your heads out of the sand.
Because speed *itself* is not a dangerous thing. A camera can issue a ticket to dozens of cars in an hour, all driving in a straight line, in the same lane, 15% over the speed limit. But the camera ignores truly dangerous drivers: those who weave in and out, tailgate, and don't signal lane changes. The police rely on the automated system, and thus have fewer patrol cars out catching reckless drivers. And that's the real problem.
Not when presented as the truth.
Predictive Pro gives the QA Manager a tool with teeth. Pro generates twenty quality metrics, which the built-in intelligent agent analyzes in relationship to the available error data. Very early in the coding cycle the QA Manager can show quantitatively that violating a quality metric will result in an error in the software. No arguments, no rolling eyes. Go to code reviews and peer reviews with confidence in the established quality thresholds.
&gt; I don't **think** that people who believe in an afterlife can ever truly be adults. Their values are the values of children who are trying to appease a parent/god. I'd be curious to know how thinking this affects your everyday life. Is it just a snide little superiorism that you keep tucked away, or do you feel that anyone who believes in an afterlife should be excluded from "adult" activites? Voting, for example?
Cheap autogyros are nothing new. There are also powered paragliders, hang gliders with [trikes](http://www.ultraflight.com/issues/nov2000/nov00page35.htm) and some fixed-wing ultralights for under $25k. Some used aircraft are pretty cheap, like this [Rutan LongEZ](http://cgi.ebay.com/ebaymotors/Long-EZ-Experimental-Aircraft-Located-at-ARB-MI_W0QQitemZ150002503558QQihZ005QQcategoryZ63677QQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem) on eBay. If you'd prefer a regular production airplane to a kit like the LongEZ, here's a [Piper Colt](http://cgi.ebay.com/ebaymotors/1961-PIPER-COLT-IN-LICENSE-LOW-RESERVE_W0QQitemZ130003099217QQihZ003QQcategoryZ63677QQrdZ1QQcmdZViewItem) for $12k. The folding rotor is somewhat innovative, but I suspect being propeller-driven will create legal liability operating these on the road. It's also illegal to overfly people or buildings at less than 500 feet in an ultralight aircraft, so you can't bypass that traffic jam by taking off from the highway.
[Here's a likely candidate.](http://www.veteransforpeace.org/teeshirtspics.htm) But personally, I don't care if it had a picture of W. with a harpoon through him. That cop was acting against the First Amendment, and ought to suffer consequences for it.
If speed cameras are used to make the roads safer, that's one thing. However, despite the claims of them being used that way, they are often used for revenue generation.  People are more likely to complain about taxes, but see revenue from "speeding tickets" as "just making people safer." Even if the speed camera program starts out with good intentions, it's hard for any municipality to see that revenue stream and not get corrupted by it. 
Pretty much off-topic, but I keep wondering what "non-linjacked" refers to.
I am one of the majority of Americans who voted against Bush in 2000. I have attempted to persuade everyone who will listen not to vote for Bush in 2004. I do not accept responsibility for the actions of the Bush regime.
Do you realise that aljazeera.com is something completely different from aljazeera.net? Looks like someone else has his head in the sand.
It would have been much more meaningful to actually connect the dots rather than leave them swimming out in a sea of speculation.
some redneck photo's what?
In defense of my fellow citizens, we're damn hard-working, to the extent that the [US Census Bureau claims we spend more time now commuting than vacationing](http://usgovinfo.about.com/od/censusandstatistics/a/commutetimes.htm). One problem is we're atomized, and many don't feel they have more to look forward to than work at someone else's command, having dress codes even as adults, and seeing little of the benefits of increased societal productivity. (Such as [smaller workweeks](http://swiss.csail.mit.edu/~rauch/worktime/); not that work itself is bad, but disempowered work under someone else's command is highly fatiguing.)
Sure, I agree.  But again, we have to look at such ideals within a spectrum.  On one end, the US government could confiscate every first born male in america and throw them around like cannon fodder as we conquer the world.   On the other end, no one fights, no one gets killed, but the government rules our lives absolutely. So there's got to be a medium.  It's funny that you guys are saying that the Iraqis would be better off in government that is similar to the "dictatorship" that many liberals accuse Bush of trying to establish in America.  Hell, if he did become dictator and monitor our every move and paid the secret service to silence 'troublemakers' our society would be very safe.  Hardly anyone would ever get killed.  But that isn't 'right', is it?
Okay, fair enough.  I take it back.
Perhaps you should ignore the "rhetoric" and read the substance. In any case, I was merely using a well known moniker for the man out of a sense of playfulness. I should have known this was not a site for humour ;o)
aljazeera.net (from the article) and aljazeera.com (from your comment) are not the same thing. aljazeera.net is the site of the satellite news channel, the other one is just using a similar name to get attention and spread hate.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aljazeera.com  http://arbiter.wipo.int/domains/decisions/html/2005/d2005-0309.html
If there is one good thing about women. It's that they can make me want to fuck preggos.
That's an interesting observation, you have a good point.  I guess my statement was sort of 'looking forward' from the beginning of the war when Iraqis did not have many essential freedoms.  I'm just saying that the war was (or will be) worth it.  If in a year Iraq becomes an Islamic dictatorship and makes women wear burkas and forces men to grow beards, I'll hang my head in shame, eat my words, pat George W. Bush on the back and say "Nice try, man...but you failed."
uh, wrong... from [this](http://www.exile.ru/2006-June-02/massacres_babies_and_nukes.html) article: &gt;What cracked me up is the way Hanson uses the spike in oil prices to prove we meant well: "What did these rare Americans not fight for? Oil, for one thing. The price skyrocketed after they went in." &gt;Now that's real underclassman-level logic: if we didn't manage to grab Iraq's oil fields, then we must never have wanted to. &gt;Applying that to the Hitler example, Vic's take on the Eastern Front would be, "What was Operation Barbarossa not designed to do? Conquer Russia, for one thing. By 1945, Germany had actually lost massive chunks of territory, so clearly a land-grab was the last thing on Hitler's mind." &gt;Vic, buddy, ever hear of plans going wrong? Ever consider the possibility that Cheney wanted the oil and didn't get it because he was too reckless and stupid to pull it off? [NB: Cheney's people even hired Yegor Gaidar, author of Russia's notorious privatization scheme, to advise on the "privatization" of Iraq's oil shortly after the invasion ...but Gaidar got chased out of town -- Ed.]
You can get an ultra-light aircraft for $4000-5000 on ebay. There are major problems with those machines though 1) Safety - imagine if you rise your hans in the air while engine is running - you will cut your friggin hands off 2) Flight permissions. Here in NY you are only allowed to fly in certain zones, and if you have a small airplane, you have to communicate with airports and do announcements to other airplanes. With larger planes you must have a flight plan, license, and special devices that communicate with the airport towers. 3) Gas mileage. OK, it can fly 70 mph. My guess, it requires at least 3-4 times more gas per mile than a $25K car. 4) Now imagine thousands of people commuting to NYC in the morning. That will be a bloodbath. It might be ok for Kansas or other sparse areas.
Sorry, I thought it was just a blogger named Al.
Cops on the powertrip again.
I don't think he's defending the war. He's saying that the neocons got us into a war that we could only win by being evil. Like he says- Bribe'em, Nuke'em or **Just Leave'em the Hell Alone**!
I'll simplify it for you then. Steve wants there to be boarding schools that replace middle and high school with an intensive program focused on turning smart students in to great hackers. Of course, the line about "folding languages" gives away his real motivation: he wants somebody to make an "[acceptable Lisp](http://steve-yegge.blogspot.com/2006/04/lisp-is-not-acceptable-lisp.html)" and thinks it might happen if there are enough brilliant teenagers studying programming under those conditions.
I think in most nations, there's many removals of speech freedoms which are swept under the rug. In the US, adults often are pressured to accept similar dress codes in the workplace (for example, you generally can't wear a shirt with the logo of a corporate enemy, even if the shirt is otherwise acceptable).  This has grown to the point where [a student was suspended for wearing a Pepsi tshirt during "Coke in Education Day"](http://www.asu.edu/educ/epsl/CERU/Community%20Corner/baecherspeech.html), because the school wished to court a measly $500 prize from a Coke bottler, though at least that story still has some power to shock, as we expect somewhat more participation in our government's decisions than our workplaces. I don't even think those enforcing the rules are purposefully malicious for the most part. Police subordinate themselves to the authority which sees protest as injuring its aims, and same holds for workplace managers.
good point. I looked, too. But this shouldn't be on the reddit home page.
the Guardian? Aren't they liberal?
Reminds me of a story my pharmacist father told me once. Apparently, a customer had come to get a morning-after-pill, and he informed her that it would have to be taken "within 72 hours after conception". To which she replied: "Oh, no problem. It's only 30 minutes ago."
&gt;I believe the justification of WMDs came from the Administration Yeah, it did.  But it came as sort of a last-ditch effort to get the UN to approve our invasion.  As I recall, when we first started discussing invasion, WMD's was sort of on the back burner as the US went to the UN and pathetically begged for approval. &gt;There are a lot of folks that violate international agreements Yep, you're right.  But these agreements had much to do with limiting the war machine of Hussein.  His treaty with the US and UN after the first gulf war mandated weapons inspectors.  During that war he started flinging scud missiles into Tel Aviv, and the world wanted to make sure he didn't do that again.  He kicked the inspectors out; that alone to me is justification for the removal of his regime.  Clinton bombed the hell out of him but to no avail.   Beside this, it is plain knowledge that Saddam did have weapons of mass destruction in the past (he used them on the kurds).  There is no reason to believe that he wouldn't have developed them in the future without UN inspection. &gt;I'd point out that WP places the number of civilians killed in the American Civil War at about 350,000  Yeah.  War is bloody.  It sucks.  But we can't draw conclusions based on extremes--either that 'any amount of casualties is acceptable for the right cause' or that 'no amount of human life is worth an ideal'.  It's a spectrum.  WWII cost 50 million lives worldwide, about 3/4 of which were spent fighting back the Nazi powerhouse.  Despite all these casualties, I think most people agree that it was "worth it". Vietnam, on the other hand, cost us only 58,000 (I say 'only' in comparison to WWII) but probably most people in this country would say that it was indeed not "worth it".  The differences and complexities in these two wars created a situation where warfare for similar causes was either embraced or rejected by the American people. I seriously believe that the justification of the Iraq war in the eyes of the American people and the administration is not limited to oil, WMD's, UN Sanction Violations, freedom, or any other constitutional ideal.  The best thing we can do now is sit back, wait for History to run its course, and try not to jump to conclusions.  We cannot know that this war will go down in history as a "bad decision" or a "failure" as much as we can't know whether the Iraqis will thank us in 10 years.  The "justification" from a Historical perspective will no doubt be subject to the outcome.
How would they know that the system issued 17 tickets?
but that's not what the person I replied to was suggesting: &gt;He is most likely there to make sure that the "majority" experience is all good. That things mostly do get cleaned up if you request you passengers to help -- that way you can save a lot of money not have a cleaning crew pickup at the end of each flight.
More evidence that porn is good for you.
That would be scientology. Now pony up the cash for OTIII...
I don't think GWB has even read the constution, otherwise he'd stop wiping his ass with it every day.
No joke, that's what I do if a friend of mine puts up something on his site about me that I don't like. Bandwidth isn't free, he discovers.. Creating scripts to make a thousand user accounts, creating complexity attacks that make the server melt.. There are two sides to this slander game.
It has been a few days since I last read this thread. The reason I came here was to post (and thus make atheist read within 8 seconds, since his ego is part of an important war here, only for him of course) the following. Ever wondered why so many people support PG in this thread? Or why your posts get -xx ratings?  It is not because me, or other people, try to suck up to him. There is no advantage of doing so whatsoever.  The reason is, because we have the same discussions with people in our lives. We try to explain similar things. Opinions that are hard to prove, as any opinion is when confronted with doubt, and more importantly, prejudice. We get similar reactions, like the ones you show to him. This is why we choose a side in this discussion, not because we want to move to PG's side, but because we were in the same side in the first place. It may be hard to understand what I mean, or hard to realize if what I claim is possible, but there is no doubt in my mind that I am correct, for myself, and for many other people. So you can keep typing very stupid things, those are the same stupid things we hear almost everyday, from people who are not our friends.
What exactly did you prove?  Try to think outside the normal liberal box:  "privatization" doesn't automatically mean "greedy corporations take all at the expense of the 'masses'".  The privatization of the Iraqi oilfields could actually benefit the country.  GASP!  I do have to congratulate Cheney; until him the VP was always regarded as a worthless manequin waiting for the president's death.  Somehow he's managed to be viewed as wanting to--and capable of--taking over the world. Secondly, I'd venture to say that if we did want control of the oilfields, we'd have taken it.  We were perfectly capable of doing so. So how did your response prove that the war was 'all about oil'?
modded up for not deleting your previous post.
When a friend of mine was planning on learning to fly, she found that learning to fly a helicopter was *way* more expensive than learning to fly an aeroplane. Don't forget to factor in the cost of getting a license.
We have a similar problem here in California, where photographs are taken of people running red lights. Now, running red lights is a serious problem.  Even moreso, in my opinion, than speeding.  However, these things must be seen for what they are: revenue generation. The real goal is not to "catch" people running red lights, it's to reduce accidents.  It's been shown that a more effective way to handle red-light-runners is to increase the yellow light time, or the time between when the red light comes on and the green light for opposing traffic comes on. Instead of doing this, my city just contracts the whole process out to a for-profit company.  There's no actual incentive to reduce the number of people trying to "beat" they yellow light, as both the contractor and the city stand to make a lot of money. Furthermore, as suggested by mikepurvis, there's no distinction between the unlucky guy who caught the tail-end of a yellow light and a drunk guy who barreled through the intersection 30 seconds after his light turned red. Automated ticketing systems have their place, but let's not kid ourselves that they are necessarially making us safer.
Whenever I've posted an Al-Jazeera article it has been modded down immediately. I suspected because of the source, not the content.  Maybe I was wrong?
Have you looked at the NSFW subreddit lately? If the link has any tastefulness then it can go here.
hmm... so the stuff on the Onion or Private Eye are hoaxes because they are in newspaper article format?
Yes.  Beware of me.  I think every country in the world should be a democracy with a capitalism-based economy.  I really, really do.  I think that Fascism and Dictatorship are wrong and should be combatted against using diplomacy, economics, and, as a last-resort, brute military strength.  Use this against me if you want to. 
Anyone who thinks "yes" is an absolute idiot. It's not spam, go look it up.
Oh. I thought that was the name of their next movie.
&gt;It might be ok for Kansas or other sparse areas. But it's not very useful in areas like that- not when a VariEze cruises at 180mph.
Ultralight aircraft don't require a license. If that thing doesn't qualify, it certainly could without a lot of modification.
Linkjacking is the practice of putting an entry on your own blog that's just short summary and/or quote and a link to the original source (like a Slashdot story), then posting it to reddit.
aljazeera is a great source with a lot of journalistic integrity.  id trust them over cnn or fox news any day.
Explain to me, Robywar, how GWB has 'wiped his ass' with the constitution.   I'd appreciate if no one helped him out on this one ;)
I have pointed people to articles on Al-Jazeera and they have responded with disdain/disrespect for the news source rather than the content. I think people do have a bias against A-J, including the current administration.
You got it just right;  I am suspicious of anyone who is delusional,  hear voices in their heads, talk to imaginary friends, and do not seek treatment or other form of professional help (I don't mind those who are at least aware of having a problem and are dealing with it);  and to adult activities these people shouldn't be doing without adult supervision, or shouldn't be doing at all, voting would indeed be on the top of the list alongside with running for office,  but I would also add breeding,  or having anything to do with kids education, operating heavy machinery, etc. ...and yes,  I am aware this concerns an awful lot of people unfortunately. That said,  I am glad to answer your question and satisfy your curiosity.
The "your parents prefer to believe in magic" is off-base.  Creationists do purport that the world was created via "magic", but this does not eliminate the necessity or the credibility of science.  There is plenty of science involved in "creationism".  Check out the [ICR](www.icr.org) or the [Creation Reseaerch Society](www.creationresearch.org). As far as the whole sex-ed debate is concerned, there's a fine line between "educating" and "promoting".  Sure, educate the kids.  Tell them what they risk by becoming sexually active outside the confines of a committed marriage.  Go ahead, even tell them how they can prevent reprocussions.  That's not promotion.  Putting condoms in the bathrooms, however, is.  Before you jump all over me, know that I'm just using the same logic that "liberals" in California used to justify the banning of Soda and candy from school vending machines.
More evidence of the crimes of the bush administration.
If I *really* loved women then I would keep myself as far away from them as possible;)
they really do need a comprehensive list of subreddits, not just subreddits that have recently had a story added or whatever the algorithm is.
Wish there was a way on reddit to find links that were funny. Sometimes I just want to go back and look at all the funny stuff but there isn't really a way.. And no, tagging is not the answer.
&gt;here is why I discount beliefs such as atheism, they have no logical adequate basis for morality, or love or imagination or inference to name a few. Just because you're a psychopath whose inherent indecency is only kept in check because of an absurd fear of eternal punishment by an invisible man in the sky, don't project that inanity onto the rest of us.
He *patented* it? What's to patent? Also, how does it deal with spin? Regular helicopters have a tail rotor, this one doesn't. I wonder why it doesn't spin out?
You can teach "intelligent design" without promoting the judeo-christian god.  However, the anger of "fundies" is not directed at the fact that they don't teach the kids to "worship your LORD(!)", but that they teach evolution as if it's a bonifide fact and we've proven that this is indeed how we came to be.  Originally in Kansas, they pushed to simply insert a sticker in biology books that pointed out that evolution was simply a theory, but the ACLU jumped on them.  So they came back swinging.  Biology can be taught without mentioning either theory; like jward pointed out below, evolution is usually a single chapter in a huge general biology book.  Dr. Kent Hovind (an assailant on evolution who actually testified in one of the Kansas court cases) taught highschool biology for 10 years and never had to include evolution. I really don't think that teaching evolution as an unproven theory would detract from the "richness" of the public-school educational experience.
The facts are against you, as is your lacking mental prowess. Try again another day...
Hmmm, there is an actual incentive to reduce the number of people trying to "beat" the yellow light.  Tickets every time they run a red.  The incentive isn't on the company, it's on the consumer.  The electronics simply mean that instead of a 0.5% chance of being caught by a cop, you now have a 99.5% chance of being caught by a camera. Now, without proper incentives/controls on the company making the devices, they might detect people who are not running red lights, but assuming that part is working right, then the only real way to get a ticket from the things is to run a red light. I think if you adjust the times, people will mostly just realize that they can get by with running a light that is even more red than usual. It would not be hard to make a distinction, make the fines a function of the difference in time between when the light turns red and when you run it.
They are biased. They are open about it. Isnt that a good thing? They dont claim to be fair and balanced, they openly say they are there to counter the talking points that the conservative pundits repeat.
Perhaps one should be required to put [hoax] in the title of the article.  Perhaps the article should display a title voted on by users :D
If they gave all the money to charities supporting the victims of car accidents (and cute puppies), would motorists still complain? Yes.
&gt; speed *itself* is not a dangerous thing Well, I understand what you mean, in that a swinging demolition ball isn't *itself* a dangerous thing. Without pedestrians and other drivers everywhere, that massive weight flying through the air would be harmless. No problems there. But to what cause you would attribute the difference in injuries between pedestrians hit at 30mph and those hit at 50mph? If not *speed*, I mean. Let's just assume that the most skilled driver in the world is driving when they hit the pedestrians.
No, it isn't a conspiracy theory. Because for that, you need a quiet secret campaign. The oil companies haven't even tried to be secret about at least some of their campaigns against energy conservation and green generation... Sigh. There was a recent posting of some oil industry videos that totally distorted evidence about global climate change. Typical example of 'we don't need green energy,. nothing is wrong, continue driving large vehicles please...' 
Very Funny
You know, you have a point. He was being a bit snide. Of course, you seem to have missed the point of the article - that many Christians believe that atheists are incapable of moral judgement. And feel obligated to persecute those that don't fit their religion. And tell everybody about it 24/7. And have actively worked to break the seperation of church and state in America. And... and... and... Isn't there something in the bible about throwing stones? Where I sit, it looks like martoo fired a pea shooter back against a deluge of boulders. And for the record, I'd rather have a few snide comments from someone who feels that they are ultimately responsible for their moral behavior than moral judgement from those who only act properly because they fear eternal punishment. Who is moral - the person who is moral because they believe it is right, or the person who is looking over their shoulder at the 'guards' and behaving. How about 'we let you vote' and in return the Christian right can stop preaching hatred, exclusion, antiscientific values, interfering with the state, opposing education, opposing research on std's because 'those people deserve what they get' and so on... Note that I'm not saying 'you.' I have no idea whether you are religious or not. 
Technically were helping Palestine commit war crimes too. By supplying aid to the palestinian people we are in effect freeing up the goverments budget to do other not so nice things. While Israel is absolutely retarded to pull these kind of stunts it would be political suicide not to strike back. Imagine Mexico capturing a border patrol guard and holding him hostage, and the current leadership in the USA not doing anything about it. The current Hamas Govt has direct power over the groups holding Shalit, and could easily secure his release. I would most certainly agree holding Corporal Shalit hostage during war is fair game, but if that is the case then the Palestine Authority needs to openly pass a declaration of war. You cant engage in warfare and claim you are not at war. The same goes for Israel. Personally i think Israel and Palestine should just make it official already, declare total war on each other, and let the whole lot of them go at it. That way the rest of the world can just stop getting involved. It should be obvious by now i support Israel, but should Palestine win the war then so be it. I think Palestine has a pretty good chance of winning if they execute a good enough strategy. The Palestinian Territories are already flooded with weapons. A simple blitzkreig from all directions would completely catch Israel off guard, and then the fight would be in Israeli cities which is where they need to be to effectively nullify air superiority.
I'm sure some motorists complain just because speed cameras "aren't fair," and they want to speed. However, this doesn't mean that all arguments against speed cameras are foolish. For example, if traffic cameras really were supposed to make people safer, they would first flash signs warning drivers to slow down instead of silently issuing tickets.
Good stuff.  This is a good look at the "other side".
Horrible Article
Like it was said in Fight Club "We've all been raised on television to believe that one day we'd all be millionaires, and movie gods, and rock stars. But we won't. And we're slowly learning that fact. And we're very, very pissed off."
Your grasp of what constitutes a "scientific theory" is tenuous at best, it seems.  Evolution is not some sort of baseless hypothesis.  There are volumes of evidence to support it.  As I am sure has been pointed out a thousand times before, *gravity* is a theory. In fact, we may have a better grasp on evolution than we do on gravity... since we can make our gravitational computations work on neither the quantum nor the cosmological level.   &gt;You can teach "intelligent design" without promoting the judeo-christian god. Sure!  Teach them that the One Mind continually asserts its will on the One Thing, and that creation is thus manifested continually.  The alchemists, many founding fathers, Masons, many ancient Egyptians, and all the Hermetic Orders believe it. The point is... yes, intelligent design can be taught, but WHICH intelligent design would they like taught?  There are different ones, after all.  Oh, and none of them have any shred of empirical evidence to support them.  Beliefs of this kind are a personal, not educational issue. Intelligent design is not science, and evolution is not just speculation.  This... I should mention, is coming from a Kansan.  
I will agree with you that it is very possible and even healthy to believe in magic whilst relying on science.  However, there is no science involved in creationism, because there is no way to test the hypothesis of a creator.  I somewhat agree with your comment about condom machines in bathrooms, however I think the sexual drive is a bit more universal than the soda impulse. 
On a congested expressway going the speed limit can actually be more dangerous than speeding if the majority of drivers are speeding.
If you read her interview with FishBowlNY it sounds like she barely finished high school.  I am sure her book (and life story) is utter crap.
Seems like a new spin on robot wars.
&gt; The team speculates that ejaculation prevents carcinogens building up in the gland. great.  so i have lowered my prostate cancer risk but increased my girlfriend's  mouth cancer risk! 
I'm so glad I'm not an Atheist anymore! I used to be one of 'them', but through very hard work on my part and the love and support of my family and friends I've started to believe in the lord! I'm a very devout Pastafarian now. I give the church  20% of my income, so I will be forgiven for all my sins. To all those bad Atheists out there: don't be stupid, join the Pastafarian faith and you and your family will experience eternal happiness .
Starting your own religion is an excellent idea... as long as the only member is you.  Trouble arises when you decide it'd be a good idea to evangelize.
Does it matter in this case? Did being liberal or conservative somehow help them find the witnesses?
Hi Alexp,  This contraption is an autogyro. See google or wikipedia: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Autogyro. Autogyros are driven by a propeller, usually but not always at the back, that simply push forward. The main rotor is actually unpowered, so their is no need for a tail rotor to counteract the forces of a powered main rotor.  Autogyros have some great properties including relatively stable flight, pretty good gliding capabilties in the event of an engine failure, and very very slow landing speeds. I'm sure Wikipedia knows more, but these are certainly interesting vehicles to read up on...
Free speech protects you from the government censoring your speech, not from your employer. They can certainly restrict your dress as a condition of your job.
&gt; Israel threatens to assassinate the democratically-elected) Palestinian Prime Minister. Grand! That'll teach those stupid palestinians the value of democracy!
I don't think anyone would mistake The Onion for the truth.  It's not presented that way.  Lots of people are mistaking the above link for the truth, because it is presented that way.
We don't want kids to get fat from drinking pop all the time, but we know that kids get thirsty for sugar water, so we provide juice with the understanding that at least they're getting some nutrition, even if the best thing is to drink water. In the same way, we don't want our kids to get pregnant or infected, but we know that kids get horny, so we provide birth control and condoms with the understanding that at least they're getting some protection, even if the best thing is to not have sex. You want to think of condoms as soda, that they are the bad thing.  I want to think of condoms and birth control as juice, that they are the less bad thing.   The other argument you make is that providing condoms promotes sex.  I say that sex really doesn't need much promotion; at least, it never did for me.  I grew up in a church and household that preached abstinence, and my school never handed out condoms, but I still somehow ended up having sex outside the confines of a committed marriage.  You can't blame my parents, and you can't blame my school.  Strange how millions of years of evolution somehow trumps the best intentions of our parents and churches, isn't it?  But from your link, it looks like you don't believe in evolution, either...
I believe the point is that the most skilled driver in the world wouldn't have hit the pedestrians in the first place, thus making how fast he didn't hit them irrelevant.
And this you know?
**This headline is inaccurate**.  The Overseas Private Investment Corporation is not taxpayer-funded.  The payment will cost taxpayers nothing.
Ah. And we should do what about this?
My wife recently got ticketed for going 55 MPH in a 35 zone.  I won't argue that it was terribly unfair for her to get a ticket for that, however the circumstances were telling.  She got the ticket at a speed trap in an area with no pedestrian presence or intersections on a 4 lane road divided by a wide median with sparse but steady traffic.  I came to find out that 20 over the limit is reckless driving in our state (VA) except if the limit is 35 MPH, which I can only assume is because of such speed traps. Was she wrong for speeding?  Sure.  But here's a clue, the cop wasn't there to promote an important law that saves lives.  He was there to make money for the county by catching suckers that went a reasonable speed down this road
This seems like an intriguing idea taken way past the point of absurdity. Just because the English are inbred, there may well be Europeans (a designation that to the surprise of many include people living east of Germany and Italy) whose ancestors were hapless peasants through and through. And even if one ancestor of theirs was once a historically unknown tribal chieftain, it does not follow that they are also related to the prophet Mohammed.
Cool, I wish I could see them close up though.
&gt; That is, I think you really got his goat. So you are therefore worse. Actually no.  This is the Internet, if I have nothing to add to the discussion, I just don't say anything.  There's no sense getting upset over what somewhat says on the net.   Since I'm responding anyway, I'll explain what I meant by this: &gt;So... to "nostrademons", your writings are:  * distasteful   * valuable   * unconvincing I find several of pica's opinions distasteful - let's take [this one](http://reddit.com/info/94de/comments/c94kc), because it's at the top of your Reddit page.  Distasteful both because it's not the whole truth and because of the possible implications if people were to accept your views uncritically.  (I do think there's at least a grain of truth to much of what you say, but it overgeneralizes and ignores cases where, say, non-Jewish Americans have raped and murdered with impunity).  Are you *looking* for another holocaust? However, included in that post is a link to a BBC article that I haven't read before.  That's valuable.  pica in general makes a habit of backing his posts up with links and supporting evidence.  atheist does not, at least as far as I have seen. That doesn't mean I'm convinced.  I can find a dozen other news stories that feature summary executions by non-Jews.  I have several Jewish friends, and they have no interest in committing murder.  And I wouldn't classify the U.S./Israel relationship as being about bombing Arabs; more like money and massive amounts of foreign aid. So, that's why I think pica's posts are distasteful, unconvincing, and yet valuable.  I don't have a monopoly on absolute truth; however, that doesn't prevent me from holding views on what's right or wrong, based on what I *do* know.  IMHO, I think pica is wrong on many things he espouses here.  But that doesn't mean that all the supporting evidence he digs up is wrong.  There's such thing as weighing evidence and not being wedded to a side.
so what would be the difference between the iraqi regime and your usa regime? maybe you should just move to china, u'd be a lot 'safer'. btw are you just a troll trying to get people to argue or something? because you're wayyy too stupid to be living.
Aljazeera has more credibility than most news orgs in the world
&gt; evolution was simply a theory You keep using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means. &gt; I really don't think that teaching evolution as an unproven theory would detract from the "richness" of the public-school educational experience. But you've proven yourself a nitwit, here and in a million other comments. Your feelings don't count. You'll need a point.
Main theme is about starting a home based business
That's hot!
&gt;The point is... yes, intelligent design can be taught, but WHICH intelligent design would they like taught Intelligent design proliferates the idea that we did not evolve, but were designed.  It's as simple as that.  There would be no difference between Hindu "Intelligent Design" and Christian, because Intelligent Design isn't an argument over which god creatd us.  For all we know, Intelligent Design could support the idea that the Titans created earth.  So be it. &gt;Oh, and none of them have any shred of empirical evidence to support them. Some guy digs up a fossil.  He assumes that it's millions of years old and uses a highly inacurate process based on this and a number of other assumptions (carbon/radiometric dating) to "confirm" this.  He then places this fossile within a greater assumption that it evolved into its form over millions and millions of years. This process is far from [Empirical](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Empirical).  In fact, neither Intelligent Design nor Evolutionary Theory can be written off as "empirical" science.  They're both based on certain assumptions.  While the assumption that a god doesn't/never has interacted with earth might be friendly to so-called "scientific thinking", this conclusion isn't scientifically proveable.  You can't prove a god doesn't exist any more than I can prove he does.  The Intelligent Design crowd makes the assumption that some sort of all-powerful being, whether it be the judeo-christian god, Vishnu, Allah, or really cool aliens, did have its hand in the creation of earth.   In both schools, these assumptions add to the conclusions of our empiracal observations.  You see a turtle and say "this turtle is remarkably adapted to their micro-environment, and is very different than that turtle over there in that different environment." Then you conclude: "This must be because, starting from a group of random amino acids and a miraculous combination of gasses, heat, and electricity, a single celled, self-sustaining life form was created, and over the course of billions of years, that single-celled organism adapted its way into looking like something with four legs and a shell, and this four-legged, shelled organism radically changed to adapt to this environment. I might see that same turtle and say "this turtle is remarkably adapted to their micro-environment, and is very different than that turtle over there in that different environment.  He must have been designed to fit." or even better "Zeus must have been good to this animal, to give him such a neck as to let him reach these branches."  Any of these conclusions could be based on the empirical evidence gathered by observing the turtle.  Simplicity does not automatically entail "un-scientific", and neither theory would make a difference in trying to understand how the turtle lives, eats, and reproduces. &gt;As I am sure has been pointed out a thousand times before, gravity is a theory. Gravity is also empirically observed.  We can watch a ball fall from a window.  We can say "When I drop this ball, it will fall at this rate" with a large amount of certainty(even then, we cannot be %100 sure).  We have never observed one species evolve into another.  It isn't very scientific to say "this creature is an ancestor of man", because no man or anything closely resembling one has ever come from that creature.   &gt;There are volumes of evidence to support it. Please show me one empirically observed scientific finding that supports the idea of macro-evolution.  This is less a smart-ass challenge and more of an honest plea for you to find an example.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Toltec I guess that was in Mexico, but somehow I don't think everything was aces up here.
"...for the Timely Discovery of Relevant and Credible Information." Basically this study was researching the possibiltiy of data mining local and foreign blogs for "terrorist" (whatever that is) related information. However, as most 'professional terrorism' is state generated false-flag operations, it's unlikely that details would appear on blogs except purposely placed there to: 1. aid the operations or   2. disguise the perps or   3. funnel blame to a 'nominated terrorist organisation'  4. all the above
&gt;You keep using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means. [It's safe to say that theories aren't laws.](http://www.askoxford.com/concise_oed/theory?view=uk) &gt;you've proven yourself a nitwit, here and in a million other comments. Your feelings don't count.  Prove that I'm a nitwit...or do you just "feel" that way?  Either way,  &gt;You'll need a point.   
Doesn't Suzze Cute need a daddy too?
There is a big difference btw SW Engineering and Engineering. Try buiding a bridge when your client's requirements change every week. This article was probably written by an old school Software Engineering lecturer.
&gt;Intelligent design proliferates the idea that we did not evolve, but were designed. It's as simple as that. So, teaching intelligent design would amount to the science teacher saying, "We might have been created." and that's it? That doesn't seem like teaching at all. And I'd wager that anyone would consider that possibility regardless of what their public officials said.
Al Gore will be back. Trust me.
It's safe to say natural processes don't care what we call them, and go on all the same.  Anyways, are you trying to imply that if the exact same process were deemed "The Law of Evolution" you wouldn't have any problems with it?  Because if that's all it takes to get creationists to stfu...
I don't want to get into the habit of defending O'Reilly, but I almost have to.  And, I am not really defending O'Reilly except pointing out how bad this article is:  I didn't even get through most of it, the premise itself is bad. First; why attack the person or his individual statements?  Attack the O'Reilly show and things said on that show, makes your attack a little bit more reasonable.  This seems like an attack on the person.  Because; it makes it easier to say, "we did not take this statement out of context", for example.  Plus, of course he probably misstepped in his analysis of things; he has been on for 10 years.  Every weekday for 10 years and all you could come up with is a couple of phrases. I am posting because some people deserve to be attacked hard.  Ann Coulter HATES liberals; she thinks liberals are godless, she should be attacked.  O'Reilly is harmless. But then again, maybe it is time for the liberals to attack.  I dont hear much out of them.  (note: I am not a liberal or conservative, I could care less). 
Oooops...redundant now!
I see your points... they're all valid.  But lets think about "promoting sex" for a second.   If you're taking a piss, and you see a condom machine, you'll automatically think of having sex.  This is probably more powerful image than even the big, red Coca-Cola sign on the front of the vending machine.  All most advertisements do is get you to think about their product.  I'd venture to say that a condom machine is a very poigniant advertisement for sex.  And as natural as sex is in the human teenage mind, I venture to say that much of it is due to the overt sexualization of our culture.  All the media conglomerates get you to think about sex in order to sell their products.  Contrary to popular belief, it is possible for a teenage male mind to concentrate on other things. I think there is a compromise.  On my college campus there are no condom vending machines.  But if you walk into the Student Health building and ask for some, they'll give you a trash bag full, with lube and anal dams to boot!  We can provide means of birth control for Highschool students without making them a prominent issue on campus.
Peace be with you brother. What I tell those stupid atheists is to prove that there is no FSM! And guess what, none of them can do that because deep inside they know that FSM is real and they reject him out of spite. They are evil beings, all of them.
Whether we're pro or con, people might be more interested in our $2-3 billion annual foreign aid to Israel. (Not to mention the $1-2.5 billion annual aid to Egypt to keep them at peace with Israel.) (Here's the [Congressional Research Service's intro](http://www.fas.org/man/crs/98-916.pdf) to foreign funding, a [Jewish Virtual Library overview](http://www.jewishvirtuallibrary.org/jsource/US-Israel/foreign_aid.html) to Israel funding, and [Globalissues.org has a contextual overview](http://www.globalissues.org/TradeRelated/Debt/USAid.asp). Apparently there's [more subsidies](http://www.jewishvirtuallibrary.org/jsource/US-Israel/U.S._Assistance_to_Israel1.html) than this, but I don't have the time to pursue what's not technically considered "foreign aid".)
I'm just pointing out that they've named it "The THEORY of Evolution" for a reason, that's all. &gt;Because if that's all it takes to get creationists to stfu... Why do you want us to stfu so badly?  I just wanna live in peace with evolutionists.  I see the basis for your beliefs, given your assumptions.  I only ask for the same acceptance.
You know what I tell all those righteous Christians who challenge the source of my morals? "If the only thing stopping you from raping and killing and stealing is the wrath of your imaginary diety then I insist you just keep on believing, buddy."
I think Palestine doesn't really have an obligation to declare war unless their government forces attack Israel's soldiers or citizens. The U.S. doesn't declare war on Canada when a U.S. citizen murders someone while in Canada (or some Canadian citizen in the U.S.).  Israel on the other hand really should declare war or stop the aggression since they have full government control over the aggression and could stop it completely if they wanted too (I am not necessarily saying this would be a good idea from their point of view, just that they could).
And since they seem to do some kind of fact checking for the media they watch it probably reduces the amount of work a lot to concentrate on one political group as they are likely to quote the same "facts" around the same time.  Sure it would be nice to have some fact checking service for all of the media but that would probably be a lot more work, not to mention the fact that we would then get all our "facts" from one source again.
It's OK.  No ants were harmed in the making of this structure.
&gt; Date: Sun, Aug 25 1991 5:57 pm The time is approaching for a birthday party. Happy fifteen, Linux!
I wonder though, do we advocate countries attacking US soil when we hold their military men or citizens? During his talk at the US Military Academy at West Point, Noam Chomsky [raised an interesting point](http://www.booktv.org/ram/feature/0506/btv052706_4.ram) while critiquing "just war theory": would other nations be justified in carrying out terrorist attacks against the US in response to our own attacks and threats? Or do we refuse to hold ourselves to the same standards that we demand others follow? [Note: that link is to a RealMedia file; unfortunately, that's CSPAN's format.]
You don't have to teach either.  American schools used to teach about christianity.  Now they teach about all religions.  Is it so hard to think that we might teach different origin theories?   And no, "we might have been created" wouldn't satisfy a lesson plan.  Luckily, there's a whole slough of theory behind Intelligent Design.  Seriously, check out the two websites I linked in my comment below if you want to see what creationsits purport.  I try to keep an open mind when I read evolutionary theory and all the other "liberal" hype posted on this site... I ask you to do the same. On a different note, what should a teacher teach?  What would be better to tell a highschooler? "You are the product of a huge cosmic accident.  The universe is spinning wildly out of control and eventually it will cease to be (according to Stephen Hawking).  Nothing you can do or say will change the fact that your body will expire and all that is you will be gone.  Don't worry, it's been going on like this for a long time." or "You were created for a reason and a purpose.  Now go out there and find it." I know that evolution and religion aren't inseparable, I'm just grabbing at the essence of the two belief systems.
The difference being this:  Government actually exists. We can argue all day about whether or not we need it.  But you have to admit it's actually THERE.
[Talk origins](http://www.talkorigins.org/faqs/faq-speciation.html) has a page on speciation. 
No. Many historians call it a cold war as  a descriptive term to show that it could have easily become a full scale REAL war. Only demented historians would call it a real war.   The US already won the cold war against Iraq. Iraq had no real weapons at all, no medical supplies and not enough food.
Maybe you should read up on why [slippery slope](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Slippery_slope) arguments are usually fallacious. Also, what specifically is wrong with speed cameras, aside from them forcing you to do the speed limit?
Seems like bad people are multiplying at least in USA. According to [American Religious Identification Survey](http://www.gc.cuny.edu/faculty/research_briefs/aris/key_findings.htm) *"the greatest increase in absolute as well as in percentage terms has been among those adults who do not subscribe to any religious identification; their number has more than doubled from 14.3 million in 1990 to 29.4 million in 2001"* and religious people want to attack this "problem". Granted, lack of religious identification is not the same as atheism but it's a step towards atheism.
I want you to recall one basic of the international law, it is called "self determination" every country decides for itself, the people of every country are self governed. This law of course has limits, limits set by the UN. The other limit is set if a country attacks another country, which should easily show you the difference to WW II. If you break the rules of self determination you break the basics of international trust, you attack the fundamentals of every treaty. Treaties like the Geneva Convention. Those treaties had a reason the werde drafted to enforce rules in war, because people realized that war would always come back an it would be nice to have some rules at all.   I know it doesn't really interest you, but you can't enforce democracy, there is no example where this worked. And please don't tell me about germany, to compare a totally destroyed western country, that had only 10 years of dictatorship with a middle eastern country like Iraq is just stupid.
one example where "democracy through military strenght" worked ?
Do you have a copy of those meeting minutes when the almighty they convened and decided that the term 'theory' should be taken to mean 'evolution might not be happening'?   Get off the 'it's just a theory' argument already.  Seriously.  It is ridiculously stupid, and the only people to whom you don't immediately reveal yourself as an idiot upon its use are those who are equally as idiotic.  I know you want to pretend like you're being civil here, but the claim that it is somehow significant that "evolution is just a theory" is as offensive to me as the phrase "you are an idiot douchebag" is to you.
and 150.000 Iraqis will be dead, 150.000 Iraqis that may well be alive or live in a real democracy 5 years later, when the Iraqis freed themselves like so many countries did in the last twenty years. Will you stand at their graves ? Will you be a man of honor and pat their childrens head ? Is all that worth it if it is just a try ? Will you stand at the graves of the american soldiers that died, soldiers who didn't volunteer for this. Soldiers who enlisted in the National Guard who wanted to protect at home. Soldiers of minority background, poor people wth not other chance.  You have more courage than me, I'm a libertarian I want to make my own decisions, but I don't want to force other to live or die by my decisions.
&gt; My toilet paper makes better reading material. Really?  I'm pretty sure it's shitty compared to the Al-Jazeera article.
Actually it does. When Slashdot and Digg achieved the same rating on Alexa, A Digg story linked to Alexa to celebrate the fact. His theory is that this link caused many Digg users to go to the Alexa website and download their toolbar, which increased the number of techie-types Alexa monitored. This increased monitoring of techies made the Alexa rating for all techie sites increase, including Reddit.
If I take a piss, I see my penis.  What does that make me think of?
Science as pep talk.  Interesting.
&gt; civilian contractors being beheaded. That was never broadcast on Al-Jazeera.
Why was this promoted to the front page? Can't we find something better to argue about?
In view of the topic of this thread, popurls is truly evil.  I closed the page and am trying to erase it from my memory.
&gt; I usually encode to Apple's Quicktime format, however, Apple now requires that you to install i-tunes along with QT so I have moved back to encoding for avi and played back on the generic windows media player.  **That is too bad because QT really is a superior media player.** umm..
Me too.
The question isn't whether AlJazeera is biased or not.  It's whether it presents a point-of-view not available elsewhere in the MSM. Ten or eleven more news organizations like AlJazeera and we might actually achieve some balance with regards to how the Israeli-Palestinian polka is covered. It might even lead to peace in the region, if you really think about it.
If I have to pick sides, I'll go with Israel over Hamas any day of the week. 
An important video, these guys are troops who have actually gotten out of the whole stop loss madness 
Palestine declare war? All they got are sticks and stones. Come one people, wake the fuck up.
percept, I hate you.
Pics of Tori Spelling caught in a tiny  bikini.
how do you know?  did you try it?
Slashdot posts are often re-posted on reddit.  So I'd have to say my experience has been otherwise.  Also it really does not matter whether it's old or new, just as long as it's interesting.  Slashdot is still interesting and the discussions tend to be more enlightened (once you set your filters appropriately).  I still visit Slashdot regularly.
If the Palestinians had nuclear weapons and tanks and fighter planes, and the Israelis only had guns and grenades, the Israelis would be behaving like the Palestinians do now.
Frameworks are fundamentally anti-PHP, I think. I make my living writing PHP right now, and its greatest joy -- the only joy maybe -- of PHP is its simple execution model, its close-to-the-metal relationship with the webserver, filesystem, and database. The file equals the page equals the request equals the controller logic. The language itself is certainly not beautiful, but I find a lot of beauty in simple, effective solutions, and that's what PHP is. It's fun. Rails is fun in a lot of different ways, I think. It hits a broad sweet spot very well (even if it does seem to punish you somewhat for apps dwelling outside that sweet spot) and I especially appreciate the beauty of Ruby, my new favorite language. But none of the PHP frameworks feel the least bit fun to me. They require you to work in an unbeautiful language and abstract away the best thing about it -- the execution model. Blech.
atheist are not bad people in fact.. you judge people too harshly for they have done nothing wrong to you, theist people. I dont mind if you are in religion or not, but leave those people alone please. I am atheist, I love my family, i respect people's way, I have done nothing wrong and yet you accuse us of wrongdoing? The reason why I am atheist because I believe in my motto: "If you have faith in your god, then you don't knowledge your your own abilities that you have improves yourself. Have faith in your abilites and you shall ascend upon ladder with hardwork. There is no shortcut at all." To be honest, with you(with no offend) i thought people join religion is to get friends easily. I rather hard way myself. :D Oh well, that depend on people's opinion. That probably why it explains alot about george washington and his succession in america(in fact, he is not any religions... at least i think). Now that would be funny if You accuse george washington of being bad person because he dont pray in any one of religion. :D Please correct me because I just know little about George washington's personal life anyway. P.S. It just that i dont like have blindly faith in something.. I just want to have faith(with my abilities) that I am able to do something than to someone invisible.
No, it's not.  And that attitude is why they get away with as much as they do. Boycott Wal-Mart.
Pam Anderson is just a whore. I fully support animal rights and all that stuff, but she is just taking an opportunity to be a slut. If she really cared then she would donate money.
they are so cute together. justing is better off with cameron than with britney. britney's just a trailer trash whore
Probably not. Judaism has an extremely low opinion of martyrdom and suicide. The dynamic would be quite different.
Well, she *is* hot. It's interesting that she's managed to maintain good physical fitness, though, when it sounds like her diet is mostly dollar-menu junk food. Also, it's pretty funny to make such a big deal about her height; Kristen Bell is only 5'1", and she's one of most talented actresses on television today. (of course, being 5'1" probably means she'll spend most of her career playing teenages...) Edit: It seems Rachel Bilson is around that 5'2" mark, as well.
Pics of Tori Spelling caught in a tiny  bikini.
Now?
$125,000 with a $32,000 bonus for a moron 63-yo sysadmin?  I'm taking the wrong jobs I guess.  What the heck kind of guy sabotages his life and career like that, so near retirement?   
Hmm, I really misunderstood that title.  I thought the book was *about* the computers in an Apple store.
Yikes, reddit-nomic.
Why the heck does a 4 lane road with a wide median and no pedestrian traffic have a speed limit of 35?  The limit is 45 on most state highways in Massachusetts (2 lanes total, undivided, stop signs &amp; traffic lights, and lots of curves and hills).  Some go up to 50 (eg. Routes 2 &amp; 202 in western Mass, Rt. 9 by Framingham...though that has a big concrete divider and 4-5 lanes).
Why you gotta hate? A perhaps more rational interpretation is that Media Matters for America, being a partisan liberal organization, has only been doing monitoring, analyzing, or correcting of misinformation of conservatives. This is exactly why this award doesn't have the significance it would have if it were handed out by someone like FactCheck.org.
The prime minister of Palestine is also a high ranking member of Hamas. Hamas has been responsible for suicide attacks and has been linked to the recent kidnapping. Whether or not he was elected is meaningless, he deserves a couple grams of lead . Right between the eyes.
&gt; don't yet have the luxury of spending time/effort challenging scientists based on religious faiths! [Not true for Buddhism](http://www.seedmagazine.com/news/2005/10/what_buddhism_offers_science.php)
Socialism (N)
In fact, it'd be really interesting to see just what sites spiked at that time.  By comparing the relative jump in late April, you can compute what percentage of Digg users visit another site.  We'd probably find that the Digg/Reddit/Slashdot/Wired communities are heavily inbred and basically draw from the same pool of users.
&gt; Why do motorists have such a persecuted attitude about speed cameras. Can you imagine if this article was about some theives tricking a policeman. I think it is precisely **because** a speed camera is *not* a policeman.  It has no discretion.  It doesn't let off the man who is getting his pregnant wife to the hospiutal.  It doesn't let you off with a warning because you have an otherwise clean record.  It can't notice that you just got cut off by someone going *much* faster.   And on a more subtle level, it is worrisome because as a "law enforcement" effort, it scales far better than actual human policemen do.  It makes a larger police state much more practical.  Cops are my friends, but I don't really want to live in a place where we feel we need to have one on **every** corner.   
The way it works is that when people read a story they like, they click the little up arrow.  Apparently a lot of people enjoyed this cartoon.  When a lot of people click the up arrow, the story moves to the front page.  There's no way to direct all readers of reddit to vote a particular way to keep things you don't like off the front page, especially when they have already voted.  But you can always hide things you don't want to see.
&gt;I try to keep an open mind when I read evolutionary theory and all the other "liberal" hype posted on this site. Judging from your username and comment history, I can say this is categorically false.
And most drivers think of themselves as above average.
A post about the opportunity of doing "one more thing" in sales.
Great reference, but I think few people got it. :)
&gt; All kinds of things could be responsible for the measured increase in mental health problems: Add to your list is the fact that we're raising children in a different society.  **Not** necessarily a *worse* society, but definitely a *different* one. Once you realize that there is no One True Way to raise children, and that society has totally changed the role and meaning of childhood in just about every generation, the more you realize "this too shall pass." 
OTOH, speeding will *always* make it more likely that you're killed if your car does crash.  Most modern cars do a pretty good job of protecting the occupants if you crash at 55, as long as you're wearing your seatbelt.  Crash at 80, and all bets are off. Killing yourself is a victimless crime, but as you said, the chance of an accident goes up based on speed *differences* rather than absolute speeds.  So if traffic is going at 80, it's forcing the 55mph driver to take on risk he wouldn't otherwise want to: either he drives 55 and runs a higher risk of getting into an accident, or he drives 80 and runs a higher risk of getting killed in an accident.
Why do I even bother?! I mean, really, when I see it's a link from waiterrant why do I even click it?! So angry at myself for wasting those precious two minutes of my life that I will never get back.
I call Photoshop! Just kidding. It was cool.
You are angry with yourself for wasting two minutes and yet read and comment on reddit?
Oil may fuel the conflict, eh?  Sounds plausible; I guess they haven't got tanks running on fuel cells yet.
&gt; Maybe its Firefox's PNG renderer but that looks terrible here. Any chance you are yet to discover that when you click on the resized .png it gets displayed in its original size?
Please.  Prove to me that we evolved from monkeys.  Once you do, you'll convince me.  I'll let the scientific community know and they'll change it to The Law of Evolution.  A theory, by nature, does not constitute fact or truth.  It is simply a construction of an explaination.  Please don't try to equate the "theoy of evolution" wih the theory of gravity.  One can be observed, the other cannot.
It was gwenhwyfaer: http://reddit.com/info/63sp/comments/c06505
My bad.  I just used the word "vishnu" as an embellishment of my argument.  I don't profess to know the depths of Hinduism.  Sorry if it offended you.
hmmm... ya got me there.  I guess I do sorta come in with fists swinging... but I do make a point to read what people say and hear them out.  I intend to discuss, not lecture.
&gt; &gt;   Another study, published by Business Week, found that in 1978 23% of adult men whose fathers were in the bottom quartile made it into the top quartile. I'm trying to wrap my brain around this.  Let's round 23% to 25% just for simplicity. Now, one-fourth of the top quartile is made up of people whose fathers were in the bottom quartile.  The most reasonable follow-up to this is that the other three quartiles each contributed one-fourth to the final. This matches exactly the pattern of a random rearrangement. It's the same thing you see when you look at large mutual fund performance, which lots of economists believe cannot reliably beat the market are in effect just random. I just can't believe that individual economic performance is completely random.  (Don't get me wrong, there are significant elements of luck involved in business success.  The smart businessman can increase his odds, but the foolish person in the right place at the right time can sometimes make out better than the careful and deliberate planner.) It would mean that, in 1978, there were *no* special skills that the rich could pass onto their children.  Nothing rubbed off at all on their children: not the best education they could buy, any concept of a work ethic, a family fortune or family business.  Further, that there was nothing genetic at work.  (I don't mean to say that some people have genes that make them rich/poor, but in the eternal debate of nature-versus-nurture most complex behaviors are found to come about half from each.  A violation of that won't be found by economists or even (*especially*) by politicians.) I think there must be some kind of skew in the data.  Adult men in 1978 were born from roughly 1908 to 1958, and their fathers from 1860 to 1940.  We've got two World Wars in there, as well as the entire trip from the end of slavery to the civil rights movement.  There's all sorts of big demographic shifts in there. I can't find the original 1978 study (although Google turns up lots of people referring to it without name).  So maybe the numbers aren't being represented accurately.  Can anyone find that?  I'd like to see what they specifically tried to control for, if anything.   
You have three dimensions to work with instead of basically one in the case of auto travel on roads.  So I disagree about the bloodbath.
&gt; why attack the person or his individual statements? O'reilly is a liar, on and off the show.  Not all those statements are from the Factor. &gt; Every weekday for 10 years and all you could come up with is a couple of phrases. Every one of those is between 4/2004 and 11/2004.  And those are just the explicit ones, he's always making untrue implications without quite stating the actual slander. &gt; O'Reilly is harmless He might not be as evil as Coulter, but he certainly isn't "harmless."
Be astounded.  I live.
&gt;"You are the product of a huge cosmic accident. The universe is spinning wildly out of control and eventually it will cease to be (according to Stephen Hawking). Nothing you can do or say will change the fact that your body will expire and all that is you will be gone. Don't worry, it's been going on like this for a long time."  &gt;  &gt;or  &gt;  &gt;"You were created for a reason and a purpose. Now go out there and find it." Sounds like you're looking for comfort instead of truth.
The Iraqis tried to free themselves but were suppressed by Saddam's brutal regime.  You must understand, Hussein was the worst type of dictator.  He got all his profits from oil.  He doesn't need anyone to like him.  He doesn't need taxes and he hardly needs a working class.  The only way to end this type of rule is to cut the head off, something that would have cost a home-grown uprising far more than 30,000 casualties.   
&gt; Please enlighten me as to the freedoms you have lost.  Oh, it's just the little things.. the things that make us [far less free than we suppose we are](http://www.afterdowningstreet.org/node/12648).  There's that, and "free speech zones".. the list goes on.  Seems that we have many freedoms in principle which are impossible to exercise practically.  Just look at how the 1st, 2nd, 4th, 5th, and 9th amendments have been eroded.  Sure, the Patriot Act has made it worse, but this has been a long term thing.   &gt; Its funny. I say we're at war with terrorism, and liberals tell me to "stop living in fear!!!", but you're the ones that are sooooo oppressed by the patriot act. Talking to you people one would think that all americans have been handcuffed and fitted with homing-anklets. I don't look over my shoulder, I'm not afraid that the government is 'out to get me'. Who is living in fear? Well the difference is, we understand precedent and we've read history.  Abused power can be used wisely but, having been abused once, it sets the stage for further abuses.   The current administration is currently in the process of destroying the checks and balances of our government.  They are working very hard to make themselves answerable to no one, and to put anything related to terrorism outside the reach of the courts.  The fact is, checks and balances is an underlying principle of our government.  Anyone who doesn't understand that, and understand that it is the one of the things that makes us different, is not worthy of a leadership position.
&gt; One can be observed, the other cannot. See, you're a nitwit. Evolution is observed all the time. You'll say that you don't like the evolution we've observed, for some reason. Whatever. I don't care.
when you can prove that evolution is the "truth", i'll believe in it. Personally, I've been a christian for far longer than I've been a creationist.  My father is a marine biologist; he wrote his master's thesis on the theoretical 'missing link'(although he too is beginning to question the theory).  I grew up with an evolutionist father and a creationist mother.  I myself have only been a creationist for about a year.  The change came when I sat down and looked at both systems and the "science" they both use to back themselves up.  In the end, creationism made more sense; there were simply too many inconsistencies in Evolutionary theory.
Thank you for pointing out the intricacies of reddit to me. What I was actually looking for was an explanation as to why the cartoon merited so many up votes. Maybe you can point out something I missed so that I can join the masses in their collective enjoyment of the cartoon strip.
*blinks* now I'm curious.. I understand that Atheisim and Agnosticisim do not really inherently contradict Buddhism, but Hinduism? I thought the basic thing with that is that it was, technically, monotheistic with god having lots of faces/aspects? or something like that? Anyways, I'm really curious now, so please explain.
&gt; It's funny that you guys are saying that the Iraqis would be better off in government that is similar to the "dictatorship" that many liberals accuse Bush of trying to establish in America.  I'm not "those guys", whoever they are.  Liberating Iraq from Saddam is a decent thing to do, in principle, but so is dealing with turmoil in Africa, freedom in China, freedom in N. Korea and elsewhere.  If the rationale is to "do good" (and that is the rationale that war supporters are falling back on now because all others have failed) then we have a lot of good work to do around the world in front of us. The problem is that the administration bungled this one on nearly every possible level.  And, it is particularly galling to hear people who wouldn't dream of stepping in and helping Rwanda ten years ago for instance, imply that the sole measure for intervention is whether it helps people.   What it means is that they aren't thinking, they are brainwashed and reflexively quoting the party line.
Great argument you've made here.  Let me educate you on the idea of evolution.  There are several types.  Micro evolution happens all the time.  That's what happens when a virus mutates into a new form.  I believe in micro-evolution.   We've never seen a virus turn into anything "non-viral".  We've never seen a dog give birth to a non-dog.  We've never seen an ape give birth to a non-ape.  This is called 'macro-evolution', the idea that one species can evolve into a completely new one.  We've never seen this.  No reproductive act ever seen by a human has produced new DNA into the species' blooline. I don't believe macro-evolutionary theories.  Since the 'Theory of Evolution' hands upon this, I reject it.
Well crap, I agree with you.  There's a ton of people out there that need our help.  And yes, I'll admit that this war wasn't waged efficiently.  The whole 'shock and awe' thing turned out to be too much for our own good, seing as we've barely recovered the infrastructure we knocked out. Every single American and European should be grieved by the Rwanda genocide.  Our inaction is to the shame of our people and our way of life. On a similar note, I'm kinda pissed bush hasn't done anythin to stop the similar situation in Sudan.
If the Palestinians had nuclear weapons and tanks and fighter planes, and the Israelis only had guns and grenades, Israel would be an ex-country by now.
&gt; I'd be curious to know how thinking this affects your everyday life. Is it just a snide little superiorism that you keep tucked away, or do you feel that anyone who believes in an afterlife should be excluded from "adult" activites? Voting, for example? It definitely affects how much I trust a person's judgement.  But no, I don't think the law should recognize anything like this.   I don't feel superior.  I do recognize that moving toward this sort of awareness is very tough.  You have to face down a lot of fear.  Not everyone is going to do it. I do strongly believe, however, that thing about finiteness.  How can anything that is infinite be as special as something which is finite?  Finiteness is the basis of value. One thing that I am very aware of, as a non-believer, is that people who say that they believe in an afterlife, don't really act like it.  It's a wish, something that placates fear but doesn't root it out.  The fear is still there.
Arguments are for real people. You're a particularly pathetic form of troll.    
That's because you if you knew anything about evolution, you'd know that individual members of a species *adapt*, while the species itself *evolves*. And if we were to say, isolate a group of people in a different terrestial environment (say, very high altitude) we'd see the descendents of those that have adapted show different traits then those that did not travel to the environment. That group of homo sapiens would have evolved to fit their environment.  Scientists theorize that the elephant and the maintee had a common ancestor. Some of them went to dry land and became the elephant, some of them stayed in water, and became the maintee. Both basically adapted to their particular environment (over millions of years). There's overwhelming evidence that evolution occurs as long as natural selection is a force. Look at humanity: Natural selection is no longer a force for us: we have technology. The evidence that we've adapted to our environment is that we have organs that no longer seem to do anything (gulbladder, appendix, tonseils) inside our body.
&gt;However, when such design-as-you-go software development becomes standard practice, then you have the makings of utter chaos. He needs to read up on Agile S/W development methods. I guess he thinks Open Source SW developmetn is utter choas. He's part of a dying breed.
&gt; Is it so hard to think that we might teach different origin theories? We do. Since evolution doesn't have a whole that it can prove about abiogenesis, my high school science teacher discussed a number of elements of the primordial soup theory, its limitations, and a few other potential theories of abiogenesis. If Intelligent Design had any scientific meaning or rigor whatsoever, I guarantee you that he'd be delighted to teach it. &gt; Luckily, there's a whole slough of theory behind Intelligent Design. If that meant anything, that would be great. The theory behind Intelligent Design is short (two popular science books) and deeply unsatisfying. &gt; Seriously, check out the two websites I linked in my comment below if you want to see what creationists purport. It's a little difficult to get from your links to any meaningful discussion of Intelligent Design. You do not indicate which essays are worth reading, and they appear to be young-earth focused. That directly contradicts the Theory of Intelligent Design. I would suggest that you never bring them up again. You might prefer **[The Boston Review's index of articles on Evolution](http://www.bostonreview.net/evolution.html)**, which contains essays from both Intelligent Design authors (Behe &amp; Dembski) discussing their work. If you'd like a good starting point for figuring out why I think they're nitwits, I would suggest   **[Devolution: Why Intelligent Design Isn't](http://www.newyorker.com/fact/content/articles/050530fa_fact)** by H Allen Orr. He can write. &gt; On a different note, what should a teacher teach? Iduno. If they're a science teacher, they should fucking teach science.
The one thing that gets me about intelligent design is its circular reasoning. If life on earth is so irreducibly(sp?) complex that it cannot be explained except by a GREAT DESIGNER, then who, exactly, designed this GREAT DESIGNER?
so... was it?
&gt; Let me educate you on the idea of evolution. Oh my God, thank you. I've never heard that before. Whatever shall I do with my shattered image of the world? &gt; Since the 'Theory of Evolution' hangs upon this, Ah, but it doesn't. (**Edit**: And if it did, so would Intelligent Design. Why are you advocating the teaching of Intelligent Design if you think no animals could not have evolved from a common ancestor? I'm beginning to think your rhetoric is either dishonest or not thought through.)
Yes, that's why evolutionary biologists (like the one I dated) continually add to the growing body of research by studying evolution.  And yes, I'm sure crationism "makes more sense". It is simply because its well crafted religious dogma that uses circular logic to support itself. Evolutionary knowledge of the past, including the origin of life on earth, will never be complete and perfect unless we somehow invent some kind of time machine (unlikely).  More importantly, the fact that scientific minds can look at the theory, incomplete with all its flaws, and continue to study it and refine it ENHANCES its credibility. The fact that creationists want to build a museum showing Adam and Eve hanging out with Dinosaurs does little to add to the strength of any creationist's argument.
Come forward the socialist excuses to explain it all away. :)
In other words, you don't understand any of it. Too bad. You regurgitate way too much rhetoric for me to think you have a solid foundation. We have observed speciation, but it's slow. The few candidate speciations are not quite obvious yet, and without doubt, several of them will be disqualified. Humanity has speciated all sorts of domestic animals too, you know (though this argument falls flat because braindead biblethumpers use it as an example of humans creating species). What about ants? Some of them domesticate aphids... if after a few thousand years, those little bugs speciate, what then? There are lots of missing links. Birds with primtive wings that look more like arms with flaps. Reptiles with feathers. And on and on and on.
Why should he bother? You're doing such a good job of proving it yourself.
The theory of gravity. The theory of optics. Music theory... my god, the music theorists have it all wrong... after all, it's just a freakin' theory. No, all music is fundamentally inspired by Hallelujah, god of the mouth-breathers. Musical notes don't obey any rules, it only sounds good once it's played because He wills it that way. Amen, brothah! {falls down on the floor convulsing while gibbering} There, I spoke in tongues, I say! Doesn't that prove uh what I'm uh sayin' ?
Shhh...don't give him the idea that seeing a condom in a men's room might make you want to have sex, especially while seeing your penis. It's been a tough year for the fundies with brokeback mountain, and with your guidance they might see the condom machine as a PLOT TO ADVANCE THE HOMOSEXUAL AGENDA. Next thing you know, they're pushing for an amendment to provide "blinders" so you can't even see your genitials while you're taking a leak.
I doubt it was presumptuous when you made no mention of this law. Absent any mention of supposed state legislation it *was* a slippery slope argument: speed cameras are a path to GPS in cars. I also could not find anything listed on the website for the Texas state legislature or Texas department of transportation, any chance you have a link to this? Considering the expense and difficulty I seriously doubt something like this was considered, much less approved.
Hey, just one shy of half of them are right too.
A site for reading and submitting random New York stories!
Magic = I don't know how the fuck that works. So of course the creationists think the world was created with magic. It's a viscious little circle. Let's do a little thought experiment. Let's coop up 100 teenagers, all age 16, half female half male, in a building for 10 months out of the year. What is the likelyhood that all 100 will remain abstinent without some sort of extreme measure? (hell, what's the chances even if you lock them up in seperate prison cells... even in female prisons the inmates have sex with the guards). The number of how many have sex will more or less remain some constant minority fraction, assuming you don't allow some of them to behave in a predatorial/criminal fashion. No matter what you say to them, no matter what you do, no matter what you teach them. Believing otherwise is so stupid... there are no words in the english language for it. And by denying them access to prophylactics, you are saying "anyone that fornicates deserves to be punished with an incurable STD".  You're also saying "I don't really care about abortion". Because when it came right down to it, you said that fornication was every bit the sin that abortion is (despite pro-lifers comparing it to baby murder). Hell, not that even... you said "promoting/encouraging fornication is every bit as sinful". Because if it's a lesser sin, the practical person would say "hey, I know we shouldn't be encouraging them to screw around, but maybe so many babies won't be murdered". As for it being comparable to California... no. This is the equivalent of California allowing soda and candy, but banning insulin out of the first aid kits.
&gt; I think it is precisely because a speed camera is not a policeman. It has no discretion. It doesn't let off the man who is getting his pregnant wife to the hospiutal. It doesn't let you off with a warning because you have an otherwise clean record. It can't notice that you just got cut off by someone going much faster. The police are not supposed to provide discretionary enforcement, that is what the courts are for. Judges can and do make exceptions on speeding ticket enforcement for extenuating circumstances. &gt; And on a more subtle level, it is worrisome because as a "law enforcement" effort, it scales far better than actual human policemen do. It makes a larger police state much more practical. Cops are my friends, but I don't really want to live in a place where we feel we need to have one on every corner. The same could be said of cops in a theoretical country that exists without them. A "police state" is generally defined as one that uses police supervision to remove the civil rights of it's population. Somehow I dobut speeding qualifies as a civil right. Obviously there are limits to how far this idea applies, but cameras in public specifically set up to ensure speed limits are obeyed does not really seem like we are allowing government control.
&gt; I understand that Atheisim and Agnosticisim do not really inherently contradict Buddhism, Most atheists also disbelieve in the supernatural. That does really inherently contradict Buddhism. There are people who consider themselves Buddhists and don't really believe in the supernatural, but that doesn't have a whole lot to do with what Buddhism really is.
Why is this news?   Aside from the fact that it's 18 months after this was published, the point that O'Reilly often lies or is inaccurate was pretty well-established even in 2004.  I'm not saying people shouldn't care; I'm just saying that it's sort of like reporting that somebody evidently drove some kind of plane into the World Trade Center a few years back.   Edit:  Apparently there were two planes?  Weird.
Everything about living in Uruguay
On the light of the Exodus incident, let's just say I doubt it. 
Which monkeys?  Do you literally mean the chimpanzees we see at the zoo?  No scientist would ever claim such a thing.  Evolution doesn't predict that a chimp will randomly give birth to a human.  It says that if you trace ancestry back from both modern humans and modern chimps, you'll eventually end up at the same species, meaning a population that could successfully mate and reproduce within itself.   As for one being observable and the other not, please see the page on speciation that I linked before.  There's lots of good stuff on that site that addresses more or less everything you have to say.   I also think its interesting that you think the "Law of Gravity" is somehow more scientifically valid than the "Theory of Evolution".  We actually understand evolution better than we understand gravity, because we basically understand the mechanism by which evolution takes place (DNA crossover and mutation), while we still can't reconcile gravity with quantum mechanics without postulating that space has 10 dimensions or whatever it is that string theory does. Please, if you have any decency at all, stop using the "it's just a theory" argument, and please tell all your friends to do the same.  You can blather on all you want about missing links and eye complexity and all that, but the 'it's just a theory' thing is just so blatantly stupid and insulting that it should constitute [fighting words](http://www.freedomforum.org/templates/document.asp?documentID=13718). 
My tripping diary, last trip seattle, usa. Good and not so good surprises.
Free speech nuances aside, the guy did make one big mistake...if you are asked to leave any property by somebody with the authority to make the request and you fail to comply as fast as you are reasonably able, that is trespassing.
The core of Forth is a dozen bytes of machine code.  The whole thing can be up and running with full system support and a multitasking compiler/interpreter in under 8K.  So this is not quite your usual graduate project...
I will let this one go.  Because it is only fair if on the O'Reilly factor he can attack everyone under the son (Boycott of France? now possibly Mexico), so should the other side; they are probably justified in their article.  Maybe, if the liberals just did a better job of attacking the right.  I think Andy Rooney was probably the best, but he seemed to have a small segment.  The left seems to use the print media like the Times and Newyorker?
Tagging makes the baby Jesus / Spaghetti Monster / L. Ron Hubbard cry.  Tag clouds make them outright suicidal, by the way...
This story isn't truly complete without a [Google Image Search on the model, Isobella Jade](http://images.google.com/images?lr=&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=UTF-8&amp;q=Isobella%20Jade&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wi). 
Surely Apple has some kind of rule that anything a user may store on the computers at their stores becomes Apple's property?
I'm modding the comment up only because 'loost' is the worst "lose/loose" bastardization I have ever seen.  Congratulations.
Uhm...so people are seriously giving out their PHYSICAL ADDRESSES to an unknown person using a form on a page that isn't even SSL? Good fucking GOD they deserver whatever spam subscriptions / pipe bombs / wtf ever they get along with their free stick man on ruled notebook paper.  WTF?!
Free speech protects you from anyone censoring your speech. Freedom of association means your employer doesn't need to keep you around afterwards.
And Palestine is not an ex-country?
&gt; He patented it? What's to patent? The folding rotors maybe.
That video was neat &amp; all, but I would much prefer a video of two coliding in midair. Thanks in advance.
If there was more trust and good intentions in the word just imagine how much a better place it would be.  With kittens and lollypops.
&gt;If you're taking a piss, and you see a condom machine, you'll automatically think of having sex. It might cross my mind, but after five seconds I'd forget about it.  It's only a twig in a campfire set ablaze by hormone imbalance. &gt;And as natural as sex is in the human teenage mind, I venture to say that much of it is due to the overt sexualization of our culture. Before industrialization, people get to start reproducing during puberty.  Then as folks got busier, bearing children became too heavy of a burden.  Now that we have the proper protections, I don't see any reason to force abstinence on those who choose not to. I do agree though corporations are taking advantage of the situation to sell their products, which is kind of cheap.  But if you look at contemporary history, the media is merely riding on the bandwagon in this regard.  The openness to sex is historically correlated with eras of peace and prosperity in the cycles of societal changes.  The recent one had most of its push during the post-war movements, where the reason behind it is that people who have sex often are generally more happy and peaceful. Then why have we been promoting abstinence?  One explanation can be found by looking into the historical texts written as manuals to the powerful rulers (you can find them on the list of books banned by the churches in the past), you'll find that forced abstinence is recommended as a mean to cultivate frustration among males, and through propaganda redirect this frustration toward the enemies of wars.  These are often times of political instability when a major power has collapsed, and regional powers race in to fight for a piece of what's left behind.  Some may argue that such tradition arised out of necessity, but I consider it quite perverted to preserve ideas like this when the times have passed merely out of the fear of breaking the status quo. The weakness of extreme forms of progressive movements is that they are often carried out without proper precautions, but the majority of conservatism I see today are based on laziness of proper, detailed reasoning, and merely follow the way things have been done.  I think the key is finding the proper balance of the two, and I think this is why many scholars today are switching to Liberalism.  I think sex education today is a product of such well-balanced considerations.
You know, it occurs to me that the neocons may have made one of their biggest blunders yet. They've always been able to mold the media pretty much to their way of thinking. Not just Fox News &amp; Co., but *all* of the major media outlets. Even the allegedly "liberal" ones like the *New York Times*. But now they have pissed all over their greatest allies. Accusing journalists of treason, openly suggesting government censorship, and even (through their talking-head proxies, of course) suggesting that the editor of a newspaper be executed for running a valid story -- I'm sure these all seem like perfectly good tactical moves on their part to get the media on an even tighter rein. But people in a given profession tend to stick together. When Eminem was attacked for his lyrics, everyone from Bono to Elton John came to his defense -- not because they liked or agreed with his work, but because they were in the same business and saw defending his rights as an important part of defending their own. Similarly, when Judith Miller was locked up for refusing to reveal her source, journalists across the country rallied around her -- even though most of them knew very well that she was little more than a slimy hack doing Dick Cheney's dirty work. That didn't matter, because she was still a professional journalist put in jail for something that journalists are supposed to be protected against. I think we're going to see a similar wagon-circling around the *Times*. Even journalists who disagree with the paper, who disagree with their decision to run this story, will see this not as an attack on "that paper", but as an attack on *them*. And they will start becoming a lot less friendly to this administration. And a friendly press is pretty much the only hope this administration has left. Frankly, they're the ones who should be afraid -- not us.
No! It's *my* snake, I trained it, I'm going to eat it! I got a recipe for snake. Delicious. Fricassee of reptile. You are what you eat.
&gt; Apple now requires that you to install i-tunes along with QT [No they don't.](http://www.apple.com/quicktime/download/standalone.html)
Yeah...that'd last all of 5 minutes before somebody started to pass out lollipops with razors hidden in them.
Speed limits like the one inkieminstrel was talking about are commonly called revenue enhancing speed limits. The worst offenders are small towns who drop the speed limit on the highway into town to 25 right at the city limit, which is often a half mile or more from the pedestrians, traffic, and cross roads that would justify the lower limit. Speed limits like that are harmful because they encourage drivers to disregard speed limits as stupid and arbitrary. They also create hostility between drivers and police who have nothing better to do than enforce arbitrary speed limits.
You make some good points. They've been very successful in playing the media (some call it playing the refs), but it may have back fired this time, especially in light of stories like the one that ran on Slate, "Repeatedly since 9/11 a barrage of Bush administration press releases, speeches and congressional testimony heralded its aggressive works to target terrorist finances around the world. In a June 2002 speech to the Council on Foreign Relations, Deputy Treasury Secretary Kenneth W. Dam boasted that the United States was working with private-sector partners internationally on “developing monitoring systems” of bank accounts, noting that such cooperation was necessary because “you can’t bomb a foreign bank account.”  Anyone that would take a minute to read the Patriot Act ( which has been on the net for years) knows that they were monitoring bank transactions, even the dumbest jihadists would know that wiring and transfering money was probably not the best way to finance their operations. They have been using - "Hawala (Arabic for “transfer” or “wire”). It’s an informal funds transfer (IFT) mechanism, swifter than SWIFT that leaves no paper or digital trail." Which begs the question, do we have the best and brightest in charge of tracking down terrorists.
Zikes!  It makes my skin crawl!
Seems to be fairly new, but growing fast. The only site around that offers real info on the Kimberley. Helpful if you want to go bush and camping.
The difference between thieves tricking a policemen and speed cameras is that almost everyone agrees that stealing is wrong but not everyone agrees what the speed limit should be. Speed limits are often set arbitrary and have little to with traffic volumes, sight distances, pedestrians, tight curves, surface quality or other things that would effect what a safe speed for that road would be. Most two lane highways have a speed limit 55 mph despite the huge range of road quality found in two lane highways.
Yikes!
This is nonsense that makes the Taliban seem fierce, brave, and cunning. The fact is that they suck. I've lost track of how many articles I've read where we or the Afghans maybe lose one or two guys and 30 of them get killed at a time.  Would the Reddit crowd would rather read about surrounded British troops or British troops bayoneting 20 Taliban to death? This along with high-voted stories about how America couldn't literally last 5 minutes against the maggot Communists make me sick.
*This* is the profound threat?  Jeez, looking at the headline, I thought it was serious. The article is concerned that criticism of the press is equivalent to coercive suppression of the press.  This kind of hysteria is far more dangerous to American civic culture than Rush Limbaugh is. When Democrats retake the White House, they will regret having attacked and denigrated the trust Americans have in their federal executive.  People will not suddenly want to embrace (and expand) the government again after 8 years of being told it's out to get them.
The only thing that's ever backfired are liberals bizarre whinning strategies of winning elections.
Paul, great article. you becomes more and more freak. but behide that I think you are  in the track of god.  I really see many new points here.  you know, I am chinese. and if you are free, I suggest you find a book called Laozi or DaoDeJin by Laozi, who is a great thinker in acient china. He has wonderful view of the world and possibility.
They must have shared it with somebody...hrmphh...
Thomas Jefferson in 1787 wrote, "The basis of our government being the opinion of the people, the very first object should be to keep that right; and were it left to me to decide whether we should have a government without newspapers, or newspapers without a government,   I should not hesitate a moment to prefer the latter."  Justice William O. Douglas, concurring in New York Times   v. United States (1971),  These disclosures may have a serious impact.   But that is no basis for sanctioning a previous   restraint on the press. . . . The dominant purpose   of the First Amendment was to prohibit the widespread practice of governmental suppression of embarrassing information. A debate of large proportions goes on in   the Nation over our posture in Vietnam. Open debate and discussion of public issues are vital to our national health.   As nightfall does not come at once, neither does oppression. In both instances, there is a twilight when everything   seems seemingly unchanged. And it is in such twilight that we must be most aware of change in the air — however   slight — lest we become unwitting victims of the darkness   — Justice William O. Douglas
Are we about done with declaring war on abstract concepts?
Google usually rolls these things out to small random populations at first. Try searching for anything and see if things look unfamiliar. I'd hate to give away how it looks, but it looks very different.  :)
Why another Unix clone when you can have a BSD? He should stop wasting his time on this one. But perhaps it would by funny to see what Tanenbaum has to say about it? OK, let him continue. Maybe something useful comes out of this. 
No, because "Palestine" as a country never existed.  Once again, a history lesson for the ignorant Reddizen: in 1947 the UN decided to split the land between the Jordan river and the Med sea between Jews and Arabs. The Jewish/Zionist leadership accepted the plan. The Arab side rejected it, and declared a war - aided by Egypt, Iraq, Jordan and other existing Arab countries - to capture the entire land.  Amazingly, they failed. This became Israel's war of independence. 20 years later, in 1967, the Arab nations around Israel were building up to another war, to try and take the entire territory again - again, to the surprise of all involved Israel actually beat all of them in 6 days, in doing so capturing the Gaza strip and the West Bank. Forward to our time, and Israel's vast majority of citizens are tired of immoral and inhumane occupation. Israel has brought Arafat back to the territories in order to build an independent Palestine state - for the first time, mind you - and yet the Palestinians have chosen to go for the whole land instead, by commiting suicide bombings in Israeli cities and by electing the fundemental Muslim Hamas party in the first ever Palestinian democratic elections. You may want to bother reading up about something before you comment on it.
Then it's probably okay to summarily downvote them. But extending that to all self-promoters, rather than all poor submitters, seems completely unintuitive.
He wasn't a city cop, he was a cop for the V.A. center (so probably a military policeman or somesuch), in which case, yes, he did have that authority.
So you would suggest Rosa Parks to move to the end of the bus?
Has anyone done something similat with SQLAlchemy? Might just do that.
Why the downmodding?  It's simple common sense.  It's pretty tough - not impossible, but pretty tough - to 'fight city hall' from inside a jail cell.  If you want to be most effective in demonstrating your dislike of the government, you need to keep your nose clean.
&gt;Actually it's +5 right now Indeed - and mine is at 0. I guess the Reddits conclude the Mideast really *was* a haven of peace before the Zionists came along, then... As I said, Wisdom of Crowds.
uh...did you just miss the whole part of the story where the Brits killed 20 or more Talibanis and didn't have ANY casualties?
  Read or listen to what the Former Israeli Foreign Minister Shlomo Ben-Ami has to say about the mythology that you describe here http://democracynow.org/finkelstein-benami.shtml &gt; No, because "Palestine" as a country never existed. A country has borders.  Do you know where are the borders of Israel? You might want to consider Article 49, paragraph 6 of the Fourth Geneva Convention that says: "the occupying power shall not deport or transfer parts of its own civilian population into the territory it occupies". It is interesting to note that the Geneva Convention was to avoid repeating the Nazi atrocities during the World War II.  Does border of Israel extend to West bank and Gaza?  If not then what are the settlers doing there.  If yes then why are people living in such a horrific conditions?
Brilliant!  Not necessary wise or anything, but brilliant.  Where's the other Net authors imagination gone?!
&gt; used for revenue generation Good! It is a great idea! It is entirely voluntary: if you don't want to pay, don't go too fast. It is very easy. 
Sometimes, when I'm looking for content, I don't remember the actual headline, but I rather remember the domain or other parts of the URL.  Being able to search through URLs would greatly improve the usefulness of the search field.
Methinks Mr. Swartz should implement [nofollow](http://googleblog.blogspot.com/2005/01/preventing-comment-spam.html) for infogami comments.
And splitting content across pages when one would be enough to... **1** | 2 | 3 | 4 | next &gt;
Afghanistan - the forgotten war.
both ebay links are the same...
There is actually a tab for uk/world with US rates too at  http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/shared/spl/hi/uk/06/prisons/html/nn2page1.stm (The amount is a bit different than the one you stated) 
&gt;I don't think that people who believe in an afterlife can ever truly be adults. What is an adult? I don't think you understand the word. I've noticed a lot of anti-religious sentiments on reddit. Why so much hate and inteolerance against those who believe? I'm sure some of you will say something equivalent to "but they started it" or "religion is the scourge of mankind". However, the first reason is childish and the second reason is unfounded. Yes, some use religion to justify their evil acts, but if you look beneath the cover reason of religion you will almost always find another deeper reason. Furthermore, religion provides so much comfort and happiness for billions of people.  Religion is not all bad is all I'm saying.
downvoted for drinking hate-o-rade.
British don't hate Americans. They are their best and most loyal allies. They just despise Americans. And make fun of them. 
I'm not sure whether Israel is using the captured soldier as an excuse to attack Palestinean targets or if they are setting an example that says "don't abduct our soldiers". On the other hand, I can understand why Israel needs to do something. Altogether, the Israel/Palestine conflict is a tradegy with no winners, only two losers.
The critic should ignore what the 'fable' *says* it is. Simply appreciate what it actually is. It is a demonstration of creativity. Judging by its fame, a very good one. Secondarily it prods at the bureaucratic form of normal 'education'. Both messages are valuable. 
&gt; *their number has more than doubled* Finally, good news!
On reddit: Atheists versus THEM. Bush opponents versus THEM.  We are all being manipulated and we all manipulate other people.
&gt; The story never mentions what this "peace t-shirt" says. One might have expected something like [Foxtrot Tango Alpha](http://burning.typepad.com/burningman/2005/02/foxtrot_tango_a.html) but according to the article [Ferner](http://www.google.com/search?q=Mike+Ferner) was on a march {0} and was holding a banner that read, *'The sign I held said, "Demand quality healthcare for all veterans."*.  Ironically it was probably something as offensive to the [VA](http://www.va.gov) as the later. **Reference** [0] afterdowningstreet.org, "The march a "30-day, 320-mile "Walk for Justice," from Springfield to North Chicago, Illinois, to reclaim funding for the common good and away from war."   [Accessed Sunday, 2nd July 2006]
Let me introduce you two: crei0, irony. Irony, crei0. Now you two are introduced. ;) (Unless, of course, you were playing along. You never know on the internet.)
Many economists argue **against** net neutrality. Here's an example article: http://reddit.com/info/956y/comments
I'm curious, why do you prefer reddit.com to using rss feed readers? (I prefer it, too, but I'm not sure why.)
Typical economist approach to evaluate everything in the revenue potential. The internet is more than a potential revenue stream.
The subdued *cri de coeur* of gen X. I should know: I am one, and it is fully justified!
You missed the point. I meant that nobody has any idea what the hell this is about. Is this some complete software? It is some library? Why do we care? The itroduction is impossible to understand for most people here.
&gt; The logical and pragmatic response to the ambush, as the journalist hints, is of course napalm on the village. I missed this part. And I'm fairly certain the Brits just wouldn't do this today, for various reasons, rendering it neither logical nor pragmatic. Also, you seriously take advice on international relations from *Machiavelli*?
test
I got a subscription to ancestry.com this year, and using their "One World Tree" I found many surprising historical figures of note. Charlemagne and Julius Ceasar were my favorites, and some Norwegian royalty (which is of interest to me because I live in Norway).  What I found surprising was the reaction of the people who I shared this information with. Mostly, Norwegians were uncomfortable because they thought I was claiming to be special/different and they shy away from that sort of thing. Others were like "Pff! So! Who made you queen!" I never thought of it that way... I agree that no one is "more special" because they have a huge genealogy file and a family crest. I don't imagine that I share some kingly trait with a distant ancestor. But I like to imagine that maybe they were just a little bit like me. Just trying to live their lives and make something interesting of it.
Only that this did not start with Bush and 9/11. Anybody seen the Beavis and Butthead do Washington movie from the 1990s? And lots of other examples, such as discretional enforcement of sodomy or open container laws.
"Wherever you will go"
Isn't that why the points of new submissions to reddit are only shown after 2 hours now, so people won't be influenced by how fellow redditors voted?
This is prime Jeremy Clarkson: occasionally funny and insightful; usually a self-important wanker with a car instead of a penis.
[Linkjacked](http://www.kevinroth.com/rte/)
Granted, as soon as I wrote the comment I checked around and found out that my information was not correct. Probably I took the homonymous book too seriously. However, as to the similarity in tactics, I don't think there's much discussion possible given the terrorist incidents during the British mandate. For example, quoting an Israeli Irgun member: "In fact, there is a division of roles; One organisation advocates individual terrorism (the Freedom Fighters of Israel), the  other conducts sporadic military operations (the Irgun) and there is a third organisation which prepares itself to throw its final weight in the decisive  war." Although the technique of human bombs was not utilized, this is a relatively recent innovation. According to http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Suicide_bomb the technique was brought to the attention of Palestinians by Japanese communists, so it appears not to be an endogenous result of Islamic culture any more than it is of Jewish culture. In fact, according to the aforesaid article, the first description of a self-sacrificing act of the kind is the Samson incident. I'd have to look this up, but I believe to remember there was also a mass suicidal incident sometime in century I CE approximately, when the Roman authorities decided to prophane the Temple, but I don't have data at hand. 
&gt;Shlomo Ben-Ami has to say about the mythology that you describe For what I read (and from former knowledge of his views) he says pretty much the same stuff I do. &gt;A country has borders. Do you know where are the borders of Israel? I wonder - if you are critical of Israel not being clear on its borders, what would you say to Palestinian elect government who refuses to formally acknowledge even the *existence* of Israel, let alone its borders? Borders were the heart of the debate 10 years ago. Most Israelis, as elections proven numerous times, now agree the line should be the pre-1967 border, and the West Bank and Gaza Strip should be an independent Palestinian state. This is called the "Two State Solution" and the Oslo Accord in 1992 was meant to initiate it. The Palestinians began sending suicide bombers to Israeli cities. In Camp David, 2000, Arafat was offered 90-98% (reports vary) of said territory. He chose to refuse - not even negotiate it - and started the 2nd Intifada which basically ended the peace process. Yet, again, last summer Israel withdrew completely from the Gaza Strip, removing all Israeli settlers from this territory - complying with the Geneva Convention article you quote. The same goverment which took this step was reelected, under the ticket of performing the same unilateral withdrawal from the West Bank. Again, the Palestinians are within reach of an independent state in the West Bank and Gaza Strip. Their response: elect the fanatic Hamas to government, turn the former Israeli settlements into guerilla bases and start shooting Kassam rockets at nearby Israeli towns. The only explanation I can find to why they keep choosing the path of violence when they can get so much more by negotiations is that they reject the two-state solution and want the entire territory for themselves. This conclusion is somewhat help by the fact their leaders keep saying exactly that. In light of the above, I think it is absurd to put blame on the borders issue entirely on Israel.
Please post more (dirty) jokes and other non porn NSFW stuff to http://nsfw.reddit.com/ Porn is very easy to find on the net. We don't need another porn link collection. This is reddit.com! 
The Irgun/FFI were small, extermist organizations. The 3rd organization, Hagganah, was much larger and more moderate. Most importantly, the Hagganah, which later morphed into the Israeli Army, took upon itself to restrain the extreme organizations when it was time to stop fighting and build a nation. This is the critical step which, unfortunately for everyone involved, Palestinians never took: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Altalena_Affair  BWT, while I don't claim suicide is integral to Islamic culture, but it was accepted in extreme sects well before the Japanese Kamikazes. In fact it is the origin of the word Assassins: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hashshashin And the Jewish mass suicide you're referring to is the story  of Masada: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Masada 
You really think it's possible to make the government BIGGER than G.W. already has?
Glad to see you had a good time while you were here...
Welcome to the "Free World" USA!  Mission accomplished! 
Anyone else thinking "borg cube"? It must be really horrible to live in a place like that.
I usually try and stay out of these things, but there is a very simple reason I dislike religion: it's not rational. I don't trust irrationality. I don't mean the sort of shallow rationality that people usually mean with the word "rational". I mean the sort of rationality that explains why love and anger are useful (hint: game theory). Part of that rationality is to have an internal mental model that is consistent with the world. Religion, of all sorts, require dogma. Dogma is turning off the part of your brain that re-adjusts the internal model against your experimental inputs. It also opens up the path to easy exploitation. If you don't question the big "truths" staring you in the face, why question the logic behind the words of that man in the pulpit?
It appears that The Hoff has mastered the art of self-parody.
Does it matter that I was an atheist long before reddit or even long before my own internet connection for that matter (same for being opposed to totalitarianism, torture, war,... btw). I don't say I haven't been manipulated into some of those views but if I have it was by my parents and school teachers (especially the anti anything nazi-like education is pretty strong here in Germany or at least at my school it was) not by some marketer or politician.
this is just the sort of thing I need.  many thanks. does anyone know what kind of reputation this book/these authors have?
The only political party in America that has, as [its stated goal](http://www.lp.org/issues/platform_all.shtml), the objective of peacefully ending the police state and returning freedom and power to the people is the [Libertarian Party](http://www.lp.org/).  If you recognized the unacceptable truth in the article and want to do something about it, vote Libertarian.
I'm sadly not surprised, but very ashamed.  *sigh*  I liked the colombian who realized he made a mistake and would rather return to the country where the people wanted to kill him.  He should be thankful he got out, things are just as bad inside.  Not just immigration officers but cops are just as suspicious and bullying as well.
He argues the same bullshit as every free-market-solves-everything economist. His examples of markets where discriminating service solves problems are markets where exactly the thing net-neutrality supporters fear has already happened: A small number of big companies killed off all the small companies.  He is also argueing lack of innovation with the current system which anyone who knows the internet can dismiss immediately. Of course net neutrality isn't the best solution for ISPs and backbone providers as they could make much more money without it but this isn't the argument of the net neutrality supporters, advantages for the consumers are. A point often missed by economist used to thinking of everything as money.  
Doesn't seem like the author has really done his homework. From the most recent Joel Spolsky column (http://www.joelonsoftware.com/items/2006/06/16.html)  &gt;Watching non-programmers trying to run software companies is like watching someone who doesn't know how to surf trying to surf. So yeah, it has been discussed. Dismissively, but discussed. (Edited because reddit combined the last paragraph with the quote...)
No, that really isn't true.  In a built-up area, people (usually children, I suppose) can easily run out in front of you, and there's not a thing you can do about it.  The 30mph speed limit is there because of that whole "You're 10 times more likely to kill a child at 35mph than at 30mph" or whatever the actual statistic is I hear quoted everywhere.
Won't get you anywhere unless you've got a significant chance of winning a vote or two.  Such is the US electoral system, for better or worse.
I am so, so tired of the middle east. How about start a program to easily allow jews and arabs (+ other groups) to immigrate to the US and Europe, and let the rest of them duke it out. I'd sure be a lot cheaper, and it can't be _less_ effective than what we're doing now.
I saw this headline and first thought: "Man, things in Iraq must be getting _really_ bad when the President has to send over Arnold Schwarzenegger..."
Is it better to collaborate just so you can say you voted for a winner or the runner up or is it better to say I voted against tyranny?  There is no shame in losing a battle against totalitarianism, there is a great deal of shame in being on the wrong side at any time.
Rabbi Abraham Isaac Kook (1864 - 1935), held atheist of highest regard. He claimed they are helping the world remove false man-made beliefs that lead to immorally, war, etc.  Judaism believes that man was only given 7 commandments. The first one being, do not worship false deities. The last one being, set up a system of honest, effective courts, police and laws. The very fact that belief in God was **not** required and a commandment to set up court systems and police shows from Judaism's POV that man is not capable to be moral by just believing in God.  IIRC, history and scientific research backs up Judaism's claim. :S
Unless the election is won by one vote, your vote won't make a difference anyway, so you might as well vote with your conscience.
"Just as bad"? Colombia has something akin to a civil war going on, replete with left wing guerillas and right wing paramilitaries.  I would say that it's a whole lot worse off than the US, especially considering that, due to illiberal policies, their most valuable crop is targeted for destruction, driving its production and trade into the arms of nasty people...
Yes, freedom of association under that interpretation also allows workplace discrimination against gender and race, because of other biases in our government and economic system. This would mean we have on paper rights to participate in US society as free citizens, but not de facto rights. My understanding comes from the US Department of State, [which has a surprisingly honest](http://usinfo.state.gov/products/pubs/oecon/chap2.htm) (though of course biased) discussion of this: &gt; "If the pure capitalism described by Marx ever existed, it has long since disappeared, as governments in the United States and many other countries have intervened in their economies to limit concentrations of power and address many of the social problems associated with unchecked private commercial interests. As a result, the American economy is perhaps better described as a 'mixed' economy, with government playing an important role along with private enterprise." If the state supports a system where the wealthy people dominate use/access of the nation's resources (by definition), the wealthy will predictably come out ahead when other things are "held equal," as that advantage is overwhelming. Therefore in modern society, the government is a check on private power. (So as president Franklin Roosevelt explained, "The liberty of a democracy is not safe if the people tolerate the growth of private power to a point where it becomes stronger than their democratic state itself. That, in its essence, is fascism: ownership of government by an individual, by a group, or any controlling private power.") Of course, we unfortunately have a top-down form of democracy, and politicians are biased in favor of industrial power, but at least the citizenry can participate somewhat more in our government than in the workplace, as workplaces are generally far more hierarchical.
Of course, isn't that the purpose of argument? Hopefully, you'll both "manipulate" each other to a better understanding. The "danger" of marketing is that it can convince you to do things that aren't in your best interest. I think that rabid consumerism is not in your best interest.
It is not as if all Linux versions have this problem, just the "professional" ones like SuSE and Redhat. I guess they took imitating MS a bit too far.
This article scared me (I've never been to the US). I guess we need a little of our own paranoia to counter that of the American establishment.
Even if you could, it wouldn't be enough. Simply making a democratic regime doesn't ensure that the people are going to vote the way you want them to. I'd say there are enough examples of this already. (Iran August 1953, Palestine/Hamas)
Sounds interesting but I am wondering how a language without a standard library can already be a 43 MB download.
1. Stuff falls into socket (dangerous)  2. Moving furniture can shear off the socket (also dangerous)  3. Many wall transformers will not plug in.  Horrible, horrible, horrible design.
If a few less people had voted their conscience, held their noses, and voted for Gore in Florida, we would most likely not have GWB as president. You can vote me down all you want, but that won't change the reality of a winner-take-all system.
Well, there are arguments to be made that the PLO (and attendant secular militant organizations) back when was larger and more moderate than Hamas. The electoral results might be conditioned by the misrule of PLO more than substantive support for Hamas' positions. Also there are reasons to believe that Israel was instrumental in supporting a radical and islamic movement in order to divide opposition and take the wind away from a relatively secular nationalist one. As to Haganah trying to control Irgun, you have a point, although they also cooperated in actions that should be considered terrorist. The ability for Palestinians to do the same though is probably not there, although I won't argue that neither is the necessary amount of political will. However, it's quite clear that in a situation relatively similar to the Palestinians, the Israeli too made use of analogous tactics. As to the assassins, as you say, it's a very extreme sect. Judging a culture by the actions of its fringe would not be too wise. Also an important distinguishing factor is that assassins targetted political dignitaries and people that one must consider legitimate targets, whereas terrorists go for civilians. And thanks for the note about Masada, that was probably what I was thinking of indeed. 
Well, for instance, you could try and influence one of the major political parties from inside.  Or instead of backing a party that has little influence, perhaps you could aim at reforming the electoral system to give that party a better chance.  The Australian voting system seems pretty nice to me, for instance.  Proportional systems lead to weak governments beholden to small parties (like the comunists in the current Italian government:-/ ), so I don't think they're much of an improvement over what we've got now.
Ok, cool this time is the correct link
Insightful article! Some good thoughts to consider for those of us considering a web startup.
Interesting... i really liked point #3!
Hey, cool post! Thanks.
You don't need to be scared. The man had previously worked illegally in America which involved breaking dozens of laws and a great deal of lying. He broke the law again when he lied to the official about why he was in the country previously.  He was warned several times that lying is a crime but he continued to lie. Since he had broken the law many times before, and then again right in front of an official despite the warnings, he was detained for a brief period and then returned to his country of origin.
Im sure i have heard some of these before? Good advice though...
I'm going to the US shortly to visit a friend for a couple of weeks. My problem is that last time I was in USA I got a speeding ticket that I "forgot" to pay. I read somewhere that failing to pay a speeding ticket is a criminal offence in US and would make me a criminal. Hence, I will need to lie on my tourist visa form, putting me in the same category as this guy. Anyone know how big of a problem an unpaid speeding ticket can be for a tourist visiting US?
Thanks, i have forwarded this to a startup friend...
I think you're better off not lying.  Speeding tickets aren't really that big a deal here.
Yes, you could try to work from inside one of the parties but you would quickly find that dissenting points of view such as "I'd like to dismantle the system this party has helped to create" are not well tolerated. Reformation of the electoral system involves modifying the Constitution which requires overwhelming support from the parties in power (2/3rds of both houses of Congress plus ratification by 3/4ths of the state congresses) and so you can imagine where that leads. The only solution I see is to lead by example.  Supposedly, while Thoreau was in jail he was visited by Emerson who asked "Henry, what are you doing in there?".  Thoreau replied "Waldo, the question is what are you doing out there?".
Even from a year or two ago, the process of being in the US and getting a Visa to another country was bad enough. They tell you to come back another day, then on return wait for your papers to be checked again, have a seat, etc. The key is to patiently persist. So it doesn't surprise me that the reverse process of entering the US itself is a slow process with similar flaws, and perhaps more. For this orange room victim, the two paragraphs on the people he knew that forged documents raises some questions. Was anyone he knew that did that directly related to him, with his last name, or would there be another reason he might be in some database as linked to those crimes? Sounds like he arrived with the attitude that there was a 100% chance of getting to his destination, and as if being invited from a US corporation made the whole trip legitimate. Additionally, if you act like you're trapped in a room and want nothing else but to go back to your home country, resigned to the fact that you were mistaken to step on the flight in the first place and that you wouldn't do it again, well no wonder that was the end result. 
we got your IP address on file. You will be contacted at the port of entry regarding the speeding ticket. Good luck.
This is exactly why I wrote a rant a couple of weeks ago about how we need to get beyond seeing Bush as 'Right' and those who oppose him as 'Left.' It is just camouflage... http://reddit.com/info/7zaj/comments/c802e   
Jews have generally interpreted Genesis 9:5 (" At the hand of man, even at the hand of every man's brother, I will require the life of man") as a proscription of suicide. YMMV.
I am the author of the article. I know I broke the law, I know I lied, but that's not the point.  There was no way for any of them to know what I've did because there was no record whatsoever of what I did.  They didn't discover anything, I told them. I told them because I just wanted to go home. If I was let in I would have expended some money in going back that same night; that way I've got it for free.  Furthermore, they weren't really intresting in finding the truth. The seek for wrongdoings ended as soon as they had an excuse to deport me.  Furthermore, there's plenty of reason to be scared: what about people on which they couldn't find anything wrong, people that was held there for hours, search upside down, they picked they personal phone directories and called everybody in there, what about the guys who were forced to turn on their laptops and surrender them for an officer to use them, to do whatever they wanted with it ?  What about the Colombian guy ? his only sin was "not bringing enough money".  Have you carefully read the dialog between the two officers when one of the missed to held the girl ? One of the two officers claimed that proved or not, they should have put the girl in the cell because they knew she was guilty.  OK, I was a wrongdoer, I was a criminal, one which made a web site for 900$ in the effort of creating a company in USA, one who invested, in return, 7000$ in the creation of the company, paying taxes and all kind of services to local people, local companies. What about the real innocent people that will get their cases managed by the same officer that managed mine ? that one who thinks proves are unimportant, only to not let people in.
I also have concerns over the LP's position on immigration.  However, I can't imagine anyone agreeing completely with the platform of any party so I don't see that disagreeing with the LP on a point like immigration is a show-stopper. Long before the LP gained control of America the GOP and Dems would begin to modify their behavior to accomodate the libertarian demographic.  As a result, every vote for the LP is a signal to the other parties on how to adjust their policies in order to regain that vote.
Well, on the whole, it's not a bad system, and has worked ok for some 200 odd years, so rather than dismantling it, most people would like to more or less gradually shift it one way or the other, which makes sense to me.
&gt; You need a permit to do everything in America. You even need a passport to buy a drink. But interestingly you don’t need one if you wish to rent some guns and some bullets. I needed a 50 cal (very big) machinegun. “No problem,” said the man at the shop. “But could you just sign this assuring us that the movie you’re making is not anti-Bush or anti-war.” Bullshit.  I've gotten plenty of drinks without ID, but nobody has ever rented a gun to me without ID, if for no other reason than they want a good idea of who to track down and shoot if I try to steal it.
Note to Europeans, South Americans, Canadians, Africans and others:  You don't have the right to come to the USA so that you can work.  It is a privilege.  Just like I can't go to France and start working, you can't come here.  Deal with it. Note to percecuted people everywhere:  Please come and get asylum in the USA.  My family did. Note to the author of this article:  You lied about working in the USA, you lied about why you were in the country previously,  and you were warned that lying is a crime.  What else are you lying about?  Your lucky that you weren't charged with the crime of lying to a police officer.  I do commend you for doing everything legally though, while you were here.  That was the right thing to do.  Your wrong to encourage people to break the law because you are bitter.  All you had to do was explain that you worked here legally for a time after your vacation, and forgot to mention it.  No biggie.  You set yourself up for a huge fall.  Dumbass.
Good luck there.  Just an advice. Officers don't like people visiting friends. If you said that you are going to be automatically tagged as a possible illegal immigrant.  If you want to get in, be sure to bring the reservation of a hotel, printed or something like that. Also, be sure to have enough money to pay the hotel, even if you are not going to need it. Otherwise, you'll be suspicious.  Regarding the ticket, I don't know, I bet that if you come from a friendly country there will be no problem, otherwise, they'll use whatever they can against you. Also, know this: *You don't have any rights there*  If they find you guilty of a crime, you can be held in a cell and sent to a prison. You may opt to come back home, but that may take months once they put you in a prison. The immigration officers can take all your personal belongins and do whatever they want with it: don't bring a cellphone or phone directory, they'll call everyone on it and ask about you.  If you care about your friend, don't mention it, they can go to his/her house and search it *without a search warant* (or however that's spelled). Good luck.
Many more pictures here though.
"If you don't go to the US, the Americans will come for you."
&lt;3 Hicks
Thanks, im glad you liked it!
Modded down for being completely devoid of insight and a useless jab at marketing (if there can be such a thing; this guy found it). Using Vonnegut's sense of the term, just about EVERY association is "proud and useless" - we associate with people because of a common last name, or a common class in school, or a common affinity for coke or pepsi, a certain sports team or certain kind of music or a certain author. What matters isn't WHY we associate with people and whether it's "useless" or not (useless to whom?), but what comes of that association. Some of my best friends I found because of one of those "granfalloons" - if that's useless, then so is every association.
i love it, so much easier than instantdomainsearch - prettier too
More like 25-30 years later. Commercially, mostly a failure. As an idea, mostly a success, and certainly a big influence on subsequent languages like Java and Ruby.
&gt; Note to percecuted people everywhere: Please come and get asylum in the USA. My family did. Getting asylum today in USA is a lengthy process, it may take two years. Those years you'll expend it on a federal prison. (For people seeking political asylum, running from bad governments seeking a free land: go to any other country, Europe, Canada, there are plenty of better places). I repeat again: I want to emphasize how the process works. I wasn't being held because I lied, they didn't know that. I wasn't being held because I worked, they didn't know that. They had no way of proving that. Only guessing.  I was being held because I did something they didn't like it: staying for a year. Also I want to show how they worked. It is very important to note the dialog between the guards: everyone is guilty, period. You are right, we, the rest of the world, don't have any rights on USA. We don't have the right to be treated like a person. That's why I am recommended everyone not to go there. I don't understand why you are so angry as to start calling names; people of the USA managed to get what they wanted, a country for their own and nobody else, you should be proud.
&gt;My most important advice is: "Do not go to USA". It has turned into a fascist country ruled by fascist authorities that put fascist brain-washed police officers on immigrations (and who knows what else). But he wanted to come here to make some money. Figures.
Millions of people enter this country every year without incident at all.  You lied to an officer who makes a living detecting liars and got caught. As for the others, when they ask for phone numbers they are looking for someone with the credibility you lack to vouch for you.  If they uncover a criminal in the process they can't ignore that (and who would suggest criminals ought to be ignored by the authorities anyway?). The reason electronic devices are demonstrated is to show they are (probably) not fake and containing some sort of weapon. As for not bringing enough money: people on legitimate travel make reasonable plans to cover their expenses.  If he had planned on staying at a friend's house that would have been OK but apparently the friend didn't confirm that to the authorities.  As $700 is not enough for 20 days, unless you can demonstrate how you will cover the difference, you will be deported. In a nutshell, I can tell you have not done much international travelling.  I have been to nine countries and they all operate pretty much the same way.  Your story is no big deal at all. As to your final point, the duty of immigration officers of any country is to keep people out.  You do not have an automatic right to come into this (or any other) country.  You have to earn that right by following the procedures. If I showed up in Buenos Aires without enough money to live on, no way of proving I could support myself without engaging in criminal activity, without the full name and contact information of an Argentinian citizen who could vouch for me, do you think I would be just be waved through and told to enjoy my stay?  Of course, the answer is "no".
Odd that Clarky should criticise American food, as if English cooking had ever amounted to anything capable of comparing with southern soul food, texas barbecue, or any restaurant in New York. He also overlooks the way the English class system accepts 'zany' behaviour only from the non-working classes. Have the wrong accent and your eccentricity ends in a police station. Full disclosure: I'm English and I live in the US.
Your full of shit.  And you don't know what your talking about.   There is no way that Immigration is going to go to search a house located in the USA without a search warrant.  Not a chance.  (Unless you tell them that there is a nuclear device there, but that is an exception to the rule) In the USA, everyone has TONS of rights.  Even illegals.  However, at the border, or at the airport, you don't have that many rights.  Everything can be inspected.  Including your body.  Its like this all over the world, not just the USA.   Guess you shouldn't have lied, punk.
Yet another con from our trusted executive branch about the legendary WMD. Just like this group to twist information to mislead the American public into supporting their war for profit.
jackass.
hi
As I'm based at the campus it was interesting to read this story.
I would take care of that speeding ticket first.  Call up an attorney in the State were you got pulled over.  He will investigate and take care of it for you.  You will probably have to shell out $600 for the lawyer and the money for the fine.  A speeding ticket is a petit misdemenor.  It is not a misdemenor or a felony.  Contacting your embassy might be good too.  Lying on the Visa form is the wrong way to go.  Lying will always get you in trouble.
Given that this report is backing further increases in funding for Science Foundation Ireland, Enterprise Ireland, the programme for research in third level institutions this made for good reading for once.
Compatriota: didn't you think that the "Argies who have been in the States for one year" bin is full of people who have overextended the terms of B1/B2, so they just profiled you and were kind of doing the standard procedure to exert a confession, like they do in police TV shows? Now that your story is all over the Internet, Argies may be treated even worse, and with "just cause" (see? that Pupeno guy lied to us!). Thanks for helping make all of our passages through US airports even less pleasant. Note 1: I was once detained in Miami airport because of a technicality. They applied the very harsh SOP on me, but were impersonal and actually quite nice once the issues cleared Note 2: Good luck with Canada. But... don't ever fly into Toronto wearing a Philadelphia Flyers cap. The nicest Canadadian officers can turn into US-style thugs when they see your head inside one of those.
&gt; If I showed up in Buenos Aires without enough money to live on, no way of proving I could support myself without engaging in criminal activity, without the full name and contact information of an Argentinian citizen who could vouch for me, do you think I would be just be waved through and told to enjoy my stay? Of course, the answer is "no". I don't have any problem with anybody going to Argentina or Spain (if we somehow consider I have the right of opinion for the countries were I have citizenship). In fact, I was very angry at the Spanish government for deporting a lot of people running away from Africa. The constitution of Argentina invites everybody to come in and live and work in the preamble, the first paragraph. I know that Argentinian authorities doesn't respect it and I don't like that. If some people should not be allowed in, is those that come only to use the services, people from poorer countries go to Argentina to use the hospitals and universities without ever paying for it. That shouldn't be allowed. There should be an easy path for that people to get residency and pay taxes to latter enjoy the services.  Unlike many USA citizens, I am aware that Argentina (and Spain) just wouldn't work without immigration; because of all the things that immigrants do, like running 90% of the supermarkets and other suppliers of the city.  Most immigrants come from worst conditions because they want to live better; most immigrants are entrepreneurs by definition and want to work hard by definition. If something should be done is encourage them to stay (instead of putting things hard so they leave shortly taking with them the money they made).
Yes, easily.  Universal health care, anyone?
&gt; There is no way that Immigration is going to go to search a house located in the USA without a search warrant. Not a chance. I'd invite you then to sort it out with immigration. I am talking about what they say they do. Maybe they lie.
Very few people fail to realize that when particpiate in your own life, showing up everyday fully alert, you become aware of your own conscienceness. It is whether you CHOOSE to ignore or listen to it that dictates your behavior and has the same results as going to church and having a preacher tell you how to live. What about crazy people? Ins't it funny psychotics are just as religious as the "good" people?
I was just quoting an immigration officer.
Actually, it's 43 KB (or 42, to be old-school), not 43 MB. What's interesting about this is, from looking briefly at the source, that all of the parsing/compiling/interpreting is done in Python.
The author claims that we were drawn to read it by the exclusionary nature of the title.  I was drawn to it because I wanted to learn why some people choose vehicles that are more visible on the road, while others want to blend in.  So his basic premise seems wrong to me.  Ford and Chevy men get along just fine, and they do switch brands now and then.  Where does he get this crap?  Marketers _wish_ we defined ourselves in terms of brands.  Most people are more cynical than that.
No, money is not the most important thing for me. A comunity I can feel part of, where I can take and give and feel that what I give is not through into a hole and buried.  I was also going to pay taxes, like everyone else.
Your English is pretty good, but it's not "latter" it is "later".  Just a tip :)
permit != ID
Got to agree with you there...it might be easier to apply for asylum in another country.  It does take a long time and you do end up in a federal prison at first.  You should make your application for asylum while you are in a 3rd country, if possible. That does not change the fact that for whatever reason, the officer who asked you originally if you worked in the country before DETECTED that lied.  Maybe it was your manner.  Maybe it was that you looked nervous and moved your eyes around in a certain way.  Whatever his instincts and training taught him, he was RIGHT.  And he got you.  HAHA.
I found the photos here very appealing.
Lambda-the-ultimate has [a thread on this](http://lambda-the-ultimate.org/node/1277).
Hey pibe, shut up. I go to US every month and never ever had a problem with anyone at immigration. They were always polite and I never saw they holding or doing anything with any other person at the border.   
Do you ever watch World Poker Tour on T.V.? They picked this guy because he has bad tells when his is not telling the truth :-) If you are going to lie when you enter the country, at least learn how to do it well.
I remember an April Fools issue of Computer Language magazine that had an article about 'Writing GOSUB in Forth'.
Boludo.
Is this really advice about Visiting the USA? I would title it, "Already Broken US Immigration Laws: DON'T GO BACK!"
Yea, they are lying.  It is an interrogation techinique.  Police can lie to you during an interrogation.  They can tell you that they are going to search your friends house without a warrant, and that they are going to put you in jail without a hearing in front of a judge.  Anything short of threatening physical violence is ok.   As long as they don't actually go through with the illegal conduct, it is ok.  And the technique obviously works. You should have called the company who you were going to work for, and had the attorney who worked on the H1B come down to the airport to represent you.  Always ask for an attorney.
I know the publisher of this page.  He was a professor at my university.  He has tons of other interesting stuff on his site.
One way of looking at it is like this: suppose we are lost in the wilderness and our leaders are split into two groups.  One group demands that we go north and the other group demands that we go south. The two groups tussle back and forth in such a meaningless fashion it eventually becomes clear to the rest of us that their real objective is to keep everyone where we are so the leaders of the two groups can share the power and control everyone else. Eventually, another group arises that says "Everyone should be free to go in a direction of their choosing and we favor going west."  You personally believe if we go west we would find civilization by reaching a coastline and then heading either north or south until we find a port. The fact the group advocating going west wants to build boats and continue to sail westward after reaching the coastline shouldn't really be an issue for you.  After all, currently you are stuck not making any progress at all. If you support the "lunatic" westies, at least you will get to the coastline and then you can take it from there.  If you continue to support either the "northies" or the "southies" you will just stay where you are.
&gt;the bulk of your discussion here has assumed (a) a uniform probability distribution and  No, it hasn't, because there is no such thing as you and I and several other people have pointed out.  *Other people* keep correcting me by saying "hey, you assumed that there's a uniform probability distriburion on the reals, but there isn't," and I keep saying "no, I didn't assume that, because there is no such thing; all that is required is that  you use a probability density function that is everywhere positive."  What you've just done is incredibly dishonest:  You attributed an intrinsically nonsensical position to me, and then you proceded to refute it.  That's an easy way to make yourself feel good about winning arguments, I guess.  Enjoy yourself. 
On the other hand, I have had Canadian friends (going to U.S. college) refused readmittance for playing online poker.  The INS is far, far more paranoid and anal than it was even 5 years ago.
No Way!
What I meant was that the situation inside the US is just as bad as what he went through during his detainment.
So... proposing an office of censorship, threatening indictments, and calling for execution for treason only amounts to criticism?  It isn't coercion until they follow through?
I agree, in general it does work well.  However, we are currently stuck, like a wheel, in a rut.  Some people push left but then some other people push right.  As a result, we just keep rocking back and forth while the rut gets deeper and harder to get out of. What we need is more people pushing perpendicular to left/right. Now, a perpendicular push isn't likely to get us anywhere either (and is a whole lot harder than pushing left/right which is where the rut helps) **but** if some people push perpendicular while others are rocking left/right then we have a chance to get out of the rut and start moving in a new direction.
Brave new world.
Reddit has a liberal bias.  Nothing will beat my -25 rating for a defense of Foxnews (-14 isnt bad though).
There probably is a warrant for your arrest in the state where you got the ticket. It's a violation, not a crime (as far as I know). If you are flying into the same state, be ready to explain yourself.
That someone could think this was the point of the satirical piece is what really seems to demonstrate a lack of critical thinking skills.
Agreed.  Nonetheless, I rather think that "westerners" in the article means "west europeans".
Ah, memories. ;-)
I forgot to mention that the speeding ticket I got back in 1997 in a state Im not going to now. Does any central, nation-wide, register exist for unpaid traffic tickets?  Im leaving tonight so getting a lawyer and try to pay the ticket is not really an option at this point.
&gt;I agree that it is a very fine distribution. But I suspect you made an error in selecting your P(R), since this probability distribution cannot be applicable to this situation, since the sum of all possible outcomes is greater than 1. Look: &gt;P(0.1) = ~0.559 &gt;P(0.01) = ~0.564 Holy cow, I understand what the problem is now! The problem is that you don't know what a random variable is or what a probability distribution is or what a probability density function is. P(R) is not, as you said, the probability of choosing R.  Since the random variable could have any real value, the probability of choosing any single value of R is zero. Rather, the probability distribution function says what the probability is of choosing R in a particular interval. Specifically, for given a and b, the probability of choosing R with a &lt; R &lt; b is  integral[a to b] P(x) dx. All that the envelope strategy requires for a positive expected return is that this integral be strictly positive for all choices of a and b.  But it clearly is. As to whether a number can be chosen according to such a distribution: Please see (for example) http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Box-Muller_transform. Normally I'd tell you to go  take a class in continuous probability.  But in this case you have a much easier remedy:  Go to school and take just the *first week* of a class in continuous probability.    I don't know why you argued this as much as you did when you must surely realize, at least dimly, that you know nothing, absolutely nothing, about continuous random variables, but I guess that's your problem either way. &gt;&gt;Geez louise, I don't even know where to being answering this one; &gt;That is becoming increasingly evident with every word you say. Well, it's not so easy to correct your complete ignorance of probability theory in a series of Reddit comments, particularly when you don't seem to recognize that you don't know anything about it. I mean, come on!   Why are you yabbling about Kolmogorov's axioms when you don't know what a probability distribution is?  You really ought to know something about a topic before you can start pontificating about it. 
Archie is an artist and author. His work is extremely motivational and exposes the true underbelly of society.
Ah... so his ideas are distasteful, his supporting evidence is readily counterable, and so while his ideas have "a grain of truth" he is ultimately unconvincing.  Not wrong... because along kindergarden lines we are pretending that everything is relative and everybody is right (except Atheist, because he is not trying to be)... just ultimately unconvincing. Also... I cannot fathom how you figure that individual cases of people being like this and being like that has **ANYTHING** to do with pica's views of genetic determinism. So be staunchly committed to ambiguity if you wish, but then do not posture and question my own intellectual integrity.
Makes sense.
Linkjacked (http://www.2ndwindexercise.com/blog/82.htm)
I can't verify the bit about renting machine guns, but I can verify that as a foreign national you pretty much need a passport to buy a drink, or in many cases, even enter a restaurant that serves alcohol in America. This would be interesting only if the first part of the argument can be verified though.
&gt; as if English cooking had ever amounted to anything capable of comparing with southern soul food, texas barbecue, or any restaurant in New York. English cooking is top-notch these days. I believe London now has the most Michelin-starred restaurants outside France.
I have been on the receiving end of such tactics before, and I can confirm it's not pleasant. But in this person's case I have no sympathy. While I was being processed, all around me I saw people who really were trying to pull a fast one, so I had some sympathy for the border police. This guy would be one of the latter. Pupeno's absurd suggestion is that he shouldn't have been treated that way -- because he is a very good liar (!!). However, even in we grant this, we have only his account to go on. He may have been stammering, shifty, or hostile, and although it's unlikely, they might have had a record on him. Rather than have sympathy for this guy, you should have sympathy for [Maher Arar](http://maherarar.ca/), an innocent Canadian computer professional who got shipped off to a Syrian prison and was tortured, just because he made a connecting flight through the USA.
Had to vote down on this comment because the difference between Democrat vs. Republican (or "liberal" vs. "conservative," if you prefer) is the same as the Chevy v. Ford debate. The differences are superficial and choosing either will pretty much get you to the exact same endpoint.
Come back soon...
&gt;I'm pretty sure the strategy KWG defined by {A,B}={N,N+1} defeats the gaussian distribution as well as the exponential one). Why so?  Say that N&gt;0.  I choose R from a gaussian distribution.  Then P(N &lt; R &lt; N+1) = integral{N to N+1} gaussian(x) dx.  But gaussian(x) is strictly positive.  Therefore the integral is strictly positive.  But the integral is exactly the probability of getting case 3, in which I have a guaranteed win.  In other cases, I break even, so my overall expectation is positive. So how does the adversary win, exactly?  
&gt;I don't have any problem with anybody going to Argentina or Spain (if we somehow consider I have the right of opinion for the countries were I have citizenship). And I generally do not have any problem with your coming here.  However, your article implies America is somehow unusual in its treatment of potential immigrants.  What I am saying is every country has effectively the same policy. I see a big advantage in having people come to America, work and make money to take back home: it is like foreign aid but it is earned, not charity, and the money goes directly to those who really need it, not the bureaucrats. If America were ideal, I would see our role something like this: people would come here; make money to lift their families back home out of poverty and get them an education; people would see that government/society should not run on bribes (la mordida) or otherwise be corrupt (this is where the American government also needs work!); and then go home to revitalize and improve their native lands. America would do this because then we would have new friends and trading partners.  You have things I want and I have things you want.  We should trade, be happy, and drink a beer or two. I do find it curious that the company you were coming to interview with didn't make your immigration arrangements for you.  If they don't know enough to handle that then you are probably best off not working for them anyway.  At the very least, they should have vouched for you when you were detained.
Jeremy Clarkson experiences Middle America, finds it's mostly one giant horrifying version of Hazzard County and rants about it. Woo. Yes Jeremy, we've got a LOT of overfed, stupid people suffering from overgrown sense of importance. Thanks for the news flash. Kind of amusing for a quick read, but I can't vote this up. And get it right, Mr Clarkson. We're not a poilce state because you were harassed by some simps over some forms and permits. We're becoming a police state because of the NSA, Homeland Security and our fearmongering, authoritarian federal government.
Actually pupeno the fact that your lied, and broke the law, is the point. I'm amazed that you have missed that fact.
I don't even like guns, and I still thought that was cool.
&gt;the original article does in fact suggest a uniform distribution. As the author of the original article, I think I know what it suggested; it did not suggest a uniform distribution, because there is no such thing---and in fact the article says so explicitly: "It is impossible that b has an equal probability of being every number..." 
with crazy skillz
&gt;  Its syntax owes much to Bash, and its structure owes a lot to Lisp and Befunge. Bash? And Befunge!? Are we supposed to take this seriously?
Our blog about a great new product we are developing to track all forms of advertising and to determine the most valuable.
I am surpised more people don't conjecture that Iran has been the real objective of America's activities since 9/11. If you look at [the map](http://www.lib.utexas.edu/maps/middle_east_and_asia/iran_population_density_2004.jpg) you will see Iran is now nearly surrounded by American forces or countries friendly to our point of view.
Wrong, freedom of speech protects you from the government censoring your speech.  Freedom of association means that the government can't prevent you from meeting with likeminded people, such as the Boy Scouts or an Elk's Club. At least in the United States.
Great book. Great reputation.
The big mistake was that he was an anti-war protester on a march and decided to stop at a VA Hospital that was along the protest route, and was told that he couldn't protest in the building.  The cops acted reasonably here, since he wasn't there to visit patients.  He was just getting a cup of coffee.
&gt; Reddit has a liberal bias. So does reality, I hear.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
FROM THE ARTICLE: "Bush has just been delivered a blow to his case that all of this surveillance is part of the 'war on terror' that began on the morning of 9/11. Bloomberg reports, "The U.S. National Security Agency asked AT&amp;T Inc. to help it set up a domestic call monitoring site seven months before the Sept. 11, 2001 attacks, lawyers claimed June 23 in court papers filed in New York federal court."
Compatriota: There's standard procedure for all tourists traveling abroad, and that is (1) being extremely polite in the host country, *especially* to appointed officials with whom your fate lies; (2) being truthful at all times; and (3) researching the possible, major snags you might encounter and *be prepared for them*. As an Argie myself that might have to visit the EUA in the near future, I'm not without reservations; but I know plenty of people that travel regularly and have no problems whatsoever. Are they just lucky, or simply prepared? And, oh, yes, a better-than-average command of the host's language is a big plus. *Edit:* elpincha, the reply is not meant for you, but for pupeno. Sorry.
&gt; If I showed up in Buenos Aires without enough money to live on, no way of proving I could support myself without engaging in criminal activity, without the full name and contact information of an Argentinian citizen who could vouch for me, do you think I would be just be waved through and told to enjoy my stay? Of course, the answer is "no". You might be surprised. We are pretty accomodating :-)
But only in Florida. I live in Massachusetts.  Massachusetts was going Democratic no matter what happened.  I voted Nader for President (Green), and Carla Howell (Libertarian) for Senate. It was too bad that nader-trader.com went offline before the election.  Would've been nice to see my Nader vote mean a Gore vote in Florida. And yes, that's a hint to ABOLISH THE DAMN ELECTORAL COLLEGE SYSTEM.
Brutally excellent :(
looks SO Photoshopped to me... and where's Toto?
The point being that in order to have some influence, you have to know, and play by, the rules of the game, like them or not.  If you don't like them, by all means, let's try and improve them, no argument from me there.
What is it about guns that makes me go "WANNA HAVE!!!" just as when I was a child? Damn strict German gun control ... well, maybe not =)
Iran war seems to be logical interpolation from the Bush-era foreign policy:" We are the baddest motherfuckers in the earth, who needs foreign policy".  Attacking Iran would mean that supply of oil trough Hormuz would stop until Iran would permit it again. That is little less than half of the world oil consumption. Republicans, neocons and big business lobby may be brave when it comes to attacking the so called "rogue nations" but they still maintain healthy fear of the opinions of the SUV driving registered voters in their mother country. The result is: No independent actions, back to politics. If Russia and China don't co-operate, USA will back away.
I'm surprised that when talking about "globalization", he didn't mention the main obstacle to free trade -- nationalism.  It's really the most pervasive form of marketing around, but is harmful to everyone.
Speed limits should absolutely be enforced on city streets. But most ticket-by-camera schemes involve the far-left lane of the highway, where the traffic (in Ontario) typically moves 120-130kph. Even more ugly are the toll roads that issue you a gov't speeding ticket if your transponder exits the freeway "too quickly" given your entrance time and the speed limit.
&gt;There are no special regulations concerning alcohol and foreign nationals. Offcouse not.  The difference with USA and most other western countries with regards to this is in other countries is that you get asked for ID a lot more in the US.  In most other countries the waiter will ask for ID if he is in doubt.  In USA I've seen waiters ask for ID from people that I would guess had been above leagal drinking age for twenty years.  Why they do this I'm not quite sure, but it sure does seem silly.  Another thing is that while I am quite sure that if I got asked for ID to buy alcohol in any European country, something such as my drivers licence would have been accepted, eventhough it is not formally a legal ID, not so in the US.
speeding tickets aren't that big of a deal here unless you fail to pay them, a friend (citizen) was arrested for having an outstanding speeding ticket.  I assume it would be worse for a foreigner.  call someone in advance would be my advice.
&gt;He also overlooks the way the English class system accepts 'zany' behaviour only from the non-working classes. Have the wrong accent and your eccentricity ends in a police station. What you said is all too true! As for the cooking, I love traditional British fare (fish &amp; chips served in an old newspaper, bangers &amp; mash, bubble &amp; squeak, pork pies, steak &amp; kidney pie, shepherd's pie, ecclescakes, battenberg cake, etc. are all very yummy to me!). Full disclosure: I am half-English and grew up splitting my time between the Manchester area and Dixie.  I loved the school lunches we got at Altrincham Grammar School for Boys but I also make my own barbeque (real hickory smoked Carolina stuff, not what ought to be properly called "grilling").
Fact is, the people doing those things aren't in government - they're in the media.  No one elected them, and consequently they have no power to follow through on any of these things.  And what they're saying is protected by the First Amendment. I supported Kerry in '04, and will almost certainly support the Dem candidate in '08.  Does that mean that, if I do something stupid like call for all red state citizens to lose their voting rights, that those opinions should be attributed to the party?
I want this guy on my side if the US government ever gets out of hand ;)
Exactly. That's the point he's making in the article. &gt; You need a permit to do everything in America. &gt; But interestingly you don’t need one if you wish to rent some guns and some bullets. Isn't the passport passport thing an aside?  It's either sloppy writing from the author or sloppy understanding on my part...
Thanks! I'll keep that in mind, I love travelling and Argentina is on my list of places to visit.  I'd like to do it while on a trip to visit some friends in Chile.
Hey, I am a liberal.  But I'm also anti-dumbassery, and this article is full of it.
Fixed
They ask everyone to avoid offending those who look young but who are actually legal.  Rather than offend some, just ask everyone.
More like uninspiring play by the Brazilian eleven. They made Croatia, Ghana, Australia and, for a while, even Japan look good.  Then they played a decent side, and of course, they made them look excellent.  If only they'd pretended to be in a commercial...
Missing the point. There are associations with meaning, and associations without. The example that Vonnegut uses in Cat's Cradle (his best book, imho), are "Hoosiers". A character is overjoyed that she meets someone else from Indiana, even though she had little else in common with them, and began ascribing him all the positive characteristics of a Hoosier. Liking the same author or attending the same class doesn't make you similar to someone else, but it certainly gives you a common experience to share. So long as you don't consider the world as Dostoyevsky fans vs everyone else, I don't think Vonnegut would bother to mock you.
That looks like SO much fun. -- Crazy American.
My Favorite Quote from the article "I just the other day got, an internet was sent by my staff at 10 o'clock in the morning on Friday and I just got it yesterday. Why? Because it got tangled up with all these things going on the internet commercially."
Very Cool Thought.....
&gt; So I told them that I spent a year in USA from 2001 to 2002 (I was mistaken, it was from 2002, to 2003, but it was an honest mistake). So he asked me what I did during that time. So far so good, I replied "tourism". He asked where I worked. And I told him that I didn't work.   One year in the US ?  Just being a "tourist" ?  That would make anybody suspicious.
Ok, I'm sure there's some reason you could get fired for telling the press that your employer's products are shoddy and overpriced. But they still can't censor your speech. That was my only point.
The events of September 11, 2001, seem to have shown a prime example of realistic group conflict theory. Attacking the United States of America as a whole broke down the bickering between "liberal" and "conservative" sides of the country and brought the nation together as a cohesive whole. A common enemy forced a falling, divided house to unify. (Although who knew what bitter rivalry was to come in the bumbling response to that day?) So, we know how to help bring people together - giving them a common goal towards which to strive - but how do we maintain that bond? Anybody?
In the interest of ant-dumbassery I suggest you reconsider posting any more comments.
Doesn't look very seaworthy, bring a life jacket.
And this is why I don't believe (in) god.
Yeah, tried that. Run off road by pickup trucks (delibertely, I know because they were yelling out the window and laughing while doing it) TWICE. Run into curb by someone doing a right around me ONCE. Forced to wipe out by someone doing a left around me TWICE. Forced to dodge through traffic by morons parked in the bike lane (despite signage) COUNTLESS TIMES. Almost-doored: ABOUT TEN TIMES The message I've learned from all of this: Ride in a big tanky car and be safe. Unless you are blessed to live somewhere that has bike lanes that are separate from the main traffic flow. Here in Ontario that limits you to Ottawa.
We can observe musical theory.  We can observe Gravitational theory.  We cannot observe Evolutionary theory.
While pathetic, this fulfils a very actual human need: to belong. It's like Mouse says in the Matrix: *Pay no attention to these hypocrites, Neo! To deny our own impulses, is to deny the very thing that makes us human.*
2nd comment: *the only thing this really shows is how small the actual number of Alexa Users is ... and that again shows how useless Alexa is* exactly.
I don't see it with Ford or Chevy now.  But there are other brands that have been *very* successful with granfalloon tactics.  Apple's the perfect example: look at how Mac users view "those poor Windows" folks, or how everybody wants an IPod and not just some generic MP3 player. Or look at the programming language debates that crop up here.  Lisp vs. Haskell vs. Python vs. Ruby vs. Java, and just about everyone has their pet favorite.  And the language wars are more heated the more similar the languages are.  Python vs. Ruby can get downright vicious, but both languages are basically the same.  Common Lisp vs. Scheme also has its share of partisans. Or colleges.  I went to Amherst.  Amherst has a huge rivalry with Williams.  Williams and Amherst are essentially the same in terms of quality of instruction, structure, college experience, etc.  The majority of students at each institution applied to the other, and most got into both places.  Yet go visit the Ephs vs. Jeffs football game for homecoming, and you'll see just how divided people can get.  Many other colleges have similar rivalries - d'you think Harvard and Yale are really that different, or is the real difference between someone who went to Harvard and someone who went to UMass?  Basically all the Ivies are the same, all the top liberal arts colleges are the same, most (I won't say all) of the state universities are the same - yet you have much fiercer in-group-out-group dynamics within a group than between groups. Didn't Freud have something to say about this?  The Narcissm of Small Differences or something like that?   
So how do you explain all the crimes committed by packs of wild white Americans? Maybe they had some receding black genes in their family?  Jesus.
Notice how the people always keep their guns pointed into the air, the ground, or downrange, as well as keeping their fingers off the trigger when they don't intend to shoot.  This is a great example of basic gun safety. The other great thing about gun celebrations is that nobody ever goes nuts and shoots up the place like they do in "gun-free" zones.  If they did they'd be dead in seconds.
10X VERY MUCH THIS IS REALLY EASY :)
&gt; Another thing is that while I am quite sure that if I got asked for ID to buy alcohol in any European country, something such as my drivers licence would have been accepted, eventhough it is not formally a legal ID, not so in the US. I am a foreign national in the US (or at least was until very recently) and I have never been asked to show my passport when ordering a drink. I have been carded many times but in each case any card with a photograph on it has been sufficient. In fact I have even shown a library card once or twice which has no photo on it.
Right.  I forgot that, if I disagree with you, it means I should shut up.
Well I guess I'll have to use some other phrase than 'its just a theory'. How about this: Evolutionary Theory is so statistically unlikely and so incomplete in explanation, that believing such a theory constitues "fact" or "truth" is far more wild-eyed and closed-minded than concluding that there must be a creator and seeking him out. I'd also say that a large percentage of Americans as well as the overwhelming majority of the world do not believe the Theory of Evolution.  Please, come down off your high horse of science and realize that thinking through complicated, non-supernatural thought processes doesn't make you any better than the rest of us.
thank u for helping me: joseph sammut   
&gt;You regurgitate way too much rhetoric for me to think you have a solid foundation And then... &gt;We have observed speciation, but it's slow. The few candidate speciations are not quite obvious yet, and without doubt, several of them will be disqualified. Believe me, the whole "well, we haven't seen speciation because it's just too damn slow" is just as tiring as the "omg god made us all!!!111" argument. 
I don't understand your logic here.  It seems like you should be ok with Rosa being charged with trespassing, since she was asked by someone in authority to move from a restricted area.  (I don't want to put words in your mouth--I honestly don't understand why you feel the analogy doesn't fit.) 
I could say the same about evolution:  we all evolved from a single celled organism, but where, exactly, did this single-celled organism come from?  So far explanations have been far from conclusive.
Dear sweet lord, that rocked. Shooting aside, that guy is an example of the amazing potential we as humans possess. Few have skills that eyecatching because few devote their lives to extremely specialized pursuits.
piece of historical trivia
Death threats aren't protected speech, but outside of that, they have a right to say what they want.  Why do you point this out like it's an argument of some sort?  The premise of any debate is that the participants have the right to speak; we can act as if that one is settled. But since you seem to think its important, let me remind you that I also have a right to say that the people speaking for censorship are misleading, threatening, hypocritical, inordinately stupid, outright dangerous, and absolutely wrong.  I can also point out that most of the talking heads spouting this crap are politically aligned with the people in power, that members of congress are starting to use the treason talking point, and that speaking out against this mental diarrhea is the only way to prevent it from ballooning into actual action.  
&gt; Does any central, nation-wide, register exist for unpaid traffic tickets? No idea. There is a nation-wide system for warrants of any kind, though. You could say, "I came back to pay my parking ticket."
I take a piss, I see my penis, I automatically think of a Boa Constrictor or a Summer Sausage.  I don't know why....   
You should be in the clear.  There is no nationwide system for traffic violations, Americans are too paranoid for that.  However, if you do re-enter the state and are stopped by a police officer, you will be arrested.
So you're saying if Al Gore had been president instead of Bush, things would have turned out the same as they are right now???
[Nothing?](http://reddit.com/info/6xmp/comments/c6yy5)
&gt; a way to circumvent your local countries laws and taxes I.e., a data haven?
That was my thought. Did I hear right that the girls sing "we know that you're gay"?
Ok.  Here's the essence of the 'Creationsim Vs. Evolution' argument: Both sides assume certain things.  For the most part, Evolutionists assume two things: 1) Secular Humanism.  God doesn't exist, and even if he does he doesn't EVER interact with the earth or interfere in its natural processes. 2) Religious Pluralism.  One religion cannot have the monopoly on spiritual truth.  You cannot claim to know any truth that is exclusive to your religious thought. Most Creationists assume: 1) God/a god does or CAN exist, and he can/does interact with the world and/or interfere with the natural processes in the universe. If evolutionists remove their base assumptions take a look at both theories, you'll see that it isn't such an open/close, science vs "unscience" debate, and more of an "ok, where's the evidence?" question.
Sadly, I wish more articles of this nature were posted and that people would read them so that their arguments (on either side) would be more poignant. Thanks for trying, at least.
lol.  I was using the 'communist' question as a parallel to the 'are you living in fear?' question. I'm just pointing out that both sides of the spectrum have these token questions they throw at each other.  The "are you a communist?" was the classic conservative token question.
I don't know about you, but I get serious red flags whenever I see the word "sacred" used in a non-ironic context. Here are some facts.  There is no God.  Humans are on their own.  Human institutions, like Democracy, the Press, the US Government, and the New York Times, are not sacred.  They are simply bunches of humans who have chosen to cooperate.  When institutions cease to become useful, they should dissolve.  There are no immortal institutions. When you say the US Government should not be able to keep secrets from the New York Times, what you're saying is essentially that the New York Times is, in practice, part of the US Government.  You have essentially appointed this institution as the official declassification organ of the US Government.  It is now only nominally nongovernmental, just as, for example, the Federal Reserve is nominally a private company.  In practice, you have an official press. At this point you have four options.   You can decide that (a) since the press is part of the government, it makes no sense that its officials are not appointed through the democratic process, and pass a law that editors of major newspapers must be confirmed by the Senate. You can decide that (b) the press is, like the Federal Reserve, too important to be subject to democracy, since its role is to maintain healthy public opinion in a progressive society and not reinforce popular prejudices such as racism, "intelligent design," a "sacred" flag which should not be "desecrated," and other ridiculous ideas that are commonly held and should be eradicated. Or you can decide that (c) an official press is a bad thing, and that the New York Times should have no more power to publish secrets of the US government than any random blogger has.  This is the equivalent of saying the US government should have no secrets.  This is pretty much the equivalent of saying the US government should not exist at all, at least in anything like its present form. Or you can decide that (d) TFA is fundamentally misguided, and the national security state is a good thing which in fact protects our national security. Personally, I favor (c) with maybe a tiny, tiny bit of (d).  But I'm curious to know if anyone can think of any other logical possibilities, or can come up with a reasonable way of defending (a) or (b). 
I did not say that, fool. I said we have, and it's subtle. It's the kind of thing that makes the science journals but not "Christianity Today" magazine. And don't tell me you don't read that shit, because that's exactly where you heard the "micro vs. macro" argument, which is a joke. We've observed speciation in things as big as insects. The thing is, people are wanting to be certain before we break out the champagne bottles. You should try reading more.
Or maybe just fancyful reporting. I did a media report for my university not long ago comparing two tellings of the same incident by journalists from The Guardian and The Times. What in the Guardian was "we heard a shot in the distance" turned into "we came under fire" in The Times. The Guardian correspondent was told calmly by the officer in charge to lay on the ground. In The Times the officer began screamin, Hollywood style: "Hit the Ground! Hit the Ground!" To top it off, for The Guardian reporter, the whole incident lasted for "only a few moments" between the group hearing the shot and the officer being told that the the shot had been a warning shot from an Afghan guard at the military base they were walking towards (it was night time and he didn't know they were approaching). In a parallel universe, the Times correspondent turned it into the "45 longest minutes of my life".  The temptation to embellish war stories by war correspondents must be inmense.
It looks to me like it owes everything to TCL.
The Da Vinci code hysteria springs to mind...
Did anybody else notice that "pupeno", the guy featured in another other reddit front-page story: http://reddit.com/info/955k/comments  left a comment on this blog? Weird.
that hath such people in it.
Bullshit. I propose "intelligent falling" as the reason something moves toward "down" any time you drop it. The Creator watches all things, and whenever He sees something unsupported, He uses His invisible magical hands to push it downward. There. Oh, and btw... it's the height of stupidity to claim that we can't watch evolution. It's quite obvious that we can, the only big question is how long must we be patient before we can expect to see something interesting. Surely that occurred to you?
The link is to the abstract. [Here’s the full PDF](http://www-personal.umich.edu/~atreya/Articles/!Atreya_Mars_oxidants.pdf).
&gt; You have 5-10 seconds attention on average - if you're lucky - to get a potential customer to your review site's homepage and to determine what your product does and if it is relevant. Links to back up this claim?  I agree with the essential point, I'm just curious as to the basis of this particular assertion. 
Statistics is funny.  Try this: throw a six-sided die about 100,000 times and write down each number you get in sequence.  Then stare at that sequence and marvel at the fact that that particular sequence only had a 1 in 6^100,000 chance of happening, and yet you are so incredibly, miraculously lucky as to now be in its infinitesimally unlikely presence.  Another way to think of it: evolution might be a ridiculously unlikely outcome in the space of possible initial configurations, but if it hadn't happened, we wouldn't be here to boggle at the unlikelihood of it.  It's called the anthropic principle if you want to look at the idea in greater depth. As for being incomplete in explanation, well, them's the breaks.  Science works with what it has, and unfortunately what it has right now is an infinitesimally small portion of space and time, and the limited intelligence of humans.  I'm curious, though, as to why you're so eager to discard what little explanatory power science does have in favor of an idea that doesn't really explain anything at all, but instead just ascribes phenomena to a proxy phenomena we could never even hope to begin to understand.  Why is "God did it" more intellectually satisfying to you than "DNA through mutation and crossover, etc., did it"? Anyways, if I can sum up what I gather your beliefs to be, taken from this and some of your other posts:  science should back off because it's too hard to understand and it makes people feel like their life doesn't have purpose.  Instead, to show that it isn't arrogant, science should embrace a message that's easy to understand and makes people feel good about themselves.  That message is "God did it, and you shouldn't worry so much about how."
Yes, please listen to this guy, if you are going to come to the USA, break immigration laws and go back to your country then please "Do not go (back) to the USA". Sound advice.
"Reddit has a liberal bias" because typically, a liberal is someone under 20 years old who probably wouldn't vote to begin with.
I think it's still all in hygiene. You work out, you have to shower after. I hardly work out any more and still don't get colds often, mainly, I think, because I wash my hands often. Your physical fitness probably plays a huge part is how *long* you have a cold though.
This was my post: http://reddit.com/info/73ce/comments/c745c
Note that attributing this speech to Kennedy is conventional, but wrong - he just read it in front of a bunch of people.  It was almost certainly written by one of his speechwriters, such as Arthur Schlesinger, Ted Sorensen, etc.
note that I don't agree with the article's conclusions... see my comment (#7). see also the guy's [previous post](http://plentyoffish.wordpress.com/2006/06/30/constantly-changing-paradigms/).
Too much information
We can't do that. Your assumptions are dangerous to everyone, everywhere all over the planet. Particularly in the medical field, but also in environmentalism. If you insist on having such absurd creeds, fine, but you no longer get to drive.
That's funny, because whenever I see a boa constrictor or a summer sausage, I think of your mom.  /snap
&gt;I have seen it, and worse, in other English speaking countries. Statements like that always bother me because they seem to imply that the US has a monopoly on the grammatically incapable/lazy/inept/stupid depending on wording and/or subject. Not saying anything about you specifically, just explaining why I felt the need to comment on this. Sure, ineptitude exists everywhere, but I've only seem USians make the mistake I chastised so I said so. If it were a mancunian saying misusing "well" instead of "very" then I would have said I'd only seen mancunians do it. I think you're being overly defensive of USian ineptitude or detecting a prejudice where I don't think it exists.
DNA Sniffing of the future
I thought she was trying to be a 'model' not and 'actress'. To model you have to be at least 5'7" and have the right proportions. To be an actress height doesn't really matter. Tons of actresses are under 5'5" (Reese Witherspoon, Christina Ricci for example)
Sorry, no again.  You're not very good at this.  When does evolution rely on the idea that there is no God?  You can point to individual scientists who use the theory to justify atheism, but you can't really point to any part of theory that would suddenly be falsified if God decided to show up.  Science does make assumptions, but none of those assumptions necessarily contradict the idea of God.  They might contradict *your* idea of God, but that's your problem, not science's.
I blame this on th elack of authority of other countries. Argentina and Brazil and ANY OTHER country MUST provide full assistence to their citzens when travelling abroad.
Who said the government shouldn't be allowed to keep secrets from the New York Times?  If we wanted to have the debate about how secretive the government can be, I don't think anyone would advocate that only the New York Times have access (except for maybe the New York Times).  The "debate" we're having now is about if once the New York Times has obtained those secrets they have the right to print them.  The idea that NYT becomes an official press by publishing what the government doesn't want published is a little too newspeak for me.
Wrong.  I've seen condom machines while taking a piss. I didn't get an insta-erection and start humping the urinal. Even had I been 14 at the time, I wouldn't have... I might have chuckled at it. But it's mostly encouragement-neutral, maybe even slightly discouraging. Who the hell wants to use a rubber? They don't feel so great, they're messy to dispose of after use, and I don't know anyone that likes them other than they really have to use them anyway.  Add to that that they're reminders of how horribly wrong sex could go if you didn't use them, and hell, we might see a slight decrease in sexual promiscuity if they were available. I can tell you one thing though... make it so that the kid has to go to the office to get the things, and they'll never use them.
use transcode/mencoder for free instead.
The VFS layer was coded too specific for ext.  There were LOTS of problems with this combo in the 2.2 kernel.  The issues were mostly cleared up in later version of 2.2 and 2.4, BUT...  I have still had issues with NFS on both reiser and xfs as of last year.  I was also having problems with LVM2 searching endlessly for volumes in devfs.   NFS has never worked well for me on linux.  Solaris or BSD is OK, but exporting anyting from linux just never worked well for too long.  Exporting NFS from anything other than ext exhibits more problems over the above.  A google search for reiserfs and nfs unearths a lot of threads detailing peoples problems with the two.
I'm sorry, but you are wrong. If only things were so clear-cut...The U.S.A. has become a pretty much hostile country to foreigners, unless they have an European/Canadian  passport. Stories abound. It is a amazing how much harassment they'll put college professors through. My recommendation is to always get phone numbers and letters of people organizing the event, hotel details, etc. Unfortunately, sometimes such contacts aren't done in due time, in which case you may get royally fscked by the brainless immigration guy (with bad shoes).  I've had the displeasure of witnessing the immigration gorilla make a lady in front of the line (Brazilian, too) go through the same jail routine. She was also going to a conference (about Architecture), but the immigration gorilla got all paranoid.   
&gt;until Iran would permit it again I'm thinking that if the U.S. went to war with Iran, it would be days, at most, before Iran's ability to *stop* the flow of oil through the Gulf was pretty much zero. It would take longer to get Iran's oil flowing again, of course. That doesn't mean that I think it would be a good idea; there would be lots of negative consequences. But militarily, I don't see Iran as stopping the U.S. for long.
Someone who's really trying to make a difference, made a huge difference in both adults and children's lives in a far away country using just the good will donations from her friends before she left.  People typically pitched in US$20 each, and she had enough to make real improvements in some pretty impoverished places in Peru.  She's doing what a lot of us, I suspect, might wish we were doing; maybe more of us should follow her model?  Anyway, I thought you'd all appreciate it.
That sir, is not true. The blog post on which a Darwin developer complains that the x86 source was no longer available was a falsehood. His biggest complaint is that the community-built tools used to build the Darwin source do not work, so the Darwin community is dependent on Apple to provide timely builds. They were not providing timely builds of x86. It turns out that the engineers working changes on the x86 source tree were diverted to help with mac book pro heat issues.
Yeah, but invading Iran is subject to the same long-term difficulties (and costs) that Iraq has seen.  Regardless of what the neocons might like to do, I think Bush would have difficulty making a political case. The public has seen too much of Iraq, and the whole "weapons of mass destruction" thing blew a lot of credibility.  Then again, maybe that's wishful thinking.
"Science" is possible without evolutionary theory.  It's even possible without secular humanism.  I don't think science should back off all things; hell I don't care if people still want to study evolution.   **But it's important that if you're going to teach a theory, you should make its limitations known.**  The problem many creationsists have is not that evolution is taught; even I want my kids to be educated on the Theory of Evolution.  **The problem is that its taught as fact.**  Some biology teachers don't leave room for questioning the Theory.  They teach in absolutes, that you were evolved, NOT created.  A good teacher should be able to explain the theories along with the limitations and holes in the theories that cause scientists to keep studying it. I understand that ID/ Creation science is a "backwards" science.  We don't seek to explain how we came about (cuz god did it, duh), but how to explain the universe in terms of 10,000 years.  It's not a "hard" science.  It's a reactionary science.  If evolution didn't overwrite the scientific world, we wouldn't have to say anything.  **Now, 150 years after darwin, creationsist simply want to say "wait... I think that it is possible that all this evidence can be explicable in terms of a god creating the world about 10,000 years ago."**  I can see how this "regressive" approach could seem to some as "circular". As far as arrogance is concerned, all I hear is people calling creationists "idiots" or "nitwits" because we don't make the same assumptions they do.  "Science" is a subject of study, but some people make it into their lives and it begins to cross into a religious boundary.  They, basing their entire lives NOT off of what's "empirical", but a dichotamy between what is "natural" and "supernatural", then look down their noses at those who don't look at everything through the same rigid, impractical viewpoint.  Anyone who accepts the "super-natural" is "unscientific" and an idiot. Science is great, but it isn't as critical as some people make it out to be.  Medical research is great and has done some really wonderful things, but there are still primative cultures around the world that have longer life-expectancies of most western countries, without all the healthcare and medicine.  It seems medical technology, for the most part, is just making up for the fact that we're destroying our bodies with horrible diets and no exercize. That, to me, seems circular. Technology is great too.  It allows us to stay connected, earn money, and built stuff.  But it doesn't make us happier.  It doesn't make the world a better place.  I look around and we're still fighting about the same things we've fought about for centuries.  Advancing technology has produced little "progression", in the sense that many people who swear by "science" think it does.
Out of curiosity where do you live? I used to ride avidly (&gt;150 miles per week) and never had problems like that.
modding down for being full of shit
Well, neither did Israel now that I think about it.
You are absolutely right about being prepared. I comment this on another thread. I also agree about having better than average command. Unfortunately, not all people have it. For instance: you may be a student going for a Master's degree which includes, as a part fo your program, a 3-monthe intensive/immersive training in the English language. Which means that by the time you arrive in front of the immigration gorilla, you do not have enough command to talk nicely to the guy and answer all his questions. Usually that's ok because they'll get an officer who speaks your language, but still, you might get all confused...Immigration people are *not* nice people, usually, and this sets a bad psychological climate.  Not all people have been adequately warned or instructed on how to proceed with the immigration police.
It is  a lot easier to stop the flow than keeping it running. Iran might not even need more than a few "insurgents" to do that.
The post [Post more non porn to nsfw.reddit.com  ](http://reddit.com/info/95as/comments) on the regular reddit has currently 7 up and 6 down votes. :-( 
Could you give me anecdotal evidence of a de facto standard and market leader for a certain segment going under without any of their intellectual property being bought up by potential competitors eager to either gain more marketshare or break into the market?  Computer sofware markets trend towards winner take all. Which  is why governments use such wonderfully open formats like .doc and PDF.  Also, applications that end up being the de facto standard usually have third party vendors who provide compatibility. I'm sure there are ProTools plug-ins that provide new file format capabilities, just as DataViz provides cross-office suite compatibility.  Also, the point that DigiDesign somehow "Abandons" ProTools does not stop my existing copy from working.  Will I conceed that open file formats are a good idea? Yes. Am I going to change my life to revolve around them? No.  Am I going to applaud others who do? Not really.
Why does that gun have so little recoil? Or is it just a toy?
Well, that's kind of the point of articles like this; namely, to increase awareness of this efficient mode of transport in an effort to influence policy to make more bicycle-friendly cities.
Soooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo boring.
There's your 'November Surprise'...
What kind of assistance do you mean? Other than having a passport (which in Brazil you can only get if you don't have a criminal record), you can't really expect a public officers in such a huge country (180,000,000) to cater to each and every person taking an airplane to another country.  This should be the job of the American embassy, but they are notoriously rude (you must get a Visa there) in the two largest offices (São Paulo and Rio de Janeiro).
But why do they have to put people in a cell with a toilet with no doors? That's jail treatment...It's absurd!
I can see you guys have little knowledge of shotguns. They spray pellets in a cone, not a single bullet, so shooting like that with a shotgun that has no recoil is not a big deal.  (Normally the recoil would prevent you from aiming again quickly enough.) Now, if he can pull that off with a pistol, which I have seen done, that's another matter.
The term "dittohead" doesn't fit the pattern, as it isn't a term Rush invented or used. It was a slam /against/ Rush invented by his left-wing critics. In the context of the Rush Limbaugh show, ditto means "I enjoy the show", not "I agree with Rush's opinions". The way "ditto" came about is that a few callers who liked the show would waste too much time saying "I really enjoy your show" prior to getting to the point of their question or response or comment. "ditto" helps move this along, expressing the sentiment "Just like the last caller, I, too, like your show"  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dittohead
These dirty secrets are hardly an American phenomenon, the fact is the goverment rarely represents the people no matter which country you choose to focus on. Your goverment is never to be trusted.
&gt;Here are some facts. There is no God. Just curiously, how is that a fact?  Now don't get me wrong: you can't quite prove that a god exists.  But just the same, you can't very well disprove his existence.  I suspect you criticize those who believe in a god to be doing so for emotional reasons, and ignoring reason.  But just the same, isn't disbelieving in any god based on emotion? -- in the least, it is not based in logic or science, which simply is not suited to answer the question.  Sorry for off-topic rant.
Yeah, he's good at shooting stuff that's falling down.
You mean you're playing the *devil's advocate*?
1. Apple is not a de facto standard. Nor are they market leaders.  They just have a loyal following.  2. Find me something current that still reads WordStar or Ami Pro documents,   3. Governments are moving away from proprietary formats, and moving towards formats like OpenDocument. &gt; Also, the point that DigiDesign somehow "Abandons" ProTools does not stop my existing copy from working. When your Mac breaks down, or the next Apple OS update that renders old software incompatible, your copy "stops working". &gt; Will I conceed that open file formats are a good idea? Yes. Am I going to change my life to revolve around them? No Noone has forced you to, but I personally applaud people that choose to work only in open formats.
Yale is way better than Harvard. Obviously. And how many US Presidents are Brown alumni?
Air force one is silver..
We really need to figure out how to elect only people who can admit to their own flaws and holes in their knowledge and who vote only after consulting experts in the field (preferably ones that aren't bought by any corporation).
You have to understand that Israeli press is suffering from the battered woman syndrome. They think that the actions of the Palestinians are in provocation of Israel. When in reality it's not.
Is this news to someone?
It is actually unknown if it is a real story or made up one: http://www.snopes.com/college/exam/barometer.asp But it's funny nevertheless.
&gt; but I can verify that as a foreign national you pretty much need a passport to buy a drink I can verify that as a foreign national I have never needed a passport to buy a drink, not once in the 3 years I have lived here.
I would be surprised if there was even a warrant.
You don't know what the hell you are talking about.  While it is true that the pattern of shot (pellets) does form a cone, it is an extremely narrow one.  At the range that he was mostly shooting at, the spread pattern was probably about the diameter of a dinner plate.  In fact, you can deduce this from this video.  Did you notice that the clay pigeons (orange discs) were sometimes clustered very close together?  And did you then notice that he had to shoot each one seperately, ie a single shot was not capable of hitting them all at once?   Is is most certainly a big deal to be able to do that.
Forgotten?  Forgotten by whom?  It's alive and well in my nation's news media. If it's not in yours, ask your news sources why. Yes, DO blame your messenger.
&gt; TMAP guidelines were formulated by a consensus panel whose opinions were solicited by pharmaceutical companies that sponsored TMAP. The TMAP formularies recommend the drugs manufactured by those companies that are all on patent, very expensive, and have no better safety or effectiveness profiles than older, cheaper drugs that themselves are not very safe or effective. This is the kind of amazingly scary shit you get when your "leaders" have close ties to corporate interests and no conscience whatsoever.  I wonder how long it will be before anyone can be declared insane by the state and forced into such a program.  And you thought protesting was dangerous now...
Yea I agree, I don't know where his assertion that the GOP is anti-Jewish comes from.
Oh, so used to sizes stated in KB that I totally overlook it. Thanks for correcting that.
Well, barely anything to Befunge, as should hopefully be clear from the examples. Just the idea of self-modification, which is more prevalent in lisp and so on; but it's not a funge derivative.
Any resemblance between Pluvo and Tcl is purely coincidental. On the other hand, the Perl6 idioms keep on creeping in...
and what do you say to the argument that higher crime rates among blacks (if they do exist, which I'm not sure) have more to do with levels of education?
Exactly. That's why you should be extra carefull if said government makes it a crime to reveal it's dirty secrets.
The question all of you should ask is: Do we want Iran to have nuclear weapons.  If yes, US should do nothing.  If not, see the title.
A declaration of war carries the implicit recognition of statehood, something Israel is probably not eager to do.
Why would that be? Don't you think the U.S. have some nice landscapes to offer that could delay boredom for a year?
That is perhaps the finest kick in the groin I've ever seen someone perform on those trying to bring us back into the dark ages.
&gt; The law affects both those under 21 and establishments which serve alcohol. If a business sells alcohol to someone under 21, they can be fined or, worse, have their liquor license revoked. The same applies in other countries too, you know.  But other countries seem a lot more relaxed than the USA. In my experience, the bars/restaurants/clubs are the ones that are up-tight, but convenience stores are pretty lax. Perhaps it's a consequence of this bizarre ban you have on under-21s drinking alcohol.  It's very odd to be an adult and drink legally for three years, only to visit the USA and be told that you're still a child and aren't allowed to drink alcohol. 
&gt;Yea, they are lying Then, they are breaking the rules that they are holding people in preson for! Amazing!
He just reinvented Lisp Macros (or he is on the path to reinvent them).
If the voting system wasn't totally broken in favour of a two-party system, you'd be able to vote with your conscience and still default to Gore if he's your second choice. [The Condorcet method](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Condorcet_method) fixes this problem. But how many politicians who are benefiting from the two-party bias are going to fix the voting system so that it is no longer biased in their favour?
&gt;America is the only country to have used WMDs against civilians. Remember Hiroshima and Nagasaki? American bombs, Little Boy and Fat Man, killed 66 and 39,000 innocent civilians respectively. I find this the most damning. Thousands of civilians were killed in one decisive, calculating move.
Your USA created all buslhits in the world. Still making it in Iraq.
Right, because that's all there is to it. By the way, what countries do you want to have nuclear weapons?
There are hazards in the city, but it's not really as bad all that. I ride fairly regularly in Toronto, and daily in Waterloo. Both places seem to have fairly spacious roads and decent enough drivers to share em with.
This sounds completely insane. I'm speechless.
None,  but we can't do anything about it now.
Well the experiment suggests that good relations persist after the bonding effort, except maybe when this effort fails and the groups try to blame each other for the failure. I would say the salient question is: What kind of common goal would it take to unite the world ? Massive bird flu outbreak ? Peak oil ? Alien invasion ? 
Only in America.
I dont know whats worse, the way he was treated, or that it looks to be MANY americans can come on here and DEFEND that treament. That's way more of a reason not to go. The people are the government. It's no use to believe the us government would be any more compassionate than their citizens.  oh and as a personal anecdote, an associate at work had gone there and ended up getting a speeding ticket. The "redneck cop" (his words not mine hes an indian (hindu)) tied him up with one of those zap strap type things that you use to tie cables and dragged him to jail. They towed his car and the officer didnt even tell his friend he was with, what precinct/district office the cop was from. So he basically called every shariffs office in the area untill they found him. He had to deposit a 5k USD bond before his friend could get him and his car back. They then left the country and retained a lawyer to try and pay the ticket and get their bond back. so i personally, have no doubt in believing this guys story.
Oh yay, another oncoming brawl about religion.  Stop beating the dead horse.
Force them to disarm. The US has enough leavarage on some countries to accomplish that. But we know that'll never happen.
http://sushiotaku.blogspot.com/2006/07/sunday-sushi.html
I think it's important to note now that I'm not calling you an idiot because you believe in God.  I'm calling you an idiot because you make arguments like "Evolution is just a theory", and because you expect other people to change what they're doing because you've had the wonderful insight that a hypothetical omnipotent power could do stuff using that omnipotence.   Of course all of this could be explained in terms of an omnipotent God.  That's tautological with the term "omnipotent God".  Evolution could have been set into motion by an omnipotent God billions of years ago, or everything as it exists right now could have been instantly formed a fraction of a second ago at a whim.  So why do you insist on 10,000 years?  You talk about the incredulity of statistics of evolution, and yet you're perfectly satisfied to settle on one number out of the infinity of God's power. The reason you do this has nothing at all to do with God.  It has everything to do with religion.  You have a book that lays out a geneaology that says the earth is 10,000 years old, and if the truth is anything besides 10,000 years, then you have to stop believing that book.  But that's idiotic.  Why would an omnipotent God be bound by the cryptic words of a book that we know was written and assembled by men?   There are several types of leaps of faith.  One is that you believe what you are told by other people.  Another is that you believe what you see around you in the world.  At a most basic level I have no idea which one is right.  At a higher level, though, I know that people lie and cheat and are otherwise awful to one another.  I've observed that wars have been fought over whether or not God is actually described by this book or that book.  I've heard with my own ears the hypocritical lies men tell to get and keep power over other men.  Tell me, who should I believe?  You?  The Bible?  The Quran?  Or mountains of objective evidence that I can at any time inspect for myself?  A community formed around a text, where disagreements are settled with genocide, or a community formed around a process, where thousands have managed to argue and wrangle over the evidence to produce a remarkably consistent model of nature without resorting to slaughtering each other?  Where a fundamentalist is someone who thinks young girls should have their clitoris cut out, or where a fundamentalist is someone who thinks we shouldn't have to add 6 extra dimensions to the math to make everything fit together?  Where revelation happens to special chosen individuals who alone have claim to truth, or where claims are made in the open in the hopes that someone will verify them independently? *edited to remove excessively rude comment*   
Is she spreading the plague now?
I'm sure they can set up a payment plan.
Excuse me, but *any* Israel-related article on Wikipedia is highly suspect, the sockpuppets there are working 24/7 to impose Zionist propaganda on free-thinking people as fact.
That doesn't change the fact that Palestinian civilians are being made to suffer collectively.
Pretty misleading title... A Turkish article of low quality mentions a single, ultra liberal Israeli paper's editorial disagreeing with the govt.'s actions... The other main paper in Israel, the Jerusalem Post doesn't agree...
If you consider ignorance a plague, yes.
In reading the description it doesn't seem quite finished
What a lovely one-sided piece. I distinctly remember Saddam Hussein [using chemical weapons on his own citicens, the Kurds](http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ei/rls/18714.htm). Also, in a state of war (even the Cold War), you back those groups that represent your own interests. The Soviets were a bigger problem with their expansion of communism, so back the Muhajideen. I'm not advocating the fact that they ditched them in Afghanistan after the Soviets were pushed back, but at the time it made the most sense militarily. Lastly, I don't see the connection when the US gave the Shah-ruled Iran nuclear technologies and condemns Ahmadinejad  for trying to create nuclear technology (and possibly weapons) on their own. The Shah was friendly towards the US and Ahmadinejad wants to destroy the US. Do you think they the US is going to help Ahmadinejad get nuclear technology? I fail to see the hypocrisy.
I read it as ID-- nobody has to have a passport or permit to buy alcohol, you just need some form of ID.
Thank you for your answer and insightful links. I didn't know about the Alien and Sedition Acts, and I guess they would appear as fascist in today's America - Actually, I doubt it could be voted... I agree with you on the evident fact that your country has faced more difficult situations in the past regarding freedom of speech, and I hope many people see the alliance of freedom restriction and technology as a bad thing.  As you pointed out, there is a legitimate national security reason for these monitoring systems, but they might have existed before National Security was one of the most important matters. I'd like to point you to [this article](http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid=20601087&amp;sid=abIV0cO64zJE), questionning the validity of these wiretappings.  If these wiretappings were in place before 9/11, this is a serious matter and government officials will have to explain it. But I can't help wondering who is gaining from this massive data collection. It's not like the police would arrest you for calling your friends and criticising politics over the phone, so how could this be used? I don't really think listening to ordinary citizens or even monitoring the numbers they call to search for patterns would be very efficient, as analysts pointed out that the typical terrorist cell wouldn't call each other very frequently, at least not enough to be suspicious. A perfect candidate for all this data would be advertising firms, but apart from Karl Rove's political networks, this would not be of big interest, let alone worth the risk being caught. I hope everything's going to be explained some day, even if I doubt it. I also hope this tendency to government spying doesn't spread more (Britain with cameras, France with security laws, etc). A good answer to your link about Alien and Sedition Acts could be a quote from the president who came after John Adams: "*When the people fear their government, there is tyranny; when the government fears the people, there is liberty.*" (Thomas Jefferson).
&gt; what's existence? See: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ontology
Guess this one didn't get picked up by the dupe-detector: http://freedb.org/modules.php?name=News&amp;file=article&amp;sid=292
But Iran has stated that they want nuclear technology for energetic purposes, which, environmental issues aside, is pretty sensible.  Should we start bombing any country which has those ambitions now?
You'll have to excuse me for using harsh language, but what the _fuck_ is going on with your government over there? If any member of the Norwegian legislative body displayed such lack of knowledge about the laws he votes for, I'd personally break into his home and confiscate his key to the cabinet.
What an old Coot.. Sad to see the future of the net is placed in his hands
Although Ron Paul is listed as a Republican senator, he is actually a [lifetime member](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ron_Paul#Political_affiliations_and_support) of the [Libertarian Party](http://www.lp.org/) since 1987.
claim: the intersection of the set of smart people and the set of alaskan voters is equal to the null set. proof: the proof is by obviosity. QED.
Thank you. This is exactly why I always ride on side walks despite the law saying otherwise.
While there is ample evidence that the US government imprisons unjustly, this case wouldn't qualify. The guy broke laws the last time he was in the U.S. AND he wasn't imprisoned.
I never said the laws were different for foreigners. Everybody needs ID. I am  a foreign student and my school ID doesn't have my birthdate on it. So the only form of identification you can show is your passport (until you get a job on campus, get a social security number, then get a driving license). This applies to many people I know. In many states you can get a social security number even if you do not have a job on campus (and thus a license or state ID) and in these states you do not need to carry a passport to drink.
I'm encouraged by the fact that, when the article *does* quote government officials, the rhetoric is utterly incomparable in severity to what the media personalities are saying.
Very true. If you're British, have you listened to "From Our Own Correspondent" on Radio 4, or watched Channel 4's "Unreported World"? Those both strike me as the very best kind of journalism, and very genuine reporting. They're both wonderful to tune in to. It's largely up to the reader / watcher / listener to discern how genuine a story is, beyond the reporter's responsibility to be true. I admit I was curious that the soldiers in this story had "never been in a battle like it" (paraphrased), but you'd be wrong if you thought this sort of thing *doesn't* happen, and at the moment this story strikes me as genuine.
Based on the title, at first I thought, 'Whoopty-doo, he can sling a lot of lead with a semi-auto,' but his firing rate combined with his accuracy is very impressive. Now can he do the same with a pump action?
The examples he gives in the article are about needing a specific permit (to film in a city, for example), not ID.  The alcohol bit is only to reinforce the argument, but he makes it a bit confusing.  And that's why Clarkson should stick to TV shows about cars.
There most assuredly is.  It's called a bench warrant.  As in, if law enforcement happen to run across you and look you up in their database, they'll arrest you and take you to jail until a judge can see you (the bench.) I had it happen to me in California, 3 years ago, for a $10 vehicle registration fix-it ticket that I didn't take care of.  In the end, I had to pay over $250 in fines.
Gee, you actually *thought* about it - and figured I was telling the truth? Both are quite novel from you. Well done nokilli! As you can see in my message, I explained how Israel came to be and why Palestine, if it wasn't greedy for the whole territory, could now be celebrating its 59th independence day.
I'm sick of these america-bashing articles. Look, I voted against Bush twice, and where possible, try and do my bit to make the US a better country. But I'm getting fed up with all these articles reiterating the same thing - the US is a horrible, terrible evil place and bush is just like hitler and we can't even take a pee without surveilance cameras watching and billions of ordinary americans are tortured each day and so on and so forth.  Enough already!
Yeah!  Maybe if we ignore our problems they'll go away!   *closes eyes and sticks fingers in ears*
Kingston, Ontario. The rednecks were both workers at a local chemical plant I drive by on the way home from the University where I teach.   
Yeah, I have to agree about Toronto. I rode a bike there for years and had no issues. Ottawa was not great - though there were very nice bike paths to lots of places, I did have the issue with turners there. Kingston is about the same as Ottawa, plus I happen to drive through an industrial area... I'm surprised at Waterloo, though. I've been there a few times and it seems non-ideal for biking... Good to know...   
That's it... Australia here I come, as soon as my rental contract is up.  heh
I am so sick of this debate on reddit. I think it's pretty clear that replacing evolution with intelligent design in science class is fairly dumb. With the exception of liberals_r_noobs I think we can all agree on that. Why does every not funny web comic comparing Kansas to the dark ages have to rise to the top of reddit? WHY?!?
America has taken a beating on reddit recently and I'm trying to get to the bottom of it.
Wait, have you not been paying any attention to this administration?  The White House never does the dirty talk.
Just a thought. Don't you think your troll handle is a bit overboard? I mean, if you are a troll, then fine, be a troll. But if you are honestly interested in debate, which you seem to be (the fact that you are willing to admit a mistake is definitely not troll like) then why bother with such a handle? Just curious.  Of course, with a handle like "random" my position is tenuous at best :&lt;)
Point taken.  But you said...  &gt;I'm sick of these america-bashing articles. not &gt;I'm sick of these america-bashing articles *on reddit*. I should say that the same sort of split happened on Sensible Erection a while back, and resulted in the creation of Sensible Election.  But a better method may be to just require a "category".  So that you can filter out *politics*.
I still occasionally hear Right-wingers in bars talking talking about the "Jew York Times."  Maybe it's a Southern thing.
What's really sad is it sounds as if the guy is actually interested in protecting individuals rights on the internet, exactly what net neutrality does. He just doesn't understand what's going on enough realize that charging extra for things like VOIP and streaming media doesn't mean individuals will get any dedicated bandwidth of their own.
With the web chaning all the time, it's important to note that technological innovation invariably leads to societal change and societal change is simple a part of modernity. If we follow this process by embracing these new technologies, then it will not be long before we experience the true potential of the internet.  In terms of how we use the internet to consume and receive our data; there will of course be a business impact in terms of how this will effect the way in which we receive our content. Mobile? PDA? Web?  It will be interesting to see how the next few months pans out in terms of how different technologies will impact on the every changing worldwide web.
&gt; If so, Israel are right to threaten attack on the Hamas leadership if their militant arm kills the captured soldier? I'm not sure. I can tell you though that an attack on the Hamas leadership would trouble me a lot less than a more indiscriminate attack. If Hamas is responsible, in a sense of having agency for, the capture of the Israeli soldier, then the only issue left is that of proportionality: is it right to escalate the conflict targetting the Hamas leadership? I'm not sure. The situation with the assassins was very different though, the Seljuk empire was occupying Persia, and so the proportionality is very clearly not equal. If you're asking though, if targetted killing of military and/or political leaders is prefferable to collective punishment, destruction of homes, etc, the answer is definitely yes, at least that's my answer. 
The implementation is for Windows and was buggy when I tried it a while ago, but the idea is pretty awesome.
Bah. Buncha citified fools. By the standards used, the *sailboat* is by far the most energy efficient vehicle.
"These are the new leads, these are the Glengarry Leads, and to you they're gold and you don't get them."
